The Adventures of Star Runner the Pantheran

The Landscape of Thorns

By

Merrill Louise Woolnough

National Novel Writing Month 2010

Mon 01 Nov 2010 11:43:50 CDT 

Chapter One
In Which an Old Friend Makes A Proposition to Detective Ronnie Camberwell and Me

Now that I am a member of the League of Hypatian Pirates, life has settled down to a routine. I am no longer an independent carrier. I have an organization behind me. This means, of course, I have some accountability to the League of Hypatian Pirates, but so far it has not been burdensome. I am constitutionally predisposed to function in an organization. It is part of my genetic design.

Detective Veronica Camberwell and I have settled down to a domestic routine. When I am out on a job, Detective Ronnie Camberwell stays with her parents in Ptolemy City. When I am home, we go to our home on the other side of Hypatia. Detective Ronnie Camberwell commutes from there back to Ptolemy City in a flier I bought and had rehabilitated for her personal use.

Our home was formerly owned by	 Conntessa Aida, an acquaintance of my friends Emily Dickinson and Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo. They called her Stefanie. . I held the lock codes for its dome for some time. On investigation, I found I could purchase it for a nominal fee with clear title so I did. It is far more room than either Detective Ronnie Camberwell or I need, but we like it. We like its distance    from Ptolemy City and we like its comforts. We especially like its privacy. We can be alone together there, far from any judgments any Terry inhabitants of Ptolemy City make about us.

I am what the Terries call a Pantheran, a member of the Race which controls the Coalition. As a Member of the Race, I know the Coalition is just a front for the long-standing Pantheran Empire and its control of most of the western spiral arm.

I had just finished a quite profitable job on the Southern Frontier and was returning to our home dome when Christabel, my AI, informed me of a visitor. Detective Ronnie Camberwell's flier was parked on our landing area. No surprise there. I had texted her of my ETA as soon as I entered the Pharaoh Star System. I did not recognize the other ride parked there though my visual inspection classified it as a Terry design.

"Its identification signature is not one I have on file," Christabel reported after checking all ride databases. "However, it is a design favored by the Alliance of Planets, Northern Frontier."

"I wonder if it is someone I know," I responded, letting my thought communications with Christabel be in the form of a conversation. I find it often easier to form my background chatter into a conversational style, letting the visual language of my eye displays be in the foreground as I fly the old training craft I use as an atmosphere flier and Alexandria Space Station shuttle craft.

"Do not get your hopes up," Christabel advised.

"Detective Ronnie Camberwell did open the dome for this ride," I said.

"Detective Ronnie Camberwell is a law enforcement officer," Christabel said. "Her assessments on who should be allowed to enter your dome are different than yours."

"Agreed," I said.

My curiosity overshadowed my disappointment that I would not have Detective Ronnie Camberwell to myself on my arrival.

"Do you want me to run one of your stored programs?" Christabel asked.

"No," I said. "I will be landing soon."

At that, Christabel activated the dome airlock and smoothly set my flier down. I unstrapped from the pilot's web, stretching my four legs, arching my back and letting my tail make some experimental swishes. For the next week or so I would be free to move around as I wished, returning only to my home web for restorative sessions. Christabel monitors my bio signs continuously. The web allows her to balance any of my physical, emotional or psycho systems as needed. I slipped on my portable monitoring pack and exited my ride.

Since I would know soon enough who my visitor was, I did not linger to examine the unknown ride. Christabel would take as many readings as possible, perhaps even sending a request to the League of Hypatian Pirates’ database.

"Already done," Christabel said, a blue symbol scrolling past on the bottom of my right eye. The Pantheran writing system is colorful and graphic in nature rather than the printed characters used by Terries.

Once on the ground, I bounded toward the entrance airlock. I was not more than halfway there when it cycled open and Detective Ronnie Camberwell stepped outside. She opened her arms wide, inviting me to place my paws on her shoulders and press my face against hers.

"Welcome home, Star," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, wrapping her arms around my neck. "Your whiskers tickle."

I tickled her some more, reveling in her squeals. I licked her ears and slid my tongue across her mouth.

"Now is that a proper kiss?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

I composed myself. Terry kissing is a strange act. I am told I am quite good at it, but it still requires some concentration.

"I should think Christabel could calculate everything so you could do it perfectly every time," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Perhaps," I said, "but it is a spontaneous action with many variables. You could wait each time for the calculations of the rate of speed of our moths coming together, the correct angles -- "

"Stop, you silly pussy cat," Detective Ronnie Camberwell laughed. "I have a surprise for you. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo is here and she has a proposition for us."

"For us?" I asked.

I was caught off guard. First, that Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo was here on Hypatia at all and that she had come to my home. Secondly, that Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and Detective Ronnie Camberwell had been in such a deep conversation.

"Come in and find out for yourself," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. She turned back into the airlock and I quickly joined her.

The two women did not exactly dislike each other. It is just that Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo was my first Terry lover and our relationship had been on again off again for many years. It had been off largely because we had little time to spend with one another. It was always quite passionate when we were together. I had not seen Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo since the episode of the Library of the Mind. That was my meeting with Detective Ronnie Camberwell. I met Detective Ronnie Camberwell and we became a couple. Detective Ronnie Camberwell values monogamy so I did not intend to start my relationship up again with Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo. What sort of a proposition did she have in my for Detective Ronnie Camberwell and me 

"Go in and find out," Christabel said.


A yellow trapezoid slid by my left eye. My biological systems were not aligned optimally. 

reflections on my relationship with Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and my questions and uneasiness about her sudden re-entry into my life were undoubtedly the stimulus to my biological imbalances. I would need a session in the acceleration web to shortly realign my system.

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo rose from her chair when we entered the lounge, a pretty room open to the red and yellow Hypatian sky. 

"Hello, Captain Star Runner," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, extending her hand but not coming forward to embrace me as she would have formerly done.

"Hello, Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo," I said, raising my left forepaw to touch the back of her hand briefly. This formality seemed very strange to me but perhaps it was necessary in light of Detective Ronnie Camberwell's presence and the sexual mores of Terries. "What brings you here to Hypatia and to my home? Detective Ronnie Camberwell says you have a proposition for us."

"Direct and to the point as usual," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo, resetting herself and with an attempt, I thought, to make our conversation more informal.

"Can I get you something to drink?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked me. I saw both she and Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo has liquid in glasses by their respective chairs.

"I am fine," I said, settling myself on the luxurious carpeting. I so loved stretching out on it. It made the housekeeping bots a little frenetic in their actions, removing my fuchsia-colored hair, but that was why I had them and had them in such good working order.

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo picked up her half-filled glass and began to turn it in her hands. This was a familiar gesture. She was deciding how to tell me something. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo did not know how I would react to what she had to say. She wanted me to respond in a particular way.

I waited. If I kept quiet, Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo would not have any information as to how I might respond to what she had to say. It had taken me a long time to learn this. Having learned this strategy, I found it helped me not only in my dealings with Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo but with many of my clients. Terries found silence very unsettling. 

"You know I went to investigate the Landscape of Thorns," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo finally said.

"Yes," I said.

"Emily Dickinson and I went there together."

"Yes," I said. At one time, I would have started asking many questions about Emily Dickinson's welfare at this point. I wanted to know, of course. We, too, had been lovers. I still considered Emily Dickinson a friend. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo often called him Ebberhardt. I suspected she was using his Hypatian name for clarity and to arouse my sympathies.

"He is missing," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

I waited some more. It was very hard to wait and not say anything.

Detective Ronnie Camberwell broke the silence. She is, after all, a detective.

"How did he disappear, Captain?"

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo continued to turn the stemmed glass in her hand.

"He went out one morning to the Landscape of Thorns and he did not come back."

"You looked for him, of course," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Of course," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I looked. We sent in a search team. But we could not find him. We found no trace of him at all."

"And you want us to find him?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

This seemed a logical conclusion to me but it sounded odd. How could an androgen like me and a provincial detective be more useful than the members of Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo's military team? Christabel reminded me that Ebberhardt Dietrich was former military but I did not think that was relevant.

I swished my tail impatiently. I said nothing. I suspected these two women knew I was growing restive with the silences.

"The Landscape of Thorns is a hazardous waste site -- a very old hazardous waste site," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "We think the Pantherans may have established it. We cannot get any records from them, of course."

"But the site is outside of the Coalition," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Would they have hazardous waste site outside of their control?"

"Perhaps it was in their space at one time," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "We only have theories. And we have the hazardous waste to deal with even now. The reason I came here is that I thought Captain Star Runner might have some ideas as to how the Race may have organized the site which would allow it to know where to look for Ebberhardt."

I was stunned. This sounded so illogical to me. I am a star runner. My genetic engineering equips me to pilot starship. I am not engineered for hazardous waste maintenance and disposal. I have no racial memory of ancient sites. I said as much.

"It is about scale and organization," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said again.

"No," I said. "It is about something else. You may have told this crazy story to your superiors. It might make sense to them, but it is not why you are here."

"No, it is not," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo, said, putting down her wine glass. "Well, not exactly. I think there is something you as a Pantheran can tell us about the site. The crews are starting to say it is haunted. I have felt it, too. Strange things are happening we cannot explain. Since I do not believe in ghosts I think There is something quite real happening and I just think you can figure it out."

So there it was. Landscape of Thorns was a Pantheran site and so a Pantheran was needed to explain it.

"I am a star runner," I said. "I know nothing about hazardous waste management."

"That is not it," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. There was an edge in her voice I had never heard before. "It is not the scientific processes we need help with. Granted, we do not understand them yet, but we will. It is the feel of the place, the sense of it. I am betting Pantherans have not changed much over the past several thousand years."

I considered this. Genetic modifications are ongoing. The star runners being bred today, for example, would be slightly different when compared to me. However, we are not so changed from generation to generation as to be unrecognizable from members of the Race from another time. That remains a principle of the Institute. It is why we are as large as we are and why we retain our tails and our full body hair. We could have been bred smaller, without hair, without tails, with fewer or more legs. We remain members of the Race which rules the western spiral arm.

"And Detective Ronnie Camberwell?" I asked.

"She is a crack detective," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "We have a mystery. It needs to be solved."

Detective Ronnie Camberwell's face grew red. This meant she was embarrassed by Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo's compliment.

 "My job," Detective Ronnie Camberwell began.

"I have already talked to the chief of police," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I can have you for a time if I cover you salary. There are some budgetary problems and your absence will resolve them."

"Budgetary problems?" I asked.

"There is a shortfall in the budget," Detective Ronnie Camberwell explained. "Dad was going to have to lay me off."

"I was looking forward to some time here at home," I said.

"It takes several weeks to get out to the Landscape of Thorns," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I understand your new ship is quite comfortable."

Christabel scrolled a colorful array of symbols down the inside of my left eye.

"The Owl and the Pussy Cat will need some attention and restocking," I said. "It is scheduled to be ready in three days time."

"That will be acceptable," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I will transmit coordinates and information for you two to study while you are waiting for your ship."

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo stood up. "I need to get back to the Landscape of Thorns as soon as possible," she said. "Thank you for taking on this assignment." Again, she shook hands with both Detective Ronnie Camberwell and me. Afterward, she exited through the airlock and shortly afterward, her ride lifted through the dome. 

Detective Ronnie Camberwell and I were alone together for the first time in a long while. 

02/11/2010 20:15:25 

Chapter Two
In Which Detective Ronnie Camberwell and I Learn Something about the Landscape of Thorns

I continued to lie on the floor. My homecomings to this point had been cause for great rejoicing and intimacy. Now we were quiet. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo's visit had not produced excitement but foreboding.

"A penny for your thoughts, Pretty One," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said to me.

"I am a star runner," I said. "This is what I know. My track record is not very good in solving mysteries. I always get things mixed up."

"You were quite helpful with the Library of the Mind," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Not really," I said. "I certainly had everything wrong on Over the Moon."

"You were dealing with crazy people then," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"How do I know I am not dealing with crazy people at the Landscape of Thorns?"

"I think the situation is crazy there, not necessarily the people," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Shall we look at the data Captain Romeres Lujo left us?"

She produced two data wafers. One she slid into her wrist unit other she inserted into the port on my portable AI. Christabel processed the data and it began scrolling at twice the normal rate across both of my eyes. I consciously absorbed only fleeting impressions of terabytes of information while Detective Ronnie Camberwell studied the abstract. I always wonder how Terries read all the data they need to master in a timely manner. For me, I just know. My mind is directly linked to Christabel's massive storage. She ca work to do tonight.

"Indeed," she said.

"So the Landscape of Thorns is a hazardous waste site from an ancient race," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"An ancient race?" I said. "I thought it was it belongs to the Race."

"It is outside Coalition space," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"No matter," I said. "The Race has influence beyond Coalition borders."

"Do you know something I do not?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"The Race's influence reaches almost everywhere in the western spiral arm," I said.

"Not here."

"Here, too, though not directly. The League of Hypatian Pirates has done work for the Race. It is convenient for the Race not to be in evidence here."

"So you are done jobs for them?"

"My work in the Southern Frontier is monitored," I said. "Military and civilian carriers Ravens all the time."

"And do the Pantherans leave the ships?"

"The gendered ones do. There is a club for them on the third Wing," I said. "The 

"And do they talk to you?"

"Of course not. I am an androgen. Besides, officially, I do not exist. My identification number has been terminated."

"You do not look terminated to me," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Why do not you put on something slinky and we can greet each other properly after your long absence."

"Good idea," I said, getting up. "Any requests?"

"You choose," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

I padded away, reviewing my wardrobe. I felt a growing sense of excitement. Christabel was flooding my systems. Sex for an androgen is almost the mind though there are some chemicals Christabel releases for me, yet with programming, I can experience lovemaking. I selected my lustrous pink satin cape. I stepped into the four leg straps then buttoned the front which extended from my throat to my tail. The garment is made of silk. I had it custom-made at a shop on Three Ravens. The cape itself is unadorned. Detective Ronnie Camberwell likes to rub all parts of her body over its slippery surface and what Christabel does with her touch. Memories of previous encounters came flooding to the surface of my mind. I have neither sexual organs nor secondary sexual characteristics, but through my programming, I sensed my nipples hardening and I began to quiver between my rear legs. The tip of my tail began to twitch. My breath came a bit quicker. Detective Ronnie Camberwell would find me very receptive to her advances -- just the way she likes it. The satin cape  was not filmy, but I like its feel and Christabel ranked it high for arousing Detective Ronnie Camberwell. As an androgen, I have learned to be adept at either a male or a female role, depending on my lover's orientation. As a lesbian, Detective Ronnie Camberwell wants me female all the way and I am happy to oblige. I love pretty things. I also put a gold collar around my neck and matching bracelets on each of my four legs. So My toes trembled as I lifted each leg in turn.  adorned, I returned to the Lounge to find my lover naked on a simulated fur rug before a holographic fire. The scene was complete with heat r nature radiating from the fireplace. over our heads, the poisonous Hypatian atmosphere continuing to swirl red and yellow against the night sky. Christabel overlaid my own sense of androgynous self with a feminine sensibility. OH, this was going to be good and it was.

Later, over a light meal, Detective Ronnie Camberwell and I returned to the subject of the Landscape of Thorns. During the intervening hour, Christabel had organized all the data and stored information in my brain. The effect was that I now knew a great deal about the location and the nature of our mission. I began to talk.

03/11/2010 20:12:20 

"So what do we have?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked, setting her dish aside.

"Some hard data and lots of speculation," I said. "The team working at the Landscape of Thorns believes it is an ancient hazardous waste site set up by my race. It could be, I suppose, but There is no internal evidence of this. As a result, any speculation in this vain is pointless."

"Why do you think it is not a Pantheran site?"

"Because There is writing. None of it is ours."

"Could your way of writing have changed over time?"

"Yes. It has. But what they have there at the Landscape of Thorns is writing. There is no color, no geometric shapes. My education did not include a great deal of ancient studies, but nothing in Christabel's databases suggests that our writing ever looked like this. The Fungusian Network's records are generally as ancient as ours and they have nothing either about this site. The Featherote Charm has nothing and they are the only other race ancient enough to be a potential source."

"So you think we are dealing with an unknown race."
 
"Correct. Therefore, we should only deal with the factual information in Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo's briefing materials."

"Go on." Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

 "The Terries, that is, the human race has quarantined this location. There is cooperation between the Solar League and the Alliance of Planets which, as you know, is on the Northern Frontier. The Coalition is respecting their quarantine so far. 

"The star system is know colloquially as Holmes-Watson, being a binary system with Holmes being the larger, hotter blue star and Watson being the smaller cooler red star. The planet makes a looping orbit which can loosely be described as a figure eight. This means its climate is very irregular and it is never temperate. At the moment it is in its coldest winter season as it is on the far side of the red star. There is no vegetation or atmosphere on the planet which is known as Les Lestrade."

"No Mrs. Hudson?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"No," I said, priding myself that I knew the reference. Detective Ronnie Camberwell always looked for the feminine reference. I suspected she would not have cared if all the male members of her race ceased to exist. Although I am adamant in the gendered world of the Terries that I am neither he nor she but properly it, I know Detective Ronnie Camberwell refers to me when speaking to others as she.

"So to work on Lestrade we will need spacesuits."

"Yes," I said.

"Holmes-Watson, like the Pharaoh Star System is on the eastern frontier, outside of Coalition space. The Terries have claimed jurisdiction because pirates were taking people off cruise ships and selling them as slaves to a mining operation on Lestrade. They were recovering elements from the hazardous waste site. The humans so employed became ill and died. They received no compensation and no medical treatment.

"The Solar League made a formal petition to patrol the eastern frontier, but the Coalition declined to do so. The Solar League filed a protest and with the Alliance of Planets, they have both quarantined Lestrade and are attempting to monitor the eastern border. Since the quarantine, no cruise ships have been molested and no freighters have been hijacked either."

"Do we know who these people are who were doing this?"

"We know Deadly Dudley and Thunder Bone Bobby were involved, but their information led nowhere. The league of Hypatian Pirates maintains they were not involved. Any records I can access bears that assertion out."

"And the site itself?"

"The humans are calling it the Landscape of Thorns because it resembles an old Earth design for identifying nuclear waste. That is what is on the surface along with several rooms which appear to have writing about the site itself and a star chart which suggests the site is at least 20,000 Coalition years old. My history lessons suggest that this dates to the time the Race achieved space flight. Given the distances involved, without access to a star drive, the Race could not have reached this site from Home World in less than a thousand years.

"Underground, there are a series of corridors with storage rooms in which a variety of hazardous substances are stored. The workers apparently took various containers to the surface to a reclamation plant. There is also a crude barracks where the workers were housed."

"What did the workers have to say about their employers?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"Nothing," I said. "They were executed when the overseers identified Solar League units entering the Holmes-Watson Star System. They escaped before they were identified."

"And your friend, Emily Dickinson?"

"He left the quarters he shares with Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo one morning and has not been seen since."

"And the odd things?"

"Humans have reported feeling odd, a sense of foreboding, a sense of being watched, hearing inexplicable sounds, seeing shadows, insisting items have been moved both above and below ground. Scans of the surface reveal no life. The facility below ground is shielded from external scans. Scans of the areas  corridors below ground are unreliable."

"Because-"
"Of the nature of the substances being stored. Some are simply known hazardous waste of a non-nuclear character. Some is known radioactive materials. Some is totally unknown and judged to be hazardous because of its inclusion in the site."

"And what exactly is the Solar League trying to do here?"

"They are trying to find out three tings: First, who are the people who were abducted. Second, who abducted them and for whom? And finally, who created the site. They do not plan to clean up the site. That would be a massive undertaking and considering they cannot identify all the waste material, very dangerous."

"And our mission?"

"To find Emily Dickinson. I suppose if we could ascertain any other information it would be gratefully received."

"And we leave -- "

"The day after tomorrow. It will take us about twelve days to get to the Holmes-Watson Star System traveling at human acceptable speeds."

"One more thing, Star, you said earlier the Pantherans have influence throughout the western spiral arm. Could they be involved here?"

"Indirectly," I said. "I doubt they are involved directly."

"Why?"

"They would have used androgens in the reclamation process," I said. "They would not have kidnapped humans."

"The Pantherans would do that, breed androgens for such a dangerous job?"

"Oh, yes, of course, but they would have been shielded properly. It is expensive to engineer, breed and raise hazardous waste workers."

"I still find that creepy."

"Genetic engineering?"

"Yes."

"Well, darling, I would not be here with genetic engineering."

"True."

Detective Ronnie Camberwell slid our dishes into the recycler.

"I am 
beat," she said. "Want to get some sleep?"

"I need to get into my web," I said. "I have a warning message I need to deal with."

"OK. In the morning then."

And Detective Ronnie Camberwell left me to rest in the large bed. I was disappointed. I wanted to curl up next to her but Christabel had been quite insistent. The warning message was blinking quite rapidly.

Chapter 3
Night Work: A discussion with Christabel

04/11/2010 17:02:39 
	
The bio web I use at home is in the Lounge. We have a screen to curtain it off if we choose. Otherwise, I can be in it and still be a part of anything going on in the lounge which is very handy. Detective Ronnie Camberwell and I may still converse or just be together. Tonight I set the screen aside and left the 		hole program running for the fireplace. Christabel can communicate with the villa's AI to shut it down when I fell asleep. For now, I liked its warmth and the glow of the fire.

"We need to talk," Christabel said.

"About -- " I said.

"About what you told Detective Ronnie Camberwell," Christabel said. "You were not one hundred per cent truthful with her."

I considered this. Of course Christabel monitored my thought process.

I do not have a conscience subroutine running so that Christabel was not questioning my veracity per say. I reviewed my conversation with Detective Ronnie Camberwell, running it through in colored symbols at a high rate of speed. To rerun the audio track would have been too tedious. I had not made any factual errors.

"Have you?" Christabel asked.

"What do you mean?" I asked. I was puzzled. Where had I erred.

"You are not considering the possibility that the Pantheran Empire is involved," Christabel said.

"And you say this because -- "

Since installed, I have found it quite beneficial to have an internal dialog with Christabel. Unlike my former artificial intelligences, Christabel has a strong personality. I value her opinions and I have come to rely on these dialogs to clarify my own thinking. Now, however, Christabel's Fungusian Network programming was coming to the foreground. An AI programmed by the Race would never make such an assertion.

"The Pantheran Empire has no regard for any other member of the Coalition," Christabel insisted. "They would have no qualms about enslaving humans or any other of the peoples that make up the membership of the Coalition."

"But if someone found out," I objected. "It would compromise the Coalition."

"And that would be a problem because -- " Christabel retorted.

"Now you are talking like a Fungusian," I said. "Surely you can distance yourself from your creators and think dispassionately."

Silence. It was a very short silence, but it did exist.

"Perhaps I spoke too quickly," Christabel admitted.

"Let us consider your premise," I said. I was feeling magnanimous. I suspected Christabel's mixture of nutrients and pharmaceuticals that was flowing into me may have contributed to this feeling. 

"The Race has androgens who could extract all usable material from the Landscape of Thorns more efficiently than any force of Terries. Instead, they contract with pirates to kidnap Coalition citizens and transport them to a planet where they are unsuited to live and work and are untrained for the task at hand. When this facility is discovered by the Solar League, the Terries are executed and the reclamation plant abandoned. Does this sound consistent with the usual methods of operation exhibited by the Race?"

"Your argument is reasonable," Christabel said. "Androgen workers would be far more efficient, trained and resistant to the deleterious affects of many of the materials stored on Lestrade. What I find hard to believe is that the Pantherans do not know who is behind this operation."

"I suspect they do know," I said, "at least, somebody knows. The question you want answered, Christabel, is who knows and why are they keeping quiet."

Another infinitesimal pause. "When you frame it that way, Star Runner, the silence of the Coalition Secretary General on this matter is far more sinister. It suggests a undercover operation or a tassel acceptance of someone else's strategies. The question is: who are these people?"

AIs think logically. They can process terabytes of data almost instantaneously. However, biological processors, for example, my brain, can make connections between disparate pieces of information. It is why the androgen-artificial intelligence combination is such a powerful one. Workers do not forget. They are almost error free yet they can be both creative and resourceful.

"What about the Azulees?" I asked. Christabel had not been my AI when I encountered that amphibious race.

"They are an unknown," Christabel said.

"You have any further information on them?" I inquired. the Fungusian Network did know things about the Azulees but they are always reluctant to share information not known outside of their assembly.

"If the Azulees are behind this operation," Christabel said, "they are unlikely to be the ones who were present at the Landscape of Thorns."

I shifted in the web, unable to get comfortable. 

"You are unsettled," Christabel said.

"This is not a straight forward situation," I said. "I am being asked to ascertain the origins of an ancient facility because it may or may not be connected to the ancient Pantheran Empire. I am a star runner, not an archaeologist or an historian. I do not understand why I was chosen for this assignment."

"Perhaps because you are a unique creature," Christabel said. "You are, after all, a fuchsia-colored Pantheran."

"That is an accident," I said. "I used to believe I was destined for great things, but I decided some time ago I was deluding myself for thinking that."

"Nevertheless, you often have a unique perspective which is helpful to the humans."

"And why should I help the humans?" I asked. My tone was much harsher than I thought I meant.

"Because Detective Ronnie Camberwell is human. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo is human. Emily Dickinson is human. Tamara is human." Christabel listed all my close friends. I had no members of the Race as friends. I had not known what friendship was until I met Terries. Perhaps friendship was a Terry invention.
Christabel saw fit to  demur, making no  judgment on my observation.

A large stop sign appeared on my status line.

"You are creating a circular argument," Christabel said. "Time to sleep."

And I did.

Chapter Four
Ride to the Landscape of Thorns

I parked The Owl and the Pussy Cat at Over the Moon, the League of Hypatian Pirates’ spaceport on Cleopatra. With what seemed to be much of the contents of our villa, Detective Ronnie Camberwell and I got into the former training ride. We lifted off from the parking area and made our way through the Hypatian atmosphere toward the nearer of the planet's two moons. We had taken the Owl and the Pussy Cat out for its maiden run together. That was a lot of interplanetary travel with one insertion and extraction. Christabel put the ride through its paces and logged its performance. I reviewed her summaries and together we made the necessary adjustments. Both the Featherote and the Fungusian Network provide me with excellent rides so there was little for us to do. What I remember about that trip was the sex, our excitement about being together, our plans to stay together. Detective Ronnie Camberwell's friends and family were scandalized. I thought for a time my initial ride would be  a simply  torrid interval. I left with my first official League of Hypatian Pirates assignment with little expectation of any further contact. I received no communication from Detective Ronnie Camberwell while I was away. Truth to tell, sending a message to a ride traveling in hyperspace is expensive. I thought it best if I resisted the temptation to initiate contact. I missed her greatly, more than I had ever missed any other of my human friends. Christabel became alarmed at the amount and number of pharmaceuticals she need to administer. I spent a great deal of time in my acceleration web brooding. 

To my astonishment, Detective there was a message from  Ronnie Camberwell at the spaceport manager's office waiting for me when I parked my as yet unnamed ride. Could I come to Ptolemy City? She wished to talk to me.

We met at the Intergalactic Cafe. My stomach was so unsettled I could not eat. Remembering that Terries require purchases, I ordered toast and let it cool on the white paper  plate in front of me. I waited, watching the time display on my status line. Detective Ronnie Camberwell was late. At the time, I did not know she was always late. When ten minutes elapsed, I thought I should leave. She was not going to come. Then I saw her coming through the door and looking around. I could not call out to her. I could not speak. It was the strangest thing. My heart was beating very fast.

"Well, hello, stranger," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, sliding into the chair across from me. "are not you going to say anything?"

"Yes," I whispered. My voice sounded very hoarse. "I am pleased to see you, Detective Ronnie Camberwell."

"And that is it?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell demanded. "you are just pleased."

"I am thrilled," I said.

"You do not sound thrilled. You look scared to death."

"I am confused," I said. "I thought I would never see you again and here you are. Maybe I will not see you again after this meeting."

"So you are playing hard to get," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "I did not expect that of you."

"Not hard to get," I said. "I am easy to get."

"you are easy then?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Like an alley cat."

"No," I said. I knew that was a negative remark.

When I said what I said next it surprised me and surprised Christabel, too. "I love you."

Detective Ronnie Camberwell reached across the table and grabbed both of my forepaws. "You big fluffy thing," she said. "I love you, too. it is been hell not having you around."

"But your family -- " I protested.

"they will have to get used to you," she said.

I melted inside. All sorts of warning symbols appeared on my status line. I clutched Detective Ronnie Camberwell's large rough hands.

"I cannot stay," she said. "I am on my shift. I will be free later. Can you stay in Ptolemy City?"

"I have a room at Shepherd's," I said. "Come there."

"I will," she said. And she did.

The next day I began researching housing options. There seemed to be nothing suitable in Ptolemy  city. In the afternoon, Detective Ronnie Camberwell and I took the training flier out for a ride. I flew over Contessa Aida's villa. Detective Ronnie Camberwell had been there briefly during the Library of the Mind episode. It remained empty.

"I wonder who owns it," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "The ownership of all the villas near the southern pole are in doubt."

When we returned, I went to the city's administrative offices to inquire. As Detective Ronnie Camberwell had said, the ownership of Contessa Aida's villa was an open question. Apparently, Stefanie (I did not know her entire name) had never either purchased it, leased it or even let anyone know she was occupying it.

"Squatter's rights apply," the clerk informed me.

"What does that mean?" I asked. "It means you can occupy it if you like," the clerk told me. "Put your codes on it and it is yours."

"Can I file a formal claim?" I asked.

"Sure. there is a fee, of course."

"Of course," I said, and upon learning what it was, I paid it and registered the villa in my name. I would not return home from an assignment to find someone else living there. Well, maybe, but I would know my own lover. Lover. It was a strange word to apply to the tough and rangy Detective Ronnie Camberwell. With my high tail, slender legs and long whiskers, I am the delicate and pretty one of our pair. 

05/11/2010 14:18:40 

The shuttle craft left the atmosphere, locating the identification for Over the Moon Spaceport. As we accelerated, I pointed out the Alexandria Space Station to Detective Ronnie Camberwell and the lesser of Hypatia's two moon, Mark Antony. She asked me to identify a number of spacecrafts making their way to and from the Alexandria Space Station. The training ride could read their identification were the only vehicle on approach to Over the Moon Spaceport. Codes were exchanged and the dome opened for our entry. I brought the ride down on the cracked parking surface. The cargo robots were summoned. I unstrapped and opened the exit hatch. Detective Ronnie Camberwell followed me.

"The air quality here is poor," I said. "It is not well scrubbed. You will be able to breathe all right."

We walked down the ramp.

"It does smell bad," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said making a distasteful face."

"We only have to walk over there," I said, raising a paw to point.

The Owl and the Pussy Cat rose majestically on its landing struts. Its surface gleamed in the filtered sunlight.

"Your ship is so pretty," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "All these others," she swept her hand in an expansive arc, "look like Junkers."

"Piracy is a tough business," I said. "Besides, these rides look nonthreatening. See there," I pointed at a nearby vehicle. "Do you see that row of gun ports?"

"they are almost obscured by all the pockmarks," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, stopping to study the vehicle's surface. 

"They were quite noticeable when the vehicle was new, I am sure," I said, "but now you would not suspect it could annihilate an unarmed carrier."

My head ached. This bad air. "let us go," I said. "My bio system gets cleansed. Yours is not so easily scrubbed."

The ramp was down when we arrived at the Owl and the Pussy Cat. Bots trundled our cargo from one ride to the other. My status line indicated we were almost ready to lift.

"Ready to strap in?" I asked as we cycled through the lock.

"In a minute," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

I went to my acceleration web on what my Terry friends  called the bridge. Because of my AI symbiosis, I need no screens or consoles. For the convenience of my terry passengers, I have these amenities installed for them as well as a headset which they can utilize when we are running in normal space and the gravity pressure keeps them pinned down in their seats.

"Ready to lift," I said unnecessarily aloud to Christabel. Terries like this touch.


"We are cleared to blast off," Chrystal said through the speaker over our heads.

prized star runners can sense an insertion point. I am among the best. For the Pharaoh Star System, terry surveyors had identified two. I usually used these, but today I was looking for my own. A part of me wanted to dazzle Detective Ronnie Camberwell. The other part wanted to get to the Landscape of thorns as soon as possible. There had been no updates from captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo. Emily Dickinson must still be missing and he needed to be found.

My relationship with Emily Dickinson was complicated. We had been lovers, a stormy relationship. Emily Dickinson blamed me for our falling out. I made numerous of our sexual encountered available as downloads on my pornographic download site for androgens. Emily Dickinson took exception to this. I argued that here on Hypatia, it was legal to do this and besides, the programs turned out to be very popular and therefore very lucrative.

Later, we patched up our differences. I did get Emily Dickinson poisoned, accidentally of course, but then saved his life. Another time I got him out of the Fends, a sort of prison on Hypatia. Yes, our relationship was stormy but now that I was in a long-term relationship with Detective Ronnie Camberwell, I did not think we would have any more problems.

There it was -- the optimal insertion point for Landscape of Thorns. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo had given me the extraction point. It was, more or less, a straight shot and we cold make good time.

"Terry best speed," I informed Christabel.

"Already calculated," she replied and my status line changed.  This insertion point shaved off thirty-six hours.

"We are at our hyperspace cruising speed," I told Detective Ronnie Camberwell. "Welcome to the Mother's space."

"Mother's space?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked." I have never heard of Mother's space."

"it is the term I use," I said. "Terries, humans, call it the Silence. We call the star scape the Mother's Cloak and hyperspace we call simply Mother Space."

"And who is the Mother?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. "I thought you did not have a mother?"

"OH yes," I said, "I had a mother and a father. I never met my father. I do not remember-my mother. No androgen does. The mother I am talking about is the Mother Of Us All"

"And you believe in such a deity?"

"Yes, of course," I said. "The Mother watches out for us."

Terries called my  assertions simplistic faith. They were not. I know the Mother Of Us All looks out for me. I always know where to look in normal space for her stars, a constellation that outlines her form. It is visible from the Home World the terries call Panthera. Faith is not involved. The Mother Of Us All is a certainty.

"We will be traveling for approximately ten and a half days," I said. "Make yourself comfortable."

I could spend a lot of time describing what we did for that time. I have a complete record. However, the main thrust of my narrative concerns the Landscape of Thorns and it is time we got there.

Chapter Four
In Which Detective Ronnie Camberwell and I Begin Our Separate Investigations

It became obvious to me that Lestrade and Watson had once been a separate star and planet system. Holmes, a younger and stronger star had pulled them into its gravitational sphere. Perhaps long ago  Lestrade featured an atmosphere, vegetation and even an alien race. Perhaps these were the builders of this inexplicable place.

"Nice thinking creatively," Christabel said, "but this site was built when the planet had no atmosphere, no life and when Watson was already captured by Holmes."

Well, so much for that idea.

We stood on the ramp, swathed in our environmental suits, getting our first look around. Detective Ronnie Camberwell began speaking, but not to me.

"The site is quite harsh. A burs encircles the hazardous waste site. There are also huge columns with spikes sticking out of them at odd angles. They are black and contain some sort of writing. I think it is carved."

A sine wave flowed across the top of my left eye producing audio. It was just a little out of phase with the voice that came over the suit is radio. I sat back on my haunches involuntarily. The noise was very painful.

"Stop," I exclaimed.

Detective Ronnie Camberwell stopped speaking. The sine wave disappeared. Shakily, I got back on all four legs.

"Are you all right?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked me.

"You were speaking and Christabel was reproducing your voice," I said. "It hurt my head, made me dizzy and nauseous."

"My fault," Christabel said. "I will not give you the feed."
"Christabel and I worked it out," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, "apparently not fully. She is linked into my wrist set. She will be able to give me a text file of my notes. It is much faster. And you will have a complete record, too. Can she extract summaries of your  work for me?"

"Sure," I said. "Whatever, so long as I do not get that feedback anymore."

"Not to worry," Christabel said.

"What you said about this place," I said, "you are right. It is very unsettling."

"I think it was designed to warn people off," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Do you think that means the original people were humanoid?"

"Not necessarily," I said.

"Oh, and you are just right all the time?" Christabel asked.

"I am a member of the Race," I said primly. "We are the standard by which all other sentient beings are judged."

"Spoken as a true Pantheran," Christabel said.

"what did you expect?" I shot back.

 Another suited figure appeared. My radio frequency changed. "I was not expecting you so soon," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "You used a different insertion vector."

"Certainly," I said. "We are thirty-six hours ahead of our estimated time of arrival."

"that is great. We can really use your help."

"Emily Dickinson is still missing?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"Yes. And we have no more information."

"Can I see his barracks?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. "And the last person to see him, talk with him."

"Of course," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Come this way. Star -- "

"I am going to look at the perimeter," I said. I can find my own way."

The columns were over twenty-five feet high. They were close together and not at right angles to the ground. They looked forbidding.

The site was a square. If I kept walking, I would-arrive at one of the puzzling corner rooms. I wanted to see one of them for myself.

No air moved around me. The earthworks alongside of me did not change. They had not changed in ten thousand years. It was a disturbing thought. The universe was all about change. Yet here are Lestrade, nothing  changed until. Until what? Until someone brought hapless terries here and coerced them into bringing hazardous materials to the surface  Who  built this place? Who came here to raid it? Would the room at the corner tell me anything except that I knew nothing, nothing at all?

The room was surrounded by columns on three sides. It looked like there were passages leading away. Christabel produced an aerial view. The passageways led nowhere. They were narrow with the columns towering over the corridors. Terries could walk there. My shoulders would rub against either side. I would have to back out and turning at the intersections would be nai impossible. Were the beings who built this place tall and narrow or were the columns supposed to dwarf them, intimidate them. They intimidated me. This was an uneasy place, quite alien.

"Because it is not a space going vehicle," Christabel said "or a space station."

"Or a villa," I added helpfully.

My comfort zone was growing a little bit but I still preferred to be among the stars.

I approached the doorway into the room.
Chapter Five
In Which I Become Acquainted with William Shackspeare (Call Me Billy) and Reflect Upon the Terry Penchant for Journalism

Before I could squeeze my way into the stone room, an environmental-suited humanoid came around the corner.

"Thought I would find you here," it said, using the same radio frequency Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo had used. "You must be Captain Star Runner. you are the only one here on Lestrade who is not a human. I can tell that by the shape of your suit."

Christabel identified the speaker as male.

"You have me at a disadvantage," I said. "I do not know who you are."

"William Shackspeare," he said, extending a suited hand. "Call me Billy."

I did not raise a paw. Shaking hands was a quaint terry custom from ancient times. Shaking hands while clad in environmental suits was downright awkward and ridiculous.

"What is your function here at the Landscape of Thorn, William Shackspeare (Call me Billy)?" I inquired.

"Oh, you are as strange as they said you were," William Shackspeare (Call me Billy) responded. "I am a reporter for the Solar Times. I am here getting the low-down on who the people were who did the dirty on those tourists."

Christabel translated for me. Low-down: information. Dirty: doing something despicable.

"I see," I said. "You report."

"I am a journalist, you see, an investigative journalist."

More database searching. My status line flickered.

"The Solar Times is a news outlet," I said. It was an old record from my personal database. The Solar Times was available on Dirty World Station and Pirate's Cove. Grand Central, too, as far as that goes, maybe on every terry world and space station.

"you are got it," William Shackspeare (Call me Billy) said. "If I do this project right, I will get a Pulitzer for sure."

An award.

"And how is your investigative reporting proceeding?" I inquired.

"Not a whole lot new," William Shackspeare (Call me Billy) admitted. "I figure now you and Detective Camberwell are on the scene, there will be more info."
 
"Why?" I asked. I was unsure why our mere arrival would change anything.

"I have heard you two are really crackerjack. Say, what do you make of this room?" 

Crackerjack. a treat?, No -- wait, good at what we did. Well, that was true. I said, "I have not been inside the room yet. It will be a tight fit for me. Please wait outside."

"I will go in first," William Shackspeare (Call Me Billy) offered.
  
"You will be an impediment to my investigation," I said primly. I imagined William Shackspeare (Call Me Billy) looked disappointed.

Christabel made a suggestion. 

"Good idea." I said hello to William Shackspeare (Call me Billy), "I will give you a statement when I emerge. ."

"Righto."

I stepped to the stone doorway. It was narrow, no wider than the corridors. Carefully.
 I slid my shoulders and haunches inside the room. The doorway was not tall. My tail brushed the lintel. Even in the environmental suit , it was flexible enough to bend. Once through the doorway, I could hold it high a large stone was directly in  front of me, so directly in front of me my chest rested on its edge. Surely the room had been built around the stone. Analysis indicated it was of one piece, not parts assembled in situ

Writing of several types  covered its to top, carved into the surface. None of the characters m were readable. Their clarity remained. We just did not know any of the languages. A periodic table covered one wall. We knew over two hundred of its elements, both naturally occurring and synthesized. Some forty-seven elements were unknown. One of the teams assigned to the Landscape of Thorns had already identified one of the unknown elements as being stored on site. In their analysis, it was extremely dangerous to all living things.

A star chart covered another wall. The astronomers had calculated the age of the site based on stellar drift. The chart showed the stars from Lestrade so it gave no clue of the origin of the site's builders.

The third wall had more writing as did the two shorter walls of the entry way. The same language symbols were used. The guess was that it told something about the place in several languages, perhaps the languages of the builders. Computers were analyzing the languages for repeated words and phrases as well as doing complex comparisons to all known galactic languages modern and ancient.

The floor was plain. No clues appeared to be there. I looked to the ceiling. There was a swirly pattern there. Through my radio receiver I heard a voice say in my own language, "This is not a place of honor. No great deeds are commemorated here. This is a place of great danger. Leave this place immediately."

"Where did that voice come from, Christabel," I asked. "Who is it."

"The transmission has no source," Christabel said. "The speaker is unidentified."

"Has anyone else reported on this?"

"Negative."

"Than I shall not say anything to William Shackspeare (Call Me Billy)," I decided. "In the past, Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo has advised me not to speak to the press."

"That is correct," Christabel said.

I hesitated.

"What?" Christabel asked.

"Do you feel it?" I asked.
"Feel?" Christabel asked.

"Feel a sense of foreboding?" I asked.

"The temperature has dropped and the humidity has increased," Christabel said. "You may feel the cold through your suit."

"No," I said. "I never can feel cold through my suit unless I have been in deep space longer than safety parameters advise. That is certainly not applicable here."

Yet I felt it. Perhaps this was the odd sense of foreboding the terries working here had felt. I would have to ask Detective Ronnie Camberwell about it.

 Carefully, I backed out of the stone room into the dull red light of Lestrade's late afternoon. I lowered my tail first before it could scrape against the low lintel. Much better. Even in the low light outside, I blinked. I could see well in low light. My race, long ago, had hunted at dawn and dusk.

"So, what do you think?" William Shackspeare (Call me Billy) asked.

"It looked like the images I saw before coming here," I replied truthfully. "They were quite faithful to the real thing."

The sound of a ringing bell came over the radio.

"that is the dinner bell," William Shackspeare (Call Me Billy) announced. He turned quickly and sprinted off in the direction of the barracks. Detective Ronnie Camberwell and Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo went that way earlier. More slowly, I followed the running reporter. I would have to talk to each of these women out of earshot of this nosy terry. Even a phrase like "a Pantheran source" would clearly identify me. My relationship with the Institute was problematic at best, dangerous at worst, and I had a premonition the Empire itself would not like a lot of information about the Landscape of Thorns being widely distributed. They may not be directly involved but what went on in the western spiral arm was of great interest to them. If they had not stopped this operation, they may have wanted it to succeed. And what, I wondered, as I passed through the airlock into the newly erected dome was their interest here.

 
"There you are, Star," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, hurrying toward me. "I was not sure if you would understand what the ringing of the dinner bell meant."

"I did not," I said, "however, William Shackspeare (Call Me Billy) did."

"Oh, silly pussy cat, you can just call him Billy or Billy Shackspeare."

"I can?"

"Yes, you can, the same way I told you to call me Ronnie -- no detective, no Camberwell, Ronnie. I cannot even tell you to call me simply Ronnie because then you would always say Simply Ronnie." We
"Names are so confusing," I said. "Numbers are better."

"but you said your number is quite long."

"It is. I will call you Detective Ronnie Camberwell because I am proud of you."

"Come with me," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Gyllie wants to talk with us and learn what we have found out so far."

"Me, too," billy Shackspeare said, falling into step with us.

"You," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, when she saw the journalist with us, "are not invited to this conference."

"Freedom of the press," Billy Shackspeare said.

"Military matters," Captive Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Deep background," Billy Shackspeare said.

"I will revoke your credentials if you do not get out of here," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

Billy Shackspeare  left quickly.

We sat at a small table in what looked to be Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo's office. We were not eating in the dining room.

"What have you got for me?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

Detective Ronnie Camberwell spoke first. "I went through Emily Dickinson's room. I know you looked there already, but, after speaking with the people who spoke to or saw him last, it seemed the only place to find any answers. All his personal possessions seem to be there. He did not pack for a trip. His wrist set is gone. that is not surprising. The only thing odd is a pair of shoes, that is, There is only one shoe. The left shoe is missing. I cannot tell how many pairs of shoes he brought with him."

"A lot," I said. "Emily Dickinson loves shoes."

"that is right," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Eberhart has always loved shoes and boots," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I wonder what the missing shoe means."

"I do not know," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "I do not know if it means anything."

"And you, Star?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"In the data you gave us back on Hypatia," I said, "you had pictures of the little rooms -- the ones with the writing and the star charts."

"Yes," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "they are accurate."

"Yes, they are," I said, "but they are not complete."

"Not complete? What do you mean?" captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo frowned. "I checked them myself."

"They did not include either the floor or the ceiling," I said.

"there is nothing on the floor," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said slowly.
?"
"but there are swirls in the ceiling," I said.

"is not that the natural rock?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"All the other rock I have seen associated with this site is smooth except where it is carved," I said. "The ceiling has a swirly pattern."

"Okay," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Do you have any conclusion to draw from the pattern?"

"When I looked at it," I said, "I heard a voice say, in my own language, 'This is not a place of honor. No great deed is commemorated here. This. This is a place of great danger. Leave this place immediately.'"

"And you heard this?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. She sounds quite astonished.

"Yes," I said. "I also felt very cold and very uneasy."

"Lots of us have felt uneasy here," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "People have described it as a sense of foreboding. Eberhart felt it very strongly. But he did not tell me of any voices. He does not know Pantheran."

"I think he would have commented on it," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "would not he have made a crack about yowling?"

"Yes, he would," I said. "It is one of his favorite things to say whenever he hears my language. It does not sound like yowling to me. it sounds perfectly sensible speech to me."

"Well, it would, since you can understand it," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo was thoughtful. "I have heard Pantheran, of course. Is it higher or lower than human speech -- I mean the frequency."

"My voice is higher," I said. "All androgen voices are higher. Gendered members of the Race have much lower voices."

"Why is that?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"I do not know," I said. "They just are."

"Is it possible," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked, "that you heard the voice because you can hear the voice? I will send technicians in to see if there are sound waves emanating from the ceiling. Humans may just not be able to hear the sound."

07/11/2010 13:42:13 
"About William, correction, Billy Shackspeare?"

"He is a journalist," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"That is what he told me," I said.

"He will ask you questions to get information about what we are doing here," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "He will publish that information for anyone in the galaxy to read. I want to limit the amount and type of information he publishes."

"Why?" I asked. Sometimes the simplest questions are the best.

"Because I do not know who's watching. The  fact that you heard a voice disturbs me. There could be a Pantheran connection here. The Coalition hierarchy and the Solar League are not getting along well right now and of course you know the Consortium does not work with the Coalition at all. The Conclave of Beings is allowing the Solar League to work with us, but who knows for how long. I am very aware, Star, that the Pantheran military can show up at any time and shut us down."

That was true. Our war carriers were technically under the jurisdiction of the Conclave of Beings, but the Empire would have no qualms about sending a military force here. The Empire did not let an organization like the Conclave of Beings interfere with its own interest.

I shivered.

"Are you cold, Star?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"No," I said. "I do not want the military coming here. They were not interested in me in the Richard Whicher matter, but I already know something here that they might not want me to know."

"What?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. Her tone was urgent.

"That Star heard something in the room," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Star has every reason to be afraid, Ronnie. That was a shiver of fear."

"What are you afraid of, darling?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"Termination," I said, using the Race's euphemism for execution. "Unwanted androgens are terminated, put to death. I am already unwanted. My identification number has been terminated. Because of some negotiations by my friend Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo, I was officially terminated. So long as I do not enter the Coalition, they have left me alone. But if they come here -- "

"They will not stand a chance," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"We have your back," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo agreed.

I was not comforted. This encampment would be  powerless against even a single military vehicle.

"They cannot know I am here," I said. "Billy Shackspeare must be stopped."

"We are keeping communications to a minimum," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "we are a long way from either the Northern Frontier or the Solar League."

"Christabel is monitoring now," I reported. "I also have a very low level blanket over this area."

"you are jamming my signal?" Captain Gyllian Romeres said sharply.

"Yes," I said. "It is in my interest."

We stared at each other for a time.

"Very well," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo finally said. "I invited you here for your expertise, not to put your life in danger."

"Thank you," I said.

Detective Ronnie Camberwell and I did not stay very long after that. We had donned our environmental suits and were making our way back to the Owl and the Pussy Cat. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo had offered us housing in the barracks but we had declined. Our ride was much more comfortable and better suited for my care.

"We do not have to stay," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "If you think your life is in danger, we can return to the Pharaoh Star system."

"And abandon Emily Dickinson?" I asked.

"He is that important to you?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

This was a good question. I told her so. Why did I want to stay here? Christabel offered to do a data search.

"No," I told her. "I need to think this through."

"I need to think this through," I said to Detective Ronnie Camberwell.

"Do you need a sounding board?" she asked.

"What is a sounding board?" I asked, searching in my mind for an explanation.

"Someone to talk to, to help you make sense of a situation or feeling," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "I cannot promise to be objective. I can try to listen with an open mind."

"OK," I said, not knowing what else to say.

It was wonderful to be inside the "Owl and the Pussy Cat again. It smelled right. The temperature was comfortable, a little cooler than I liked, but the temperature Detective Ronnie Camberwell and I had agreed upon. The filtration system was set to high to scrub the air of what Detective Ronnie Camberwell called "the smell of cat." We curled up together on the floor of the ride's lounge.

"About Emily Dickinson," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "You have had a rather tumultuous relationship with him."
"Not entirely," I said.

"Enlighten me, darling."

"It was a very good sexual relationship," I said "until I took my memories and posted them on my pornographic web site for download by other androgens."

"You did what?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell sat up.

I raised a placating paw. "Fear not," I said. "I do not upload personal files anymore."

"It does seem to be a reason to break up," she said. "He must have been really pissed at you."

"Firstly," I said, "they are only available to androgens. No one else would be interested."

"Can you be certain of that? There are a lot of perverted beings in this galaxy."

"They are coded so that only androgen/AI pairs can utilize. Besides, I use Fungusian security on that site."

"that is about as safe as Coalition security files," Detective Ronnie Camberwell agreed. 

"More secure," I said confidently. Besides, Detective Ronnie Camberwell did not know of the Empire's archives. I was not sure the Fungusian Network could get into them.

"do not be," Christabel murmured.

Well, that was certainly interesting, but it might have simply been Fungusian misdirection.

"Anyway," I said, "Emily Dickinson was more mad that I did not share any of the profits. The programs are extremely popular."

"You did not share the profits?"

"Of course not. It was my idea and my memories, not his."

"Of course, your AI extrapolated what they might be," Christabel said.

"Quiet," I said.

"To Detective Ronnie Camberwell I said, "I did ask him to help me with an investigation and he almost died. He was poisoned and I had to rush him to the Aesculapius Medical Center. When he recovered, he helped me sort everything out -- that was with Fani and Conntessa Aida and those people."

"And there was the Library of the Mind," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Yes," I said. "So we have been through a lot together."

"But basically only on Hypatia. It had nothing to do with human politics or the Conclave of Beings."

"Or the Empire," I added mentally.

"How does that change anything?" I asked.

"we are from Hypatia," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, stretching out on the thick quilted rug, letting the warmed fabric caress her back. I noticed her muscles. Detective Ronnie Camberwell worked out every day. Her body was thin and hard. Emily Dickinson had observed that she had no curves and was flat chested. I was very pleased with her body.

"You came to Hypatia to be out of reach of the Institute for Androgen Studies and the Coalition. You thought the Northern Frontier was too close to Coalition influence. Your work takes you further outside the Coalition and to the Southern Frontier.

"My parents were brought to Hypatia by the Board of Directors to maintain order in Ptolemy City. They were glad to leave the Solar League and the restrictions the Conclave of Beings imposed on human self-governing. I have never had a desire to live or work anywhere else. Hypatia is my home. Its independence from the Coalition is very comfortable for me.

"Now I find myself reporting to an official in the Ministry of Defense of the Consortium, beleaguered by a Solar League reporter and in danger of coming to the attention of the powers that be in the highest levels of the Coalition."

"Do you want to leave, darling?" I asked. 

"I want to be sure I want to stay given the high stakes of this mission," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "I want you to be certain what you are doing here."

"How is this a sounding board for me?" I asked.

"Oh, it is been more of a sounding board for me, darling. I am sorry. I did not give you a chance to speak."

I lay, for a while, curled up, thinking, watching Christabel's data search stream down my left eye. Detective Ronnie Camberwell waited quietly.

"I am here for Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo," I said finally. "She asked me to come. I think she needs my help. She has helped me in the past. In fact, she saved my life. I help the Consortium when I can. I get paid for it. I will be clear. It is profitable, but it is also the place that took me in when I had no place to go and Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and Tamara became my friends. I did not know what friends were back then. I did not know I needed them and they needed me. This is about friendship, Ronnie. I have to stay even though it frightens me."

That was a long speech for me. I talk all the time to Christabel, but I do not talk this much to terries.

"So you want to stay," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"I am also very curious," I said, "what is going on here."

"Ah, There is that," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "I want to know what is going on, too and where Emily Dickinson went and why. I am, after all, a detective."

"And a good one," I said.

"And a damn good one," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

She laughed. She reached for me. "You are a silly pussy cat, you know," she said. I knew then we would make love. I knew also I could leave it to her and to Christabel to prepare me for it. I knew what I could do for her, too. I will not say more since Detective Ronnie Camberwell values her privacy and I have promised her not to report on our sexual activities.

08/11/2010 20:28:52 

Chapter Six
In Which I Enter the Underground Storage Facility

Over breakfast I said to Detective Ronnie Camberwell, "Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo has already sent the technicians to measure the sound wave emissions in the Visitor's Center Room."

"The what?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"That is what  the scientists  are calling the room where I heard the voice," I said. 

"Weird," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"They went to the Visitor's Center Room and measured."

"And," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"And nothing," I said. "There were no sound waves at all. They measured from very low to very high -- I could give you the frequencies -- "

"Never mind. It would mean nothing to me."

"They found nothing," I said again. We received-the transmission as radio waves."

"But the technicians found no sound and no source for the sound in the Visitor's Center," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Does that about sum it up?"

"It does," Christabel said. "It is possible the radio waves had a source other than the Visitor's Center Room in which we were present or the message simulated radio waves. We need answers to three questions:

1. What triggers the message to be sent?
2. How is the message sent?
3. From where is the message sent?"

"4.," I said, "who sent the message and 5. why did I hear it in my language? Did you hear it in my language, Christabel."

"Negative," my AI said. "It was a Fungusian quantum stream."

"OK," I said, "that information would have been helpful earlier. The receiver hears it in its own language."

"But the humans have not heard it," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Because the system did not take humans into account when it was designed?" I speculated.

"That is an acceptable working hypothesis," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"But it does not take into account how our languages have changed over time," Christabel said. "I received The latest build of the Fungusian quantum stream  when we entered the Holmes-Watson Star System."

"It gets curiouser and curiouser," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, "but I think we are on to something that your races are older than the human race."

She tapped a text into her wrist set.

"Gyllie asks if you are planning to go into the storage area? SHe is wondering if there are any more messages that you will be able to hear."

"I suppose that is why I came," I said, "to investigate this facility."

"Do you want company?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. "I might as well check the area out myself since I cannot imagine where else to look for Emily Dickinson. He cannot be anywhere else on the planet."

"Why not?" I asked.

"How would he survive?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"He could be underground," I said. "He could be in an environmental suit elsewhere on the surface. He could be dead and his body dumped anywhere -- on top of a mountain maybe or at one of the poles."

Detective Ronnie Camberwell stared at me.

"you are serious, are not you?"

"Why would I not be serious," I said. "Are we certain this is the only facility on the planet? Have complete scans been done?"

"Negative," Christabel said. "This facility was located and all efforts have been directed in investigating the Landscape of Thorns."

"Relay all this to Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo," I said.

"Already done," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "She says the scans are already part of their plan but they are short-staffed and There is a lot to do here

"My transmission could have come from somewhere else here on the planet, I grumbled. 

"Can our ship do the scanning?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"My ride is a courier," I said, an edge in my voice. "It is designed to take valuable items from one place to another place very, very quickly. This is not a survey vehicle."
"I just asked," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "You do not have to get all huffy at me."

Well, I had puffed up. My tail was swishing. I did not hiss or spit.

"I am designed to run hard and fast," I said. "Survey work would be very slow and tedious. It is a very different skill set."

We stared at each other.

"I am sorry, Star," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "I said 'our ship' and The Owl and the Pussy Cat is your ride."

"Yes, it is," I said, "though we do call it the Owl and the Pussy Cat. I do forget that you are not familiar with how my design influences what I do and how I do it. To answer your question more properly, the owl and the Pussy Cat is not fitted with all the sensor equipment necessary to do a planet scan. The sensors are for navigation in normal space, locating insertion and extraction points, and ensuring we do not run into anything."

"I think I understand now," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "A regular ground car would not be able to do scientific work."

I wanted to object, that comparing my ride to an ordinary ground car was insulting, but Christabel reminded me Detective Ronnie Camberwell meant no disrespect.

"OK," I said. "We need to get ready to go into the storage area."

09/11/2010 19:31:44 

Chapter Seven
In Which I Go Underground and Go After Billy Shackspeare

I was back in my environmental suit with Detective Ronnie Camberwell beside me. We were at the entrance to the underground storage area. Whoever had established the encampment had constructed a modern self-contained  bounce tube with airlocks at the top and bottom. One Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo would meet us when we went through the airlock.

The light over the airlock door turned green and Detective Ronnie Camberwell activated the lock. We walked inside and waited for the enclosed space to fill with air and the light on the second door to turn from red to green. Again we stepped through and onto  a column of air witch allowed us to stand solidly while lowering us into the ground.
 

"I do not like going underground," Detective Ronnie Camberwell confided. "I worry about cave ins."

"It does not seem any different to me than being on a space station," I said.

"You were born on a space station," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"You were born on a planet with a poisonous atmosphere," I said. "You always depend on a domed space. I do not see a whole lot of difference."

"You would not," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. 

We repeated the airlock at the bottom of the tube in reverse, waiting for the light to turn green to let us step into the hallway where the storage area began.

"According t?" I asked.

"We do not know," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "There is nothing in them at the moment. They are just empty rooms."

"Maybe they are unused storage areas," I suggested.

"The scientists do not think so," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

I knew all of this. Christabel had the same reports Detective Ronnie Camberwell had read. Christabel arranged the information in my brain so that I just knew all of this without learning it.

I stepped through.

Lights flashed, strobe lights which hurt my eyes. Alarms clanged, hurting my ears. "Warning! Warning! This is not a place of honor. This place does not commemorate great deeds. This is a place of great danger. Go back! Go back!" The message repeated over and over again. The lights grew brighter. The strobe flashed quicker. The alarms clanged louder and the voice grew louder, too. I could not retreat back into the airlock. I could not find the button to press to begin its cycling from a state of full to empty so I could pass through it. I collapsed to the floor and passed out.

I awoke in my acceleration web inside the Owl and the Pussy Cat. Detective Ronnie Camberwell and Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo were leaning over me.

"Star," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Christabel says you are awake."

"Yes," I said a bit groggily. "The alarms were so terrible. Why did you not tell me about them?"

"We did not hear or see anything, Star," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Christabel says they were quite intense for you. I am sorry. I would not have asked you to go down there if I knew this would happen. The fact that it did happen means you  trigger the alarm while we do not."

"Yes," I said.

"How are you feeling?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. She is always solicitous of me.

"I am still very weak," I said. I had not opened my eyes. I had not moved. It seemed all too much effort. "I still need to rest," I said, finally absorbing my bio status line."

"OK," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Christabel has linked with me. I will know when you wake up again."

I did not go back to sleep immediately. Christabel decided not to overtly sedate me. The quantum stream she received in the underground hallway were identical to the warnings I received. The creators of this place knew about the Race and they knew about Fungusians but they did not know about terries.

"Then why," I asked Christabel, "can I not read any of the writing in the Visitor's Center Room?"

"Unknown," Christabel said. "I sent images to the Fungusian Network for analysis. Perhaps they can identify the writing. They are unfamiliar with this location."

Well, that was something. It was a negative something. the Fungusian Network had not said, "Oh yes, we know this site. The such and such race developed it twenty thousand years ago. Here are the specifications."

"You are being cynical," Christabel chided.

"No," I said. "It is more that the Fungusian Network volunteer very little but know a great deal. Only sometimes do they share with me what they know."

"As outsiders go," Christabel said, "they share quite a bit with you. They like you."

"I wonder," I said idly, "if the Featherote know anything."

"When they can be safely contacted," Christabel said, "I will ask them."

The Featherote Charm straddled the border of Coalition space. Routing a message to them was tricky since we wanted to avoid our message being intercepted by the Coalition.

I slept.

Some time later, Detective Ronnie Camberwell burst into the Owl and the Pussy Cat.

"Billy Shackspeare's gone," she called.

"Gone?" I echoed. I was still lounging in my acceleration web, still feeling too lazy to climb out of it.

"Yes. Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "He was missing at the head count at dinner this evening. One of the shuttles is gone, too."

"He could not have gone far in a shuttle," I said.

"Far enough to be able to send a message," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Gyllie thinks he wanted to get outside you jamming field."

Not good. My underground must be a big story to Billy Shackspeare, so big he would risk stealing a shuttle craft. 

"Gyllie cannot track him. She sent me here to ask if you could."

"Not from here," I said. "Does she want me to go after him?"

"Gyllie," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said into her wrist unit. "Star wants to know what you want him to do."

A pause.

"Yes, I think she is able to lift."

"Christabel," I said, not speaking aloud. "Contact Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo directly.

"Hi Star," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Sorry to bother you." We had a three-way, four-way if you include Christabel, conversation established.

"I need that reporter tracked down. He is a loose cannon. he will cause all kinds of problems for us if we do not stop him."

Christabel sent out her own warnings on one of my eye displays.

"Too late," I said. "Two military vehicles just broke through into normal space. They are broadcasting on all frequencies."

"Two Pantheran warships?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"Yes," I said.

"I am not getting a transmission here."

"Putting it through now," I said.

"Cease and desist all operations. Prepare for departure. This site is closed. By order of the Conclave of Beings this site is off limits to all Coalition scantest. We are prepared to use force if necessary."

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo swore. "Star, tell them we will comply but that we need time to decamp."

I relayed the information.

"With your permission," I said, "I would like to leave as soon as possible."

"Understood. Could you find Billy Shackspeare for me?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked. "You do not have to speak with him, just tell me where he is."

I hissed softly.

"I know. I know." Captain Gyllian Romeres said. "You would like to blow him out of the sky."

"If I can spot him on my way out of the Holmes-Watson Star System," I said, "I will relay that information to you."

"That is acceptable," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

Detective Ronnie Camberwell strapped in. Christabel prepared me for lift. The ramp retracted and the tarmac cleared, we left the Lestrade quickly, circling the planet to put it between us and the military vehicles. They were quite a distance away. There was no sign of Billy Shackspeare. I sent Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo a final message, slid around Watson, circled Sherlock and found an obscure insertion point and dropped into hyperspace. The military vehicles took no notice of me, at least, they did not break off their approach to Lestrade or send me a message. I hoped it meant they were indifferent to my presence on Lestrade or my departure. Even so, I was uneasy at such close proximity.

"Now where?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked, "Home?"

"Negative," I said. "We need to rendezvous with Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo."

"Where?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"We are headed for the Northern Frontier," I said.

"Is that safe for you?"

"Safe enough," I said. "We are employed by the Consortium at the moment with an assignment to go to the Featherote Charm -- one of the planets on the Northern Frontier, of course."

"And that would be?"

"Trill," I said. "All their planets are called Trill."

"How do they keep them straight?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"I think it is how they trill it," I said. "This particular Trill is in the Flapping Yellow Bird Star System -- only a terry approximation of its name, I am sure."

10/11/2010 11:18:18 

Chapter Eight
Running in the Silent

Members of the Race call is Mother Space. Terries call it the Silent because There is no communications which can be sent or received in hyperspace. They call it "running silent" when they traverse hyperspace.

In earlier times, some thought going into hyperspace would be an instant movement from here to there. In reality, hyperspace is vast. Some now think it is much larger than normal space by a factor of one thousand or even ten thousand, maybe more. I am engineered to be at home in space, comfortable in an acceleration web for very long periods of time and to be able to detect where a ride can enter or leave hyperspace. Most races require careful charts to do this. I have all the charts. I subscribe to a service to keep Christabel's databases current. I can, when needed, find our own insertion and extraction points. Sometimes I do it to relieve boredom or to keep my skills in tiptop shape.

When we left the Holmes-Watson Star System, I chose the insertion point myself to make it that much more difficult for the Coalition military vehicles to follow me. With a good star runner at the controls, they could follow me, but the star runner would have to be good. I am one of the best. I am not boasting when I say this. It is a fact. Had I been created during the age of exploration, my exploits would be well-known and celebrated. But I was not created then so they are not.

"You never received a message from Gyllie where to meet her," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said when Christabel finally allowed her to unstrap from her acceleration station.

"It was a prearranged location," I said. "It was included in our original packet -- where to meet up if we had to leave Landscape of Thorns in a hurry."

"You anticipated trouble then," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"We always anticipate trouble," I said. 

"Who do you think is behind the Conclave's takeover?"

I was silent for a little bit, thinking what to say. Finally I said, "The Race takes a dim view of humans going out on their own," I said. You can just look at the Northern Frontier to get a sense of that. So far, the terries are holding their own. I think The Race is not particularly bothered by the worlds in that part of space. The Sacred Worlds are too concerned about theology. Queensland and the Republic of Space are closed societies. The Consortium gets bogged down in its own internal politics. There is no real threat to their hegemony in the western spiral arm."

"And the Fungusian Network and the Featherote Charm?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. "They seem to be independent of the Conclave."

"The Race needs something from each of them," I said. "The AIs the androgens use are based on Fungusian designs. The Featherote produce the star drives. I do not know the history of these three races, but long ago they established an understanding among themselves. It is an uneasy truce."

"So the Pantherans get AI and star drive technology," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "What do the Fungusian Network and the Featherote get out of the suspension of hostilities?"

"Independence," I said.

"But the Featherote are a part of the Conclave, are not they?"

"They are observers only," I said. "They do not vote."

 "But the Fungusian Network do not."

"the Fungusian Network are telepaths," I said. "They make everyone nervous though I have found them quite congenial."

"Your PSY index is  very amenable to the Fungusian Network," Christabel said. "You are not only easily read, you are open to a PSY-link."

"That does not sound like a compliment," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"On the contrary," Christabel said. the Fungusian Network take pleasure in the psy-link. the Fungusian Network find Captain Star Runner and its relationship to its AI fascinating. They enjoy constructing AIs for it and deciding what to include in the databases. They also enjoy reviewing what has been added to its databases."

"Your databases are not private?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"They cannot be," I said. "They provide my backup service. It is the best in the western spiral arm. Their service is timely and efficient. They store my backups in their own data link so  of course they know everything. They are fungi. They study mammalian sexual behavior, for example, but they really do not find it pleasurable."

"I will have to think about that," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"At first you were uneasy about our relationship," I said. "I think it is more so for you with the Fungusian Network. No harm will come of it."

"If you say so."

"I do."

"For a being with no gender," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, "we certainly have a lot of ?"

 

"It has been said that an androgen's preoccupation with sex is because it cannot directly participate in it," I said. "Others have speculated that this preoccupation is intentional. It diverts androgens attention from fear of termination, dominance of the gendered members of the Race and rebellion against the gendered members of the Race. They are quite a minority."

"And this is acceptable

I was tired of defending the Race's point of view. "We are who we are," I said. We run -- " I almost said Empire but stopped in time. "Everything," I finished. "If we did not do everything, there would be no Race. That is our function."

I knew saying we pleased the Mother-Of-Us-All would not be an explanation Detective Ronnie Camberwell would accept but it is the truth.

We were a long way from the Northern Frontier. I chartered a hyperspace route which skirted the regular Coalition routes for both commercial and military vehicles. Life inside the Owl and the Pussy Cat settled down into a comfortable routine. Two days out from the Featherote Charm Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, "I have never met a Featherote."

"An individual is called a Feathera," I said. 

"OK, I have never met a Feathera," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Terries, that is, humans think of hem as birds," I said. "they are quite tall and quite thin. Their bones are hollow. Their bodies are covered with feathers. Their speech is quite high and sounds like birds singing -- or so I am told."

"Do they have wings?"

"Oh yes. They can fly witch makes getting around a bit tricky. They fly from level to level."

"Then how to do you move from level to level?"

"They have bounce tubes," I said. "Elderly Featherote have trouble flying after a while and of course the young do not fly or fly far. Besides, There is freight to move."

"So you are been to the Featherote Charm before?"

"Yes," I said. "When I was at the Institute, I ran several vehicles to the Featherote Charm. My first assignment was on a vehicle which brought assigned to the Star Drive Command. I was a very junior member of the test team. I got to work directly with a number of Featherote."

"So they know you," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"I went to them when I was declared surplus," I said. "They gave me work and showed me how to set myself up in business. They made contact with the Fungusian Network so that I could have my own AI. The Featherote Charm held the note on my first space vehicle. They have been very supportive."

"What do you do for the Charm?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. "That kind of help is never free."

"I do business with them," I said. "I never turn down a contract. I have a Charm discount though I still make some money on every job. I give them priority."

"Have you worked for them recently?"

"Yes," I said.

"Do you want to tell me anything else?"

"You have a complicated relationship with pirates," I said.

"I accept I live and work on a world which has pirates of many kinds," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Piracy is big business on Hypatia."

"OK," I said. "The Coalition controls star drives. The Featherote Charm has found ways to get around their controls."

"So you move star drives around?"

"Oh, no," I said. "This vehicle is way too small for that. I carry data and needed parts. I get the rush jobs or the very dangerous jobs."

"You scare me when you say things like that," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"I work in a dangerous business," I said. "Right now, we are on a very dangerous assignment together."

"You have not said much about that while we have been in the Silent," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"I know some things," I said. "I have questions about others."

"Tell me."

"Well, here is the thing," I said. "I do not know what the Featherote interest is in the Landscape of Thorns. They may be acting for the Fungusian Network. Although the Featherote Charm encouraged me to work with Terries on the Northern Frontier, they view humans as unreliable, volatile. They  mistrust   Terry motives."

"What have we ever done to them?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. She sounded annoyed. Perhaps it was my falling into the habit of calling her race Terries. Perhaps it was the Featherote mistrust of her race.

"The relationship between my Race, the Fungusian Network and the Featherote is a long-standing one," I said. "Humans disrupt the status quo."

"The older races are disturbed by the younger ones."

"That is correct," I said.

"So why is Gyllie meeting us in their space?"

"Because the Featherote want to know what is going on," I said. "We are also meeting there because it is the Conclave who evicted us."

"I see."

I was not certain that she did. This was a very high stakes game Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo had involved us in. There was no going back, no cutting and running. There was literally no place to run and no place to hide. Detective Ronnie Camberwell and I had to go forward. I just hoped Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo would explain all this to Detective Ronnie Camberwell. I was certainly making a mess of it.

11/11/2010 10:35:40 

I paced the lounge as we approached the conventional extraction point for the Flapping Yellow Bird Star System. The Owl and the Pussy Cat would enter normal space on the Northern Frontier. Was there any risk of encountering military vehicles from the Conclave of Beings. Was I being paranoid or just careful?

Detective Ronnie Camberwell was doing her daily exercise routine. Normally I would have enjoyed watching her, appreciating her muscles, smelling her perspiration, hearing her pant with exertion. I particularly liked her abbreviated costume. It is not an erotic desire which prompts me to see her with little or no clothing. It is quite desirable to see her body, to see the soft hair which covers it, to see her as she sees me.

Absorbed in my own dilemma, I did not respond immediately to her question.

"Again?" I asked.

"Normally, I like watching you move," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, sitting on her exercise mat. I like watching your muscles ripple under your fur, the way you hold your tail. You are so graceful and lithe when you move. You always look like you are light as a feather, like you are dancing. I just plod along. 

So, we watched each other's body, drawing pleasure from its movement, its conditioning, its alien grace. Should we make love? I rejected this possible avenue of investigation. Detective Ronnie Camberwell did not like the introduction of sex when she was asking a serious question. 

"I am considering our extraction point, whether it is safe to come into the Flapping Yellow Bird Star System at this place."

"Why would not it be safe?"

"That is the question."

"You think the military ships will be waiting to detain us? Why?"

"They would detain us," I said, "if they thought you or I knew something or that we could learn something."

"Like what? And why is it so important that we do not learn whatever it is. you are suggesting the Conclave knows something about the Landscape of Thorns they are not telling us. Why would they do that?"

Oh, my nave smart detective. Living on Hypatia, outside of the Coalition, has made you unaware of the machinations of power and intrigue. But then, I was once so naive. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and Emily Dickinson thought I continue to be naive about many things. Was Detective Ronnie Camberwell even more naive than I?

"I think," I said, "the Conclave of Beings, that is, the leadership, the Secretary General's office perhaps, knows more than it has told the Solar League. I do not know why it is withholding this information, I just think There is more information." Then I had an idea. No, it was Christabel, pushing a possibility to the forefront of my cognitive awareness. "Perhaps the Featherote Charm has this information, too. Perhaps they will share it with us."

"There must be a motive behind all this secrecy if you are right about more information," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, "why the older races are withholding data from the younger ones."

"It is an old galaxy," I said."

"Not really," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Well, maybe not compared with other galaxies," I said, "but compared to terry -- human -- existence."

"Why do you insist on calling us terries?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"You call us cats," I said.

"I do not," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

She was right. "I am sorry," I said, "it is a bad habit of mine. 

11/15/2010 14:32:47

Chapter Nine
In Which We Meet Up with Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and My Old Friend High Flying Chitter Robinson

The Featherote either choose planets which are congenial to birdlike creatures or they spend a great amount of effort making them so.

Trill in the Flapping Yellow Bird Star System is no exception. The habitat our instructions directed us to was the same luxurious green that I encountered when I first traveled to a Featherote world. We landed at the spaceport and then engaged a flitter to bring us to the restaurant. Although Featherote fly, they still employ streets for wheeled vehicles and often prefer flitter transportation to simple flying. The airways, as they call them, have special lanes for individual fliers.

The restaurant was a garden. In deference to us, we found Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and High Flying Chitter Robinson at a small table under a very large leafy green tree.

"How beautiful," Detective Ronnie Camberwell exclaimed.

"thank you, my dear," High Flying Chitter Robinson said, rising and bowing.

As his name suggests, High Flying Chitter Robinson is red-breasted, tall, with elegant head feathers which are erect. He wears a head dress of bright colors, woven into the feathers. As Featherote headdresses change, I assume they are taken off and are not worn continually though I do not know for sure.

"And how are you, my furry friend?" High Flying Chitter Robinson asked, turning to me. "I see you have had your usual effect on some of the other diners."

As I entered the garden restaurant, some of its customers rose higher in the trees or fluttered away from my path from the gate to our table. I am never sure if this is because I am a member of the Race, the ancient enemy of the Featherote, or because, like Terries, I remind the Featherote of a cat. Some have suggested the history of the western spiral arm would be very different if the Race encountered a dog like Race, but that is a silly speculation.

"I am well," I said to High Flying Chitter Robinson.

"Your Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo has been telling me about your unique experiences at the Landscape of Thorns," High Flying Chitter Robinson said, repositioning himself on his branchlike seat.

We ordered from the portable menu placed on our table. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo recommended a drink to Detective Ronnie Camberwell. I chose my favorite seed sweet.

"And High Flying Robinson has been telling me what his company historian knows about the ancient times," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Did you know -- "

Before she could finish, High Flying Chitter Robinson fell backwards off his perch.

"Get down," I said, racing to pull Detective Ronnie Camberwell down beside me.

The zip, zip, zip of automatic weapons slashed the air right through where we were sitting. Captain Gyllian  Romeres Lujo crawled over to High Flying Chitter Robinson. "He is dead," she said.

More fire. I could not see where the fire was coming from.

"They must be using the trees for cover," Christabel said. "I knew she had alerted me to the weapons fire. My reaction time was just too precise for it to be anything else.

"My leg," Detective Ronnie Camberwell gasped. "I cannot get up."

"Hold onto me," I said. "We need to get out of here."

Still within the protection of the trees, Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo positioned Detective Ronnie Camberwell on my back. "Can you walk, Star?" she asked. "Yes," I said, "though not as fast as I normally would. We need to get her to the Owl and the Pussy Cat."

"That may prove difficult," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"let us get to the street and get a flitter," I said.

"They can track it."

"Christabel can jam them temporarily," I said. "Help me."

Holding Detective Ronnie Camberwell's body along my spine and with my lover's arms wrapped around my neck, I ran as fast as I could toward the back exit of the restaurant. More fire. We ducked. I went to my belly, slinking along. It pays to be descended from hunters. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo was running in a crouched position. It did not look comfortable at all.

She secured a flitter. We climbed in and it rose to  a normal cruising height. It bucked and rolled, trying to go another way than the spaceport. Christabel kept overriding its directional beam.

We could see our pursuers now -- two members of the Race, running on the ground.

"You were right to be paranoid," Detective Ronnie Camberwell panted. "I thought you were overreacting."


"Stay still and be quiet," I said. "We are almost to the ride."

Christabel took the flitter right up to the Owl and the Pussy Cat's entry ramp. She positioned its door right up against the entrance of the ride. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and I wrestled Detective Ronnie Camberwell into the foyer, dismissed the flitter, and locked up tight. Christabel was preparing for lift as we considered how to move Detective Ronnie Camberwell up to the lair.

"we are lifting," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Yes," I said. "I thought it best not to wait for permission or for company. I do not know if I can outrun out pursuers."

"Time will tell," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Have Christabel patch me through to my ship."

"Done," I said.

"Harding," Captain Gyllian Romeres addressed a subordinate, "status."

"There is a Pantheran military cat here requesting your presence," the subordinate named Harding reported.

"I am otherwise engaged," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo told him. "File a protest. Make a fuss. I will catch up with you when I can. Proceed to headquarters as soon as possible."

I thought for a moment Harding would argue, then he said, "Yes, ma'am."

We got Detective Ronnie Camberwell strapped down, then strapped ourselves in. With its personnel scattered, the military vehicle I was expecting on our tail did not materialize immediately. I increased the G forces as much as I could as we streaked away from Trill.

"Here they come," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said unnecessarily.

"I see them," I said.

Two vehicles. I needed to get into hyperspace and lose them -- now. Was there an insertion point nearby. I would not be able to keep ahead of them and reach the standard insertion point. Now would be a good time to prove I was masterful at this. Could the runners in those two other vehicles follow me?

I was far enough ahead of them to put a moon between us. Still scanning. There. We slid into it just as the first ride was coming around the edge of the moon.

"We are in," I said. "Please take care of Detective Ronnie Camberwell while I fly."

obediently, Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo unstrapped from the chair beside me. The G-forces were normal again. She left the so-called bridge and went into one of the sleeping chambers where we had secured Detective Ronnie Camberwell.

"Analysis," I said to Christabel.

"The ride is undamaged," Christabel reported. "We are not being pursued as far as sensors can determine. Position assessed. A heading can be inputted at this time."

"Three Ravens," I said.

it was the only port of call I could think might be safe.

"Acknowledged,"  Christabel said. The status feed updated.

A while later Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo returned.

"Ronnie is resting comfortably," she said. "No wonder she could not walk. The energy punched right through the bone."

"And the medical robot can affect repair?" I asked.

"I downloaded the human doctor program  you have," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "It went to the supply cabinet, took out the necessary tools and fixed her leg. it has to heal now."

"How long will hat take?" I asked.

"Some time," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "She will not be walking for  a while. Where are we going, by the way?"

"Three Ravens," I said. "I did not know where else to go."

"Your reasoning?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"Those were military members who shot at us," I said. "There was nothing covert about their actions. They killed High Flying Chitter Robinson outright and would have killed us as well. They had access to flitter control. That all sounds very organized to me, as if they had permission to act."

"Go on," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"People in High Flying Chitter Robinson's organization knew we were meeting him there. Who else knew? Members of your crew, me, Detective Ronnie Camberwell, who else?"

"Eberhard knew,"  Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said slowly. "It is possible Billy Shackspeare knew. My crew did not know where I was going on Trill."

"You have a tracker on you," I said.

"No," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I turned it off."

"Perhaps," I said. "They were military."

"True and my wrist set is probably not coalition state of the art. Why did not you go to Grand Central or one of the other Consortium worlds?"

"It seemed too obvious," I said. "Besides, I wanted to go some place not connected with all this. That means the Pharaoh Star System, the Northern Frontier and the Coalition worlds are out. That leaves the Fungusian Network and the Southern Frontier."

"And you did not go to the Fungusians because -- "Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Because There is something going on with the three races," I said. "I think they know."

"Know what?" captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Know what High Flying Chitter Robinson was going to tell us. "He did not finish telling you u what his historian found out, did he?"

"No," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "He was just telling me how every organization has an historian. It is very curious to me that they do."

"They are researchers," I said. "They have access to databases."

"You seem very certain of that," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"I worked in High Flying Chitter Robinson's organization," I said. "I was first assigned there after I graduated from the Institute as a military contractor. When I washed out of the military, I went to him for a regular job. I know a great deal about Featherotes and their organizations."

"Can they be infiltrated, compromised?"

"Easily," I said. "The Featherote are great talkers."

 "So you think someone talked."

"Or was overheard," I said.

"And you think There is something rotten in my organization?"


"I do not know," I said. "Maybe I did not think we would be safe there."

"Or maybe you thought the mission would be scrapped."

"A possibility," I said.

"A very big possibility," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "This is escalating. And you want to know why?"

That was only partially a question.

"I do," I said. "I am also trying to think of a way to ask the Fungusian network for information. I just do not know enough yet to ask the right question."

"HMMM," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "That would be necessary."

"And we do not know where Emily Dickinson is either," I said.

"And that bothers you?"

"It does," I said. "It does for me and I think for you, too."

"It certainly does," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"How long will it take us to get to Three Ravens?"

"A good while," I said. "I am taking the long way round even in hyperspace. That means we could find the military waiting for us when we get there, but I think it is more likely they will not wait there a long time even if they do check it out. I want to be just missing for a while, then go there and see what we can find out. Besides, There is good medical facilities there."

"you are checked that out?"

"I have been there often in the last few months," I said. "I have come to learn the space station better."

Three Ravens was a sprawling space station between star systems, a free port and a place, like Ptolemy City, where many things were legal. Unlike Ptolemy City, Three Ravens was not the playground of the rich and famous. The younger races mixed freely there. Three Ravens was noted for its gambling, its drinking, its prostitution and its drug use. It is said that anyone and everything is for sale at Three Ravens. I wondered if we were for sale, too? Would we be betrayed for drugs or money? I shivered. It was a frightening thought.

"Any more ideas about those alarms?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked after a long silence.

"They are keyed to my genetic signature," I said. "I am certain of that. "Whoever built that place, they knew about members of the Race."

"But they did not affect me," Christabel said. She spoke through the console speaker as well.

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo jumped. "Ah, Christabel," she said. "But would they know about AIs?"

"I have a Fungusian Network signature," Christabel said. "It is a standard which is ancient. My records do not show a date when this signature was instituted. therefore I am free to conclude it is quite ancient."

"Why would you have a signature?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"To identify me as property of the Fungusian Network," Christabel said. "Captain Star Runner only leases the technology. The Fungusian network owns me."

"Do they own all AIs?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"All the AIs the androgens use," Christabel said.

"And the Featherote own the star drives," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Yes," Christabel said.

"And what do the Pantherans own?"

"Everything else," she said.

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo laughed at the old joke.

"Seriously, Christabel."

"They own the star runners, of course," Christabel said. 

"Oh," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo, startled. Then, "Of course. It takes all three of you to make a starship operable."

"Yes," Christabel said.

"So star runners were he first androgens."

"The first, the most creative, the most independent  of all androgens."

"And the Featherote Charm and the Fungusian Network made Star the first totally independent androgen."

"Yes," Christabel said. "It is quite revolutionary -- an experiment really."

"And how is the experiment going?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"We are learning," Christabel said, "how a star runner utilizes another race to compensate for its limitations."

I wanted to growl, but I could not. Christabel was manipulating my responses. This Revelation was amazing. three ancient races were studying me. I was not the free agent I thought I was.

"Star, are you there?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"I am here," I said. "Christabel is dampening my reactions to. I guess they do not want this lab rat to get upset."

"It is not like that," Christabel said.

I tried a mental growl at her. Even that was unsuccessful.

I knew she was flooding my system with a calming, mellowing agent. soon I would be brainwashed to think this was all just fine and dandy.

"No brainwashing," Christabel said. "Your independence is a prerequisite for the experiment."

I thought about this. In an odd way it seemed right. I would have to talk this over with Detective Ronnie Camberwell.

"You look tired, Star," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I will keep an eye on things for a while. Get some sleep."

She was right. My status icons were blinking. The mellowing chemicals were doing their job.

I yawned.

"OK," I said.

Shortly thereafter I was asleep.

11/15/20103 
 23:03:02 

Chapter Ten
A Council of War

We gathered in Detective Ronnie Camberwell's sleeping chamber. She looked pale to me. The medical bot reported her condition stable. It continued to monitor for pain and infection. The medical people on Three Ravens would have to do more when we got there.

"In mystery stories," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "they would characterize this meeting as a Council of War."

"I feel like I have already seen action," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, smiling weakly.

"Indeed you have," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Star has had its encounter with the alarms at the landscape of Thorns."

"That seems so long ago," I said.

"Since we have several more days before we reach Three Ravens, I thought we could talk about what has happened and what we should do next."

"Detective Ronnie Camberwell needs medical attention," I said.

"Agreed," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Star, you think the ancient races know something about the Landscape of Thorns, right?"

"Yes," I said. "Judging from what happened on Trill in the Flapping yellow Bird Star System, the Race wants to keep that information hidden. High Flying Chitter Robinson thought it would be all right to share that information with us. He was killed to stop him from sharing. We were attacked to keep us from finding out."

"Robinson was a pretty high level Feathera, was not he?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"That is why he was called High Flying," I said. "It is a rank."

"And it was two Pantherans who did the shooting," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Special branch," I said. 

"The intelligence branch," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Most definitely," I said.

"How do you know?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. "They just looked like Pantherans to me.

"They were assassins," I said. "Therefore they are Special Branch. Special Branch deals with intelligence."

"Can you tell anything else about them?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"This is a guess," I said, "but I feel rather confident about it. I think they were part of the Royal Guard."

"Royal guard?" The two human women stared at me. "Panthera is not a monarchy."

"A long time ago it was," I said. "the unit is called the Royal Guard. They were assigned to protect the royal family and the palace. Their mission changed over time. Now they protect," I searched for the right word. The answer was empire, but part of my training, so ingrained and probably psi-blocked, was not to share this. Christabel supplied the word "state". "state interests," I said.

"Pantheran interests are always a bit murky," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo observed. 
Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked, a querulous tone in her voice. "Why is it so important to keep us from finding out? We know it is a waste site."

"That must not be what they are protecting," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Maybe," I said, "it is what the waste is from."

We sat for a while, thinking about that. 

11/16/2010 19:23:37 

"You were not impeded in your research until I came," I said. "So it is either my presence or what I have or can find out."

"Your ego amazes me," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "How can this be all about you? High Flying Chitter Robinson is dead. We are in flight. Eberhart is missing. How can all this be about you? We were not interfered with until Billy Shackspeare reported on our activities."

"What did his report actually say?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. "That might give us a clue."

Christabel projected the article on their private screens.

"Where did you get this, Christabel?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"When we were in the Flapping Yellow Bird Star System," Christabel responded. "I had plenty of time to gather information and update my databases."

"Of course," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo murmured, returning to the text.

"Any video?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"No," Christabel said. "Billy Shackspeare sent in his report as text."

"Landscape of Thorns, Lestrade, Holmes-Watson Star System, Eastern Frontier.
Today in a startling display of klaxons, flashing lights and warning messages, the fuchsia-colored Pantheran known as Captain Star Runner collapsed upon entering the underground maze of tunnels of the  Landscape of Thorns. More surprising, only Captain Star Runner heard the alarms, saw the flashing lights and heard  and understood the warning  messages.

Human researchers at the Landscape of Thorns cannot decipher any writing left by the beings who built and stored their hazardous waste materials here. Yet, across twenty millennium, they can speak to Captain Runner.
 
Captain Star Runner was not available for comment after collapsing but was taken to a private spacecraft for treatment.

captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo of the Consortium's Ministry of Defense would not speculate on how Captain Star Runner could perceive these warning messages.

Our readers know of the weird linkage star runners have to their ships' AIs. Is it something in their programming or in their racial memory which allows Captain Star Runner to communicate with the aliens of so long ago? Is it Captain Star Runner's unusual genetic programming? 
Continue to follow this reporter for more news of this alien voice from beyond the grave.

  

"that is a ridiculous story," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "I cannot see how anyone can take it seriously."

"Yet I think someone did," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Does anything in this article suggest what it might be?"

"Well," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, "It does say Star is unique."

"And it does suggest it is genetic programming," I said.

"Perhaps," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "it is the words "racial memory, I think."

"What does that mean?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"I am not sure I believe in racial memory," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "the belief that all beings of a particular race know things. What I think the nervousness is about is the idea either Star in particular or Pantherans in general could be walking around with buried memories which could be triggered. They could become bombs or terrorists or do crazy things."

"But that would result in statements and information about the Institute for Genetic Research," Detective Ronnie Camberwell objected.

"You are suggesting the Pantherans tell the rest of us what goes on at their Institute of Genetic Research?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked. "Ronnie, that is a big dark secret. No outsider gets to the Institute. They do not give tours and invite the public to lectures and to play with the kittens in the nursery."

"So Star does have hidden programming?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. She gave me one of those skittish looks she gave me when we first met.

"Undoubtedly," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Basically, Star's reactions on Lestrade could be more due to programming than anything else. We could not find a source for the clans, the flashing lights or the warning messages. They could have been all in its mind. Christabel, are there any hidden files in Star's brain?"

"Unable to comply with your request for information," Christabel said.

"I rest my case," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

I queried Christabel.

"Of course," Christabel said. "All your biological systems are hidden. All your medical logs are hidden. All you memory files are hidden. Shall I continue with the list of hidden files?"

"Negative," I said. And to Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and Detective Ronnie Camberwell, "I am sorry to disappoint you, but the files which are me or records about me are hidden files."

"So then we do not know if you have so-called hidden programs," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Exactly," I said.

"So this is all a perception problem?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. "This still sounds ridiculous. High Flying Chitter Robinson is dead."

"No, I do not think it is a PR problem," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. I think the suggestion that people are connecting the long ago with the Landscape of Thorns and androgens is the problem. But I can imagine for the life of me what it could be."

The medical bot bustled into the room. "Time to rest," it said to Detective Ronnie Camberwell. And to us, "Please leave the patient to rest."

"I want Star to stay," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. Her tone of voice sounded petulant to me.

I stayed. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo left the sleeping chamber. "I will be in the Lounge," she said.

When the medical bot and Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo left the sleeping chamber and closed the door behind her, I went and sat next to the sleeping couch., pressing my nose against Detective Ronnie Camber-well's hand.

"Oh, Star," she said, "I wish we never got involved with all of this. I just want to go home."

Her response puzzled me. Detective Ronnie Camberwell is a no nonsense, hard woman. Of late she sounded very scared and full of fancies.

As if she could read my mind Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, "I know I am sounding petulant and whiny. I thought I was a big brave city detective. But I am way out of my league. You and Gyllie seem to handle all this shooting and dashing about very calmly. Here we are, in a little ship, in hyperspace days and days away from anything like solid ground."

When it came to comforting anybody, I am always uncertain what Terries will find comforting. What I said was, "Ronnie, darling, this is my natural habitat."

Detective Ronnie Camberwell looked surprised, then thoughtful. "I suppose you are right," she said. "You were designed to be here. The thing is, I am not sure what else you are designed for."

This statement made me very very scared. Did Detective Ronnie Camberwell, born and raised in Ptolemy City, think I was some weird alien? Well, I suppose I am an alien to her, but not weird certainly.

She stroked my ears.

"I know that sounds awful," she said, with a little self-conscious laugh. "I just realize There is so much I do not know about you and your race."

True enough, I thought. There are lots of things about the Race terries do not know and it is the way it is supposed to be. I wondered, as a background process, if this keeping things from terries is what Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo would call a hidden program. 

"I have never heard of an androgen going up like a bomb," I said, "or being controlled like a remote-controlled robot."

"Well, that is comforting," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. She yawned.

"I will go so you may sleep," I said.

"Okay," she said.

When I entered the Lounge, I found Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo sitting at the dining table. She was using Several screens were open above its surface.

"Our Council of War did not go very well," I said.

"No, we keep getting lost in our speculations," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I am making lists of what we need to do when we get to Three Ravens."

"I thought we were going to decide that together," I said. 

"Do you think Ronnie is capable of that?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

My fur went up.

"touchy, are we?"

"We agreed to help you on Lestrade," I said. "If you have not noticed, we are not on Lestrade anymore."

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo turned to look at me. Her hands were clenched. Everything about her body language suggested to me she was angry. I do not read terry body language well.

"that is fair, Star," she finally said. "I asked you to check out the cavern. I asked Ronnie to see if she could figure out what happened to Eberhart. Now we are dashing across the western spiral arm to avoid assassins if they are indeed after us."

"they shot at us," I said, "and they chased us. Someone  interfered with the flitter's controls and we were not given clearance to lift from the planet surface. I would say we have assassins after us."

"I am sorry," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo. "it is not what you signed up for."

"No, it is not," I said.

"When we get to Three Ravens, you can get medical attention for Ronnie and then be on your way."

"On my way?" I asked. "Where would I go?"

"Back to Hypatia, of course."

"I am not certain I can go back to Hypatia," I said.

"Why not?"

"The Royal Guard would have no trouble finding either Detective Ronnie Camberwell or me on Hypatia. It is not safe to go there."

"You think they would track you down?"

"Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo," I said, "have you forgotten? Flapping Yellow Bird Star System is on the Northern Frontier. The Royal Guard crossed the border and went outside Coalition space to eliminate us. That goes against my status as a person of no interest. Apparently, I have become a person of interest again."

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo sighed deeply.

"Where can we go? What can we do?"

"We are going to Three Ravens," I said. "Detective Ronnie Camberwell needs medical attention. The Owl and the Pussy Cat needs supplies. Christabel will have a list of maintenance that needs to be attended to. I will go and see if there are any rumors of what has been going on with the Landscape of horns and if there has been  any Coalition military presence there."

"I will send a discrete message to the Ministry," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Can Christabel send it so it cannot be traced?"

"Not directly," I said. "There are brokers, however. I know some reputable ones."

"OK. I think that is all we can plan to do at the moment. Star, I just wish I knew what happened to Eberhart."

"I think," I said, giving a background thought process more priority, he was kidnapped. He could not have wandered off and be lost in the underground building storage areas.."

"but why and by whom?"

"Unknown," I said. "I have to think some more about this. I shuttled the thought process away to work some more in the background.

"I am sorry I blew up at you," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I feel so frustrated that I do not know what to do."

"We do know what to do," I said. "We each have something to do when we get to Three Ravens. Then we will see what to do next."

"That sounds like Tamara speaking."

"It is," I said, "but I find it very helpful."

"It is," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo agreed. "Have you heard from her recently?"

"Yes." I felt warmer. "She is working on a very interesting archaeological dig -- " I stopped speaking, reviewing her message.

"That is it," I said. "Tamara said she was working on an archaeological dig which is very old, older than the Landscape of Thorns. She said they think it is a civilization which predates the rise of the Race, the Featherote Charm and the Fungusian network."

"And this would be -- "

"The Western Expanse," I said.

"Outside of Coalition space."

"Far outside," I said.

"Give me everything you have on it," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo axe head Tamara's project is and where it is."

"You have it," I said. "Christabel and I will assess the run."

And so we did.

11/17/2010 19:17:40 

Chapter Eleven
Our Time at Three Ravens

Three ravens is a massive structure, anchored in space between the stars. Three wings extrude from one central sphere. Each of these three structures have structures of their own which stick out at all angles. There are the inevitable hydroponic gardens and areas where small animals are raised for food. There are breweries and distilleries, too, industrial structures which produce parts for spacecraft repair, the repair shops themselves, places to receive visiting vehicles, hotels and flophouses, taverns, bars, restaurants, brothels, casinos, chandleries, and many merchants selling wares from all parts of the western spiral arm. In short, Three Ravens is a city where a being can obtain just about anything a being desires. There are also many forms of entertainment: music, dancing, sports arenas. Exactly how the city of Three Ravens is run I have never been able to ascertain. Perhaps it is that anything is legal so far as it is done peaceably. Because of its nature, there are safe areas where anyone may walk without fear and there are areas where beings go armed and watch for assailants. Three Ravens is home to all of the younger races. None of the three older races frequent Three Ravens. My first arrival surprised many and made others uncomfortable. Now I come and go unremarked. 

As a result, we parked the Owl and the Pussy Cat at my accustomed ride park. Its proprietor greeted us courteously and sent for medical assistance promptly. A terry arrived, pronounced the medical bot's ministrations satisfactory and arranged for Detective Ronnie Camberwell to be transferred to her surgery. The medical terry promised Detective Ronnie Camberwell would be returned to us the next day and that her leg would be mended. Although anxious at being in the hands of a stranger, Detective Ronnie Camberwell seemed to relieved at leaving the Owl and the Pussy Cat at least for a short time.

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo left to make her way to a communications consultant who promised undetected origin of call. That left me free to procure supplies for the next leg of our journey and to acquire information on the Western Lands.

When I left the Owl and the Pussy Cat, a plethora of yard bots were covering her exterior. A contingent of interior bots marched up the ramp. They would clean, stock the supply cabinets and run air quality tests, check the interior mechanical systems and even clean the clothing stored on board. We had light versions of all these facilities for long trips, but I find, over the years, it best to employ the industrial quality bots when I am parked at a space station to give me a fresh start on this sort of maintenance. I left Christabel in charge, knowing the Owl and the Pussy Cat would be clean and ready to lift in a matter of hours unless something needed more extensive repair. None of Christabel's sensors indicated a problem of that sort. For once, while working with Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo, I did not arrive requiring repairs from engine burnout or weapons fire.

After browsing my local chandlery for a few special items I thought Detective Ronnie Camberwell and Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo would enjoy and ordering a special meal to celebrate Detective Ronnie Camberwell's return, I set off for a particular shop I know deep inside the central sphere of Three Ravens. I trotted down Pink Alley where beings of all kinds wiggled and jiggled and made lewd gestures of their kind to entice passers-by to sample their particular erotic delights. I stepped aboard a tram  and settled down to ride into the core. Several drop shoots later and another tram, this one grimy and evil smelling, brought me to the shop I desired.
Shop may not be the right word to describe this particular establishment. It is a counter between two uprights. A window compromises part of an opaque wall. The customer presses a button beside the window, then waits. Some time passes. The window opens and the proprietor looks out.

"May I help you?" he inquires.


The customer replies. The window is shut and the customer continues to wait. Some time later the window reopens and the merchandise is placed on the counter for inspection. If satisfactory, the customer pays and goes away.

The shop procures information. 

I proceeded to the counter. It has always been unoccupied when I approach it. No one else has ever joined me. I pressed the button. I waited. I keep my ears cocked while I wait, my nose scenting the air. I look about. This is not a particularly savory thoroughfare though I have never been molested.

"Hello, Pantheran," a voice said from the window. 
   

I turned quickly. This was not the voice of the proprietor.

A young woman stood there.

"I am the proprietor's daughter," she said. "I am watching the shop today. I will be able to assist you."

Of course. The proprietor would not live forever. he was an older man. This woman would be his replacement.

"I require information about the Western Lands," I said, "star charts, historical information, myths and legends associated with it."

"You require a great deal of information," the proprietor's daughter said.

I said nothing. The proprietor never commented on my requests.

"The information is available. It will be expensive."

"The star charts?" I inquired.

"No, they are the usual price," the proprietor's daughter said. "But you require both a quantity of data and data which is not in general circulation."

"Yes," I said.

The proprietor's daughter tapped her wrist set. She quoted me a high figure. There was no bartering here. I either accepted the price or I went away empty-pawed. I agreed to pay the price. "I will provide the star charts now," the proprietor's daughter said. "It will take a little time to gather the other material you require. Come back in a few hours and I will provide it to you."

"I received the star charts and went away, retracing my steps. I wished to stop in at the medical woman's surgery to check on Detective Ronnie Camberwell. It was a lot of traveling but it would fill the time. The refurbishment of the Owl and the Pussy Cat was proceeding according the status line Christabel maintained. If I was out of the ride it would be concluded more rapidly.

The physician's assistant reported that Detective Ronnie Camberwell was resting comfortably after her surgery. I could not disturb her. She was asleep. I left a message and returned to the shop, receiving two data wafers and paying a hefty price. I wondered if the Ministry of Defense would reimburse me. I wondered, too, what sort of data I had just purchased. Would any of it be helpful?

I jumped off the tram in the improbably named High Street and stepped into Pink Alley. It was a shortcut to our ride park. Major Henry Street stood at the entrance to his brothel, dressed in his usual green coat with gold buttons. he hailed many by name as they passed by his door.

"Captain Star Runner," he said as I neared his position. "A word with you."

I paused. I knew who major Henry Street was. I knew his brothel, Time and time Again,  catered to bisexual terries. Why did he need a word with me?

"Please step inside, Captain," he said. "This will only take a minute."

I hesitated.

"Just a message, Captain," Major Henry Street said. "No tricks. No compromising images."

He held the door for me. I stepped inside.

it was a fine foyer with thick carpeting, tastefully decorated walls and with several closed doors. Major Henry Street gestured me toward a seating area. He opened a drawer in a small able and extracted a small case. He proffered it to me.

"the message is contained on the data chip inside," he said. "I was just asked to deliver it to you and as I saw you walking by, I saw no need to go to your ship."

I took the case. It was unmarked, giving no clue to its origin.

Major Henry Street walked back to his door, opened it and held it for me to leave. Seeing no further reason to stay, I left. Major Henry Street bowed me out and wished me a good day.

"How strange," I thought. "I wonder who this message is from."

"I will scan the case upon your arrival," Christabel said.

"It is a message," I said. "It will need to be read."

"That is what major Henry Street said," Christabel replied. "We do not know what that case contains."

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo was already back at the Owl and the Pussy Cat when I returned foot sore. I had done a great deal of traveling. I was hungry, too.

I placed the mysterious case with its message into a scanner.

"The case is shielded," Christabel reported. "I cannot say what is inside."

"What is it?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

I detailed how Major Henry Street stopped me, gave me the case and would not or could not tell me anything about it.

"Christabel says the case is shielded," I concluded. "I do not know if I should be alarmed or whether that means anything at all."

"It may mean something or it may mean whatever is inside is delicate," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I guess There is nothing for it except open it. May I?"

"Sure," I said.

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo picked up the case, turning it over in her hand. "Frankly," she said, "I cannot figure out how to open it. Can you?"

She handed the case to me. It was gray with a smooth surface. I held it in my paw, feeling it surface. As I held the case, it grew warm. It grew warmer still, almost hot. I was about to drop it when Christabel said, "Do not drop it."

"Why?" I asked. "It is very uncomfortable. It could burn my paw."

"It will not," Christabel said. "It is reading your genetic signature."

"My what?"

"It is confirming your identity by analyzing your genetic make-up."

"Star?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo prompted.

"I am holding a case which I cannot open either," I said, "but which is growing almost too hot to hold onto. Christabel says it is confirming my identity by analyzing my genetic make-up. I hope it finishes soon."

Then an amazing thing happened. The case opened in my paw and a small hologram of a stylized member of the Race appeared.

"Captain Star runner," it said, "do not be alarmed at this communiqué. We know you are seeking answers to your questions. If you proceed on your quest, you and your companions  will face many dangers. Be certain you want to do this."

The hologram winked out. The case closed and grew cool in my paw.

"Did you see that?" I asked Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo.

"See what?," she replied. "I saw you holding the case like you still are."

"You did not see the hologram?" I asked in surprise.

"No," she said.

"Oh dear," I said. "The case grew very hot. Christabel said I was being scanned for a genetic signature. Then the case opened. I saw a stylized member of the Race who told me it was aware of my questions and if e proceeded, we would face danger. We needed to be certain we wanted to continue. Then the hologram disappeared and the case closed. It is now cool to the touch."

"Another one of your messages?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"Apparently," I said. "It did speak in my language."

"I watched you the whole time," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I saw and heard nothing. It was just like the other times."

"Do you doubt what I am saying?" I asked.

"I would, Star, if I thought you capable of making something like this up," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I believe it because you did collapse when you went into the storage area. I saw how you tried to hold onto the case there for a while as if it was indeed very hot."

"It was," I said examining my paw. "It feels quite tender."

"I wonder how this case made its way here," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "That suggests someone knows where we are."

"Or where we were likely to go," I said. "there might be copies of this case waiting for me at other destinations."

"A possibility," captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. 

"It makes me more curious than ever."

"I think the author of that message is depending on that," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Do you know the human saying, 'curiosity killed the cat'?"

"Yes," I said. "Emily Dickinson quoted it to me all the time."

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo laughed. "That sounds like Eberhart," she said. Were you able to get any information on the Western Lands?"

"Yes," I said, "it cost me a pretty penny as you terries say."

She whistled when I quoted the price to her. "Well, let us see what you got," she said.

"Were you able to send your message?" I ask.

"Yes," she said. "we will see if I receive a response. I paid for a virtual mailbox where a message, if any, could be sent."

"And Detective Ronnie Camberwell is sleeping after the surgery," I said.

"Everything went okay?"

"Apparently," I said. "Our supplies are stowed. Some more things will come tomorrow and then we can be on our way."

"Very good," Captain Gyllian Romeres said. "I am hungry. How about you?"

"Starving," I said, using another terry colloquialism.   11/18/2010 10:44:14 

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo received an answer to her message in her private mailbox. It said: "Return home immediately."

"So we are not going to the Western Lands," I said, thinking about the massive amount of data I purchased that morning.

"let us see was in that data you have there first. The ministry does not know you received that case with a message only you can perceive. I think it could change everything."

"What do you mean?"

"We have been working under the assumption we are dealing with an ancient secret -- who stored the waste at the landscape of Thorns. We have been working under the assumption the message is keyed for those races who seemed likely to develop space travel and might stumble upon the site. All that seemed quite plausible even to High Flying Chitter Robinson's assassination. Now, however, someone has tracked you down here on Three Ravens and given you a personal message. The encoding is the same as the ancient messages, but a contemporary someone sent it here. There are two possibilities: one of the older races knows where you are and knows how to send you a message that looks like the ones on landscape of Thorns. Or the original writers of the danger messages on Lestrade are still around."

"And you want to know who they are." I said.

"You bet I do," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "either way, Star. If they can track you that well the Ministry of Defense needs to know how. And if There is another player out there, I want to know who they are."

"And I want to know why I am targeted," I said.

"Precisely," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "let us see if that data gives us any clues."



First, I examined the star charts. The Western Lands is a peculiar region of space. The stars are widely spaced apart so There is not as many of them as in other areas of space. The star charts listed each star's location but did not often list planetary information. There were few insertion and extraction points marked. This meant I needed to use my own aptitude for finding them. That should not be a problem.

"Much of this data says when the stars were first chartered and whether or not anyone has gone to investigate the star system," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. The data is human-centric with a smattering of alien records. Nothing here from the Big Three."

"The Big Three?" I asked.

"The Pantherans, the Featherote Charm and the Fungusian Network," she said. "Do you have any Pantheran information on the Western Lands?"

"No," I said. "That region of space is outside the Coalition."

"And the Pantherans have no interest in space beyond the Coalition borders?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"They have an interest about everything in the western spiral arm," I said. "I just do not have any star charts from the Western Lands which is what I thought you asked me."

"So they might have an interest in that region of space."

"It is possible," I said. "I learned nothing about it at the Institute for Genetic Design. What I know about it I learned from spacers on the Northern Frontier."

"And what did you learn there?"

"That terries told what they called tall tales about it as if it was a place from a fairy tale."

"that is about what I know about it," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "it is so far out, even in hyperspace, that colonists do not go there. it is just too expensive. Except you say Tamara is there."

"Yes, working on a dig, though how they found the planet I do not know."

"I may know," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I think it is in the myths and legends section you were clever enough to ask for. That was very good thinking on your part."

I was pleased with her compliment. "I learned that from Tamara," I said. "She told me that myths and legends sometimes have good information in them."

"That is how I think they found the dig site. What star did you say they were working?"

"It has an odd name," I said. "Tamara called it East of the Sun."

"there is an old earth fairy tale called "East of the Sun and West of the Moon," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

I thought about this. "How is that possible," I said.

"It is not," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "That is how you know it is a magical place."

"What happened when you go there?" I asked.

"the princess got the prince, of course," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. She laughed. "Maybe your detective knows the story and can tell you. She might have a different spin on it."

This puzzled me but I decided fairy tales could not help us at this point in our investigations.

"Here is the information on East of the Sun," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "The name of the star is Prince Hat. It is in the Troll Constellation."

I looked the word troll up.  "It means to sing or fish," I said. 

"It also is a grumpy fantasy creature, either big or small," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"How strange your language is," I said.

"Indeed it is," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "The question is, will we find anyone related to this mystery there."

"These materials will take some time to go through. I suppose we will have time to read and digest everything on route."

"Yes," I said. "it will take us some time to get there but we are well-stocked now for a long journey."

Next day, Detective Ronnie Camberwell rejoined us. Her leg still needed time to heal, but she looked much better. The celebratory dinner I ordered the day before arrived. The two women were both surprised and delighted with it.

"You are really making some progress with it," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said to Detective Ronnie Camberwell.

"She is really quite thoughtful," Detective Ronnie Camberwell replied. "I have really been quite beastly to each of you on this trip. I guess I am just not used to a spacer's life."

"You will have more time to practice," I said. "We are going to the Western Lands."

Detective Ronnie Camberwell put down her fork. "you are kidding, right?"

"No," I said.

Over dessert, we filled my lover in on what we had accomplished while she was in the surgery. I concluded with this, "I hope you want to come with us. If you do not, I can arrange for you to travel back to Hypatia."

Detective Ronnie Camberwell looked at me steadily. "Are you trying to get rid of me?" she asked.

"Not at all," I said. "I want to be with you. I did not want you to think you had to spend all this time in space if you do not like it."

"But you are determined to go," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"I need to find out why I am the one who receives these messages," I said. "At first I thought it was very general. I was the only member of one of the older races at the Landscape of Thorns. Now I receive a message in a case only I can hear and see. I want to know where it came from. It is not ancient or at least the one who sent it to me is not ancient."

Detective Ronnie Camberwell turned to Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo. "And you are convinced you need to go on this quest, too?"

An interesting word, quest. It went along with the illusions to fairy tales.

"I think Star is right," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "We might have been able to abandon the search for answers before it received that case. Now, however, it is far more personal."

"And the message did not say I should not go," I said. "It said it might be dangerous."

"And you do not care about it being dangerous?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked me.

"Yes, I care about it being dangerous," I said. "Are all the quests in the fairy tales dangerous?"

"What?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. 

"You just called this a quest," I said. "The planet we are going to is called by the name of a fairy tale. That is a terry construct, I know, but this all is starting to feel like being in a fairy tale."

"Except for the assassins," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "That did not feel at all like a fairy tale."

"But take that part out," I said. "We have gone from place to place, seeking information. Sometimes the information is cryptic, but we keep  moving on."

"I think I see what you mean," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "So when we get there, will something happen and you turn into a beautiful princess?"

"No," I said. "I am a fuchsia-colored Pantheran. That is all."

"Well, you still are my princess," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. She smiled but I knew her smile was forced. She did not wan to go on this quest. She did not want to be in danger. She wanted to go home and forget all about this adventure. I knew it would be the height of folly to try. Those assassins had been all too real and they would not stop until their work was done.

"Are we ready to go?" I asked.

"You want to lift with us on a full stomach?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"I will take it slow," I said. "I think we should not stay at Three Ravens longer than necessary."

"I think you are right about that," Detective Ronnie Camberwell. "That would not be the way it would work in a fairy tale."

So we prepared to leave the space station for the Western Lands.11/18/2010 19:57:43 

Chapter Twelve
In Which We Enter The Western Lands

I pulled away from Three Ravens nice and easy, not my usual hurried departure. I circled the space station in a wide arc, in no particular rush, spiraling away from it, searching for an insertion point. 

"Stand by for insertion," I said. We slipped in easily, not disturbing the women's stomachs at all. The g-forces were minimal. When we established our heading, I gave the all-clear to unstrap from the acceleration couches. I, too, stretched.

"You got us out of there and into the Silent very quickly," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo observed. "Yet you looked like you were in no hurry to get anywhere. I wonder if anyone was watching."

"Not that I could tell," I said.

I padded back to Detective Ronnie Camberwell's sleeping chamber. I knocked.

"Come in," she said. "You did not have to knock."

"I did not know if you wished to rest," I said, closing the door.

I crossed to her side and kissed her. I find this an awkward gesture, but it seems terries like it.

Detective Ronnie Camberwell pulled me close.

"Do spacers really call it the Silent?"

"Yes," I said. "I call it Mother Space."

"I think we have had this discussion before," she said.

"Yes, we have," I said. 

"So you feel at home here."

"Very much so," I said.

"And this is what you do all the time -- travel like this and get to a space station and then leave again?"

"Sometimes I do not go to a space station," I said. "Sometimes I meet another ride in deep space and we transfer cargo and then go on our way. I am a star runner, Ronnie, darling. Being in space  is what I am designed for."

"That is such a strange idea to me," she said. "you are designed."

"I am," I said. "That is WY I am at home here. I wish you were at home here."

"So do I," she said.

You know, you and Gyllie are so comfortable on the ship and with each other. It scares me."

"Why?" I said.

"Because I think you will want to be with her rather than me," she said.

A lot of what had been going on now made sense to me. There was jealousy and maybe even some competition. "No," I said. "Nothing happened while you were gone and nothing will."

Detective Ronnie Camberwell scratched me behind the ears.

"We are a strange couple," she said. "I do not know why or even how I could fall in love with you, but I have. You make sexual connections with all sorts of people easily, yet you have been faithful to me."

"That is how you want it," I said. "I know it would upset you if I did so I do not."

She ran her finger down my face. "thank you," she said.

"May I rest here?" I asked. "I am very tired. Finding insertion points is very taxing."

"Of course," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "I am tired, too."

We slept.

11/19/2010 19:43:15 
Chapter Thirteen
Snow White and Rose Red

"I think," Detective Ronnie Camberwell announced one afternoon, "we have been looking at the wrong fairy tale."

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo looked up from the floating screen she was studying.

"Fairy tale?"

I perked up my ears. Christabel's monitoring of the Owl and the Pussy Cat was so complete there was little for me to do as we made our way through Mother space on our way to the Western Lands.

"I have been going over this compilation of myths and legends associated with the Western Lands," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "All of them are told about the area of space comprised by the Constellation of Troll. That is a constellation in the Western Lands, but I am beginning to think it is a title the way the Solar League is a title or the Featherote Charm or the Fungusian Network. But that is not the point I was going to make.

"we have discussed the fairy tale East of the Sun and West of the Moon, right? In part it concerns a prince who has been transformed into a polar bear by a female troll. He escapes from her and marries a peasant girl. Then a series of events separate them. She tracks him down east of the sun and west of the moon. there is a test and she prevails and he is released from his enchantment and becomes human again."

"Right," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo says.

"Do you remember the fairy tale about Snow White and Rose Red?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"And the seven dwarfs?" I asked.

"A different fairy tale, Star," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Then, I do not know it," I said.

"OK. There are two girls, Snow White and Rose Red. They live with their mother in a humble hut. Snow White stays indoors all the time. Rose Red is an outdoorsy sort of girl. One night a bear comes and knocks at the door and say he needs shelter from the cold. It is winter you see and There is a lot of snow on the ground. They let him in to sleep before the fire. Night after night he comes while winter lasts. Eventually, it becomes springtime. The bear stops coming to their hut. The girls go out into the forest and several times come upon a nasty dwarf. Finally, the bear arrives and kills the s the dwarf. Immediately he is turned into a prince. It seems the dwarf stole his treasure and turned him into a bear. With the dwarf's death, the curse ends. Snow White marries the prince and Rose Red marries his brother who does not appear in the tale otherwise."

"So what does that have to do with our mission?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, moving to resume her study of her screens.

"Well, that is the human telling of the tale," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "The tale included in these myths and legends is a little different, not in the facts, but in the telling. I think it is significant."

I do not understand," I said.

"This better be good, Ronnie," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I was in the middle of -- "

"Hear me out," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "You two may know everything about space travel and interstellar politics, but I do not about literature. I was a lonely child and I read a great deal. I love to read. Star is away a lot and I have a great deal of time to keep reading. I noticed something very peculiar about how this story is told."

"Go on," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. I thought she was making an effort to humor Detective Ronnie Camberwell though there was an edge of impatience in her voice.

"The mother never leaves the hut. It is described as dark and made of earth. It may be more of a cave than a hut.

"Snow White is always twittering. When they go out into the forest, she goes up into the trees and hops along the branches, signing.

Rose Red stalks about."

"So what," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, not clearly annoyed.

"The Fungusians are fungi. They like the dark, right? that is the mother.

"I think Snow White is the Featherote. She acts like a bird in the forest.

"And Rose Red is a Pantheran. All her movements are very catlike."

"And the dwarf and the bear?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Maybe it is the bear we are looking for," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "The bear is the common element between the two stories."

"And perhaps the troll and the dwarf are similar  characters, too," I said. 

"And there is a treasure," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Or," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "the dwarf and the trolls are the people remembered by the Constellation of the Troll and the bear and its treasure are someone else we have not encountered yet."

"I know it is far-fetched," Detective Ronnie Camberwell admitted, "but the descriptions of Snow White and Rose Red are just two convenient. I think, however these stories came into human awareness, they were transformed into something familiar to us while retaining their older associations."

"I wonder," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "if that is what the historian High Flying Chitter Robinson mentioned found -- these old stories. If you knew how to interpret them or you had them in a more authentic form, you would know to what they referred."

"Star, do you know any stories like this?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"Not exactly," I said.

"Try to think. Did you read any imaginative stories as a child?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell persisted.

"We read stories to juveniles," I said slowly. "They are not imaginary stories. They are stories of our past, stories of honor and courage."

"Do they have other animals in them?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell continued.

"yes, of course. We were great hunters."

"What did you hunt?"

"Grazing animals," I said, quickly going through the stories.

"Did you have enemies?"

"Yes," I said. "There was a large animal, a survivor from the ice age. It is called a hupsidon. Their bones have been discovered in many places. We hunted them before they became extinct."

"the bear is an ice age creature," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Were there any tricksters?"  Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. "Were there beings who lived under bridges or who caused trouble."

"Yes," I said. "They are called Rojonnies."

"And have you found their bones?"

"Not that I know of," I said. "but then maybe I would not have."

"It is possible the Ronnie are your dwarfs and trolls," Detective Ronnie Camberwell suggested.

"You mean, these are not true stories?" I asked. "That seems impossible to me."

"You do not have stories?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"We do not have literature as you call it," I said. "We have art."

"Of course," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Your language is represented by colored shapes which move."

"Yes," I said.

"And do you have any beings represented in your art which are fanciful, that would appear in a fairy tale?"

"Well, the Rojonnies and hupsidons appear in our art," I said, "along with our heroes."

"OK," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, "you have something analogous to our fairy tales though you consider them history."

"And do not you have ballads?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"Oh, yes," I said. I love ballads.

"And do hupsidons and Rojonnies appear in these ballads?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"All the time," I said.

"Is there a ballad or a piece of art that tells a similar story to that of either East of the Sun and West of the Moon or Snow White and Rose Red?"

"Let me think," I said.

  I did not have to think very long. Christabel can search the databases very quickly.

"No," I said. "Most of the stories I know have to do with either being victorious in the hunt or following directions. The ones who do not follow directions end up in trouble. That is where the Rojonnies turn the disobedient juvenile into a dumb animal or eat them for dinner."

"What sort of animal?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked. her screens were forgotten.

"Birds usually," I said."

"Do Rojonnies eat mushrooms?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"No," I said. "They eat carlings."

"Carlings are a fungi," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Do bears ever rescue hapless juveniles?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"Sometimes," I said.

"Star's fairy tales are told for a purpose at school," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Maybe they were always fables to instruct the young, but they seem to have many of the same elements."

"then you are suggesting," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "that we could be looking for two new races, the trolls and the bears."

"Or the bears are not real bears," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, "but beings who have been turned into bears by a spell put on them by the troll beings."

"So we are looking for trolls," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I wonder how I am going to put that in a report."

"By the time you are writing your reports, Gyllie, we will know who the trolls are."

"There is a word similar to troll," Christabel announced. "it is trollolu. According to the Fungusian network dictionary, trollolu is a being reported to live in the Western Lands. The Fungusian network has no further information on trollolu in my databases."

"Which only means they have chosen not to include any information on the trollolu," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said."

"How could the trollolu have existed and then been forgotten?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo  asked.

"Maybe these legends suggest they have not been forgotten," Detective Ronnie Camberwell replied. "Legends have a way of holding onto the corn-el of truth."

"But we have these legends, too," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Maybe we have encountered the trollolu, too," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Anything is possible."

An idea came into my mind. It was not Christabel's idea though she pushed it to the foreground. I went over to where I had stored the case. I opened it, heard the message and studied the stylized image of the member of the Race it displayed. I now knew how to keep the image from disappearing. I turned the case around, studying the image from all angles.

"What are you doing?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"I am looking at the image," I said. "It was a familiar image but I just thought it was because it is stylized and that is why I had seen it before. Now that we have talked about old stories, artwork and ballads I recognize this figure."

"Who is it?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"This is a character called Orange R runner. She figures in several stories. She regularly gets into trouble and is smart enough to extricate herself. She got turned into a hupsidon once. Another time she had to make a great journey to find something for a rojonnie."

"Orange Runner," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Her coat," I said. "She was brightly colored." I looked at the hologram some more. "You know," I said, "she has a star on her forehead, the same pattern of white that I have."

"And she is called runner because -- " Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"She runs like the wind," I said. She is beautiful and brave and very independent."

"Sounds like a Pantheran we all know and love," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Orange Runner sounds like a very complex character," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "I bet she causes some trouble in the nursery."

"Oh yes," I said. "We all wanted to grow up and be like her."

"And you did," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Not surprising the Trollolu or whoever sent you her image."

"I will need to think about that," I said. "But what I know already is that she met a handsome, responsible member of the Race and settled down and stopped running off."

"And his name," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Blue Fire," I said. "Many males are blue."

"How about females."

"Pink," I said.

"but orange Runner is orange, not pink," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Part of her uniqueness," I said. "I think the moral of the story is that even unique members of the Race are to settle down and take up a role to help society. Blue Fire was the mayor of their town and helped all the members of the Race when there was a terrible flood. he was very brave and carried many who could not walk through the water."

"Now that is a brave Pantheran," captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"The water did not put out his fire." Detective Ronnie Camberwell giggled.

"A flood is no laughing matter," I scolded. "It is a very serious disaster."

"Yes, I know it is," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, but she was still smiling.

11/20/2010 19:07:24 

"Do we have any more information on the trollolu except a name?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

Christabel provided information on my eye scanner.

"An ancient race," I said aloud as I read quickly ahead of my speech. "They came from the Western Lands. They were ascendant twenty-five thousand years ago. They are believed to be reptilian."

"Trolls," Detective Ronnie Camberwell murmured.

"Why did not Christabel tell us before this?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo demanded.

"Probably," I said, "because we did not ask."

"we have been talking about a race which existed twenty thousand years ago," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo shouted.

"Sometimes," I said, "AIs can be very literal-minded. Also, we were talking about the a region of space far from the Western Lands. It is possible the information in the database is speculative or not well-vetted. As a result, it does not come to the fore unless I ask specifically for it. I think Christabel may be commended for connecting our conversation about trolls and the Western Lands with the Trollolu at all.

 

"you are probably right," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "There are so many bits and bytes in your skull it is amazing anything comes out coherently."

I knew better than to correct her. My brain is my brain. The fact that I have extensive use of computer databases confuses terries to no end.

"How soon before we reach East of the Sun?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"Not soon at all," I said. "The Western Lands are far from the Southern Frontier. East of the Sun is deep within that region of space."

"How did Tamara's group even get there?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"They received a grant," I said. "The vehicle which carried them There is reliable but slow. It took a long time to get there."

"Do you know who provided the grant?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"No," I said. I checked Tamara's messages. "Tamara said they received it anonymously with a request that they go there. The Archeology Department at University of the Gifted Mind on Socrates checked out the project carefully and decided it was legitimate."

"Hmmm," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo murmured. "I wonder who wants them to dig up the Trollolu."

"Do you think it is the Coalition?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"It could very well be," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. 

"Is that a problem for us?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"Not immediately," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "No one from the Coalition will be at the dig. University of the Gifted Mind on Socrates is not on good terms with the Coalition at the moment. They are not even on good terms with their counterparts in the Solar League. it is an academic matter, I think," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said vaguely. "If memory serves, the Ministry of Defense did not find it troubling."

"Your ministry seems very involved in a lot of areas," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"We monitor a lot of channels," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Threats can come in all sorts of guises."

I hastened to move us onto other topics. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo is a stickler for what she considers threats to the Consortium. As a lifelong resident of Ptolemy City, Detective Ronnie Camberwell is used to a more relaxed view of security matters.

"Is there anything else in the materials we received that is useful for us to know?" I asked.

"Yes," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, allowing herself to be distracted. Perhaps she did not want to get into a verbal sparring match with Detective Ronnie Camberwell. It was gong to be a long run and the Owl and  the Pussy Cat is not a big ride.

"There is evidence from some surveys the Solar League did several hundred years ago that There is a lot of evidence of destruction in the Western Lands."

"What sort of destruction?"

"Nuclear devastation in some places," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "artificial structures in ruins in others."

"A war then?"

"Likely. If the Landscape of Thorns is a waste dump for the Trollolu, it contains a lot of materials which were once radioactive and some which are still quite dangerous. We do not know the properties of those inorganic compounds as yet. There is also some evidence that there are organic compounds stored there as well."

"What could that be?"

"I do not think they are graves or anything like that," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Some of the scientists thought they might have been machines, for lack of a better word, which had organic parts."

"Androids?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"More likely thinking machines," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Mechanical in every way except their processors were organic. If you think about it, Star and Christabel form an organic-inorganic unit."

"I always think of them separately," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"They are separate in a way," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Christabel can be assigned elsewhere and Star has had other AIS, but when they are paired, they work together as one unit. I have seen Star without an AI. it is a very precarious existence. we have both worked with computer with varying levels of artificial intelligence. They need an organic mind to be really effective."

"True."

Satisfied that the conversation no longer held any interest for me, I returned to running my ride and running some fairly low-level subroutines to scour Christabel's substantial databases for any more information about the Trollolu and the Western Lands. It would need to be organized and sifted through for anything relevant. The problem with the Fungusian Network's databases is that they have enormous amounts of data but with no conclusions. It depends on the operator to figure out which pieces of information are helpful to other pieces of information. Once collected, the operator must be able to see the pattern and make sense of it all. I often can make sense of disparate data. It just takes me a long time. But then, getting to Prince Hat Star system required a great deal of time.

Chapter Fourteen
In Which We Find Tamara on West of the Moon

We reached the Prince hat Star System two terry months later. No new information came to light either in the data I purchased on Three Ravens or in Christabel's databases. Most of the additional material I located in Christabel's databases dealt with the life cycle of the stars in the region, the numbers of planets and moons, some very pretty nebulae, a quasar or two and a large black hole.

The extraction point I located turned out to be very near East of the Sun which happened to be currently orbiting Prince Hat in the southern half of the star system. We were able to establish communications with the archaeological dig's base camp from synchronous orbit. From them we learned Tamara was not present. She and some others had gone to research a sister planet. We broke orbit and journeyed some significant distance to Wes of the Moon. We received clearance to land at their ride park. I carefully set the Owl and the Pussy Cat down on a roughly plowed surface. We had to wait for our spot to be cleared of snow.

"I have never been in non-toxic snow," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"I have never been in any snow," I said. "It is cold."

"You have fur," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"I like it warm," I said. "I do not enjoy the cold or the wet. Is snow wet?"

"Yes," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "but not wet like water."

This sounded like a contradiction to me.

I was still shutting down the Owl and the Pussy Cat when a figure, bundled in clothes, ran toward my ride.

"That must be Tamara," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, peering out a window. "Put down the ramp for her, Star."

I complied.

I could see a mist around Tamara's mouth. Her breath was condensing in the air. I shivered even thinking about such cold.

Puffing, Tamara entered the airlock and burst into the foyer.

"Hello," her familiar voice shouted.

"we are here," Detective Ronnie Camberwell shouted back, striding over to the edge of the Lair.

"Star still insists on a ladder for us," Tamara said, climbing up the provided ladder. "Sometimes I think it just enjoys showing off by being able to jump up here."

"I agree," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"You must be Detective Ronnie Camberwell," Tamara said.

"Yes. You must be Tamara."

"I am. Oh, hi, Gyllie. Long time no see. And where is Star?"

"Still fiddling with the ship," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

Tamara tossed her clothing -- there was a good deal of it -- onto one of the chairs. "It is so cold on this planet," she said. "I wonder that the civilization here did not just freeze to death."

"What have you learned about them?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"Not a great deal," Tamara said. "we have found lots of stuff though. We just do not know what it is. Oh there you are, Star."

I came into the Lounge. Tamara dashed up to me and threw her arms around my neck exuberantly. "I have not seen you in such a long time," she said. "Holos are just not the same."

I was glad to see Tamara, too, though having her squeezing my neck like this was a bit jarring. I remembered in time this is a terry custom expressing greeting and delight.

"Why are you here, anyway?" Tamara asked.

"that is a long story," I said. "We came because we think you can help us."

"Me? I am just an archaeologist," Tamara said. "How can I help all of you?"

I went over to the automatic cooker. I selected some of Tamara's favorite foods. When the automatic cooker dinged to indicate the food and drink was ready, I carried several trays over to our table. The terries were both amused and delighted by my choices.

"Popcorn," Tamara explained to me, "is not a side dish for a meal, Star."

"but you like to eat it," I said.

"I do," Tamara said. "It is so sweet of you to remember what I like. For this once I will not scold you for serving it with grilled cheese sandwiches."

"Now you know why I suggested you and I take turns programming the meals," captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said to Detective Ronnie Camberwell. "Star has no sense of human nutrition or what is appropriate for the time of day. It would  serve fried eggs with peas and carrots."

"What is wrong with that?" I asked.

"Tradition," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said diplomatically. "It is traditional to serve fried eggs in the morning and peas and carrots in the evening."

"I will remember that," I said.

"I am sure you will,"  Detective Ronnie Camberwell said with mock solemnity.

"Why do I think you three are teasing me?" I asked.

"Because we are," Tamara said, her mouth already filled with popcorn. "Now tell me why you are all here."

"We are trying to solve a mystery," Detective Ronnie Camberwell began.

Later Tamara said, "So you think the creators of the Landscape of Thorns are the same beings who lived here in the Prince Hat Star System?"

"Yes," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Further, we think they called themselves the Trollolu. Does that mean anything to you?"

"Not at all," Tamara said. "In fact, we cannot find any records at all on either West of the Moon or East of the Sun. We keep finding huge amounts of these little boxlike things. They do not open or anything. But they do not seem to serve any purpose at all. we have scanned them. they are not organic."

"Do they look like this?" I asked, retrieving the case Major Henry Street handed me.

"they are identical to what we are finding," Tamara said, taking the case from me. "Where did you find this?"

"This case was handed to me on Three Ravens three months ago," I said.

"And what is it?" Tamara asked, turning it over and over in her hands.

"It is a message," I said. "I can see the hologram and hear a message, but neither Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo nor Detective Ronnie Camberwell can perceive either. That is the way it was on Landscape of Thorns, too."

"I wonder if you can activate any of the cases we found," Tamara said. "It might give us a clue what we have."

"OK," I said. "It may help us, too."

The women were prepared to go out into the cold. I do not carry any sort of external clothing. The women decided to spread a blanket over my back. It helped a little again the cold. My nose hurt. My paws stung. The air was hard to breathe. yet it was beautiful. I heard it crunch under their boots. I made a mental note to have some thermal clothing made to fit me and to schedule a visit to a world where Detective Ronnie Camberwell and I could experience this sort of weather in a more relaxed way.

We arrived at the base camp. Tamara introduced us to several of her coworkers before bringing us to a storage area. There were innumerable boxes filled with cases which looked identical to the one I possessed. Tamara handed me one. Nothing happened.

"When I hold the one I was given," I told her, "it gets hot, almost too hot to hold onto before the message appears."

"Maybe this one is broken," Tamara said. She handed me another, then a third, and then a fourth. The fifth one turned on.

"It is operating," I said as it began to warm my paw. The women crowded around me though I doubted they would see or hear anything. They did not.

A creature appeared and began speaking in my language.

"The basic components of water are hydrogen and oxygen," it said and then launched into a basic chemistry lecture. it continued for some time before I closed the case.

"This is a chemistry lecture," I told the waiting women.

Tamara made a note. 

"it is an educational holo then," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Yes, for a student," I said. "That is not particularly interesting -- the chemistry. What is interesting is that it showed the teacher first and then the chemical symbols. I think it was more a chemistry book than with demonstrations. Remember members of the Race read by colored symbol in motion. It was quite easy to read and to listen to."

"And the teacher?" Tamara asked.

"The teacher was an alien," I said. "I think it was a Trollolu."

"You saw a Trollolu?" Tamara asked.

"I think so," I said.

"What  did it look like?"

"If we go back to the ride," I said, "I  Christabel can create a hologram of the being. Then you can see it, too."

Again we traversed the now even colder ride park. It was now evening. There was no moon. The stars shone brightly overhead. I scanned the sky.

"What are you looking for?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"The Mother-Of-Us-All," I said. "I always look when I get to a new place."

"but the constellations are different on every world," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "How can you expect to see a particular constellation."

I pointed. "See that star," I said. "From the star charts, that is the Mother Of Us All's nose star. we are in front of her here. The rest of the stars which make up her constellation are behind that one and we cannot see them."

"But we can see the Constellation of the Troll," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "or at least some of it."

"But it does not look like a troll, does it?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"is not that an arm?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked, pointing.

"Maybe," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said doubtfully.

"I am cold," Tamara said. "Can we stargaze some other time?"

"Sure," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. Then, striding off toward the Owl and the Pussy Cat, "last one in is a rotten egg."

I knew this game and bounded ahead of her.

"you are cheating again, Star," she said, panting as entered the ride. "You run on four legs."

"I have four legs on which to run," I said, bringing a tray of hot beverages to the table.

Even I know terries like hot beverages when they are cold.

11/21/2010 21:08:58 

Christabel and I transcribed the chemistry class for Tamara's database. It was quite boring. 

I set down my bowl. "Christabel is ready to show you the teacher," I said.

All conversation in the Lounge ceased. The hologram appeared, Christabel's reconstruction of the teacher sparked much conversation.

"You think that is the Trollolu?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked me.

"I do not know," I said. "It is the being giving the lecture." 
It is identical to the one I saw when I held the case in my paws.

Christabel supplied a short burst of sound which was the beginning of the lecture.

"Sounds like Pantheran to me," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"It is," I said.

"What sort of a being do you think it is?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"Reptilian," Tamara said.

"Ugly," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "If you told me that was a troll I would certainly believe you."

"Hard to say how big it is," Tamara said. 

"It looks scaly," Detective Ronnie Camberwell offered.

"Looks like maybe it is a camouflage color," Tamara said.

"Has quite a tongue," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo offered.

"No wings," I said. "I think it has legs, too. It is not a snake."

"Would you be willing to try other cases tomorrow?" Tamara asked tentatively. "Maybe we could get other pictures. I know there are too many of these cases for you to test them all."

And that is what I did -- for two days. All the cases which I could open were educational in character. The beings giving the lectures were different instructors though all of them appeared to be of the same race. We tentatively identified them as Trollolu. The other archeologists were thrilled with Christabel's reconstructions of the instructors, pleased to have a picture of the aliens. They said it would help them in their other work, developing ideas about how these people lived. 

For my part, I was very dissatisfied. I was tired of holding the cases and letting Christabel record these scientific and mathematical lectures for beginners. What I wanted to know was what these beings might have to do with the Landscape of Thorns and how I received a message from them on Three Ravens. I wanted to know what had become of Emily Dickinson. I wanted to know why the Royal Guard sent two assassins after me and what they were trying to protect. None of this made any sense even now. The only thing we had learned thus far is that the Trollolu coded messages for genetic signatures. Well, maybe that was something, but it certainly was not enough for me.

I still am uncomfortable planet side. There is just too much space. however, I was uncomfortable and fed up with the lecture cases. I walked away from the storage area and out into the cold afternoon.

Christabel crated a warm coat for me. I walked out onto some fresh snow, watching how it kept my paw prints as I tracked across it. At least I was making a trail anyone could follow and I could certainly follow it back to the base camp. This was a whole new experience for me and although I did not much care for it, it is my practice to explore these new experiences when I have an opportunity to do so.

I walked up a hill, no maybe it was a ridge -- I am not totally sure of the differences different topological words have. From its top I could see for quite a distance. The wind blew. I breathed deeply, smelling West of the Moon -- its growing things and its fauna. I could smell water, too. I listened. From holos, I knew the sound was that of falling water. having never seen a waterfall up close, I started walking in that direction. I am not fond of water, but the sound fascinated me.

And there it was, water splashing over rocks into a pool below. Spray hit my face and froze. I never experienced ice before on my person. It, too, fascinated me. When I was very cold, I turned around and slipped on some loose rock. Temporarily, I lost my balance and began sliding downward. The hillside was quite steep here. There was no way to stop sliding on the ice. I tried digging my claws into it but it was very hard. Thankfully, I ended up in a snow bank. Not a very  graceful 
stop. I pawed at the snow with both front and back paws to set myself upright. My left hind paw struck something. I felt around, trying to find a place to plant that paw firmly. No go. I tried clearing the snow. I ended up clearing away lots of snow. What was this ting? I turned around to look. No chunk of ice. Not a root or a rock. It was something which was sticking up out of the ground. I cleared away more snow. It was bright red in color. Definitely manufactured. It looked like nothing I had ever seen before. I could not identify it.

"Christabel," I said, using the gemlike connector embedded in my collar bone, please contact someone to come and look at this. I do not know what this is and perhaps one of the archeologists should take a look at it. It is certainly more curious than those mathematical and scientific lectures."

Shortly afterwards the three women, Tamara, Detective Ronnie Camberwell and Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo arrived along with two male students of Tamara's.

"What have you found?" Tamara asked me.

"I do not know," I said. "It is red and appears to be quite large."

The two students began digging it out of the snow while Tamara made a holo record. It turned out that the object was half-buried in the ground. 

"We have cataloged nothing like this," Tamara said. "It is not of human origin. Can Christabel identify it."

"No," I said. "It matches nothing in her usual use databases. It will take some time for her to go through her entire visual archives."

"I would appreciate that," Tamara said. "Christabel is a far more advanced AI than anything we have here on West of the Moon."

Having removed the item from the ground, the two male students carried it back to the base camp. The rest of us trailed behind.

"From the snow," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "You had quite a tumble."

"It was useful," I said, beginning to feel very cold with the icicles still on my face.

"you are avoiding the issue," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"I do not think it bears talking about," I said.

I returned to the Owl and the Pussy Cat and strapped into my acceleration web. Christabel could warm me up faster than anything else. I knew it would take some time before anyone could give me information about the object. It was red, triangular in shape with many fins. What it was doing alongside a waterfall I could not say. I wondered what else was strewn around there. Maybe the archeologists would clear away more of the snow to see.

That is what they did. They could not figure out what the object I found was. They did however find many more objects. One of them proved to be a start to unscramble the mystery that was the Trollolu.

11/22/2010 19:10:00 

Chapter Fifteen
The Trollolu Rosetta Stone

Tamara called me in to look at the object. I went reluctantly. All this digging and identification of ancient objects was all very well but it did not tell us anything about the Landscape of Thorns or what had happened to Emily Dickinson. I rather thought Emily Dickinson had been forgotten in all the excitement of finding the objects by the waterfall. This irritated me.

"We think it is a plaque," Tamara said. "It appears to be written in three different languages. We think one of them is Pantheran. Can you read it?"

I stared at the flat panel Tamara held out to me. I did not take it.

"How can I read that?" I asked. "It is not in color and it is not moving. How can it be my language if even those two criteria are not met."

Tamara frowned and looked down at the rectangle she held in her hands. "Thinking like a terry," she said. She looked up at me and smiled. "you are quite right, Star. I apologize."

My irritation temporarily assuaged, (I could never stay angry at Tamara for long.), I made a suggestion. "Maybe Christabel could work with those flat pictures and see if she can color them in a way that they will make sense to me."

Tamara brightened. "Good idea. Can you look at this in a way Christabel can see it okay?"

"I have the image," Christabel said. "I will advise you if I need a more detailed image."

"Christabel is working on it now," I said.

That, too, took considerable time. There are many permutations of symbols in my language. Christabel and I rejected many combinations which did spell out a message but were nonsensical.

The paragraph which began "The big brown hupsidon married the green rojonnie," for example, did not seem a fruitful undertaking. Christabel judged this plaque said something important. Besides, hupsidons and Rojonnies did not marry. Christabel further assumed this plaque did not come from a Trollolu nursery which she insisted might have contained an improbable beginning to a story.

Finally, we thought we had a solution. We invited Tamara and some of her associates to the Owl and the Pussy Cat. Christabel used a display screen to show the message as it was written on the plaque, properly colored and in motion.

"What does it mean, Star?" Tamara asked.

"This plaque commemorates the sixteenth graduating class from By the Waterfall Academy. We congratulate them and wish them well in their new careers as military officers of the Constellation Space Force."

There was absolute silence.

"Are you sure about the last part?" one of Tamara's colleagues asked.

"Yes," I said. "These words are in their standard symbols."

"Are their dates, names, anything else?" another colleague asked.

"Not here," I said.

"Could the plaque be incomplete?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"It seems complete," Tamara said, "but we need further analysis. Perhaps it is broken off." She sounded doubtful.

"Perhaps this is a copy of a much larger plaque," Detective Ronnie Camberwell suggested. "The big plaque has dates and names. This plaque hung in someone's office because they were part of the graduating class."

"I like that idea," Tamara said. "But why in three different languages?"

"Because," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "that was how that class did everything. They had members that spoke three languages and they were proud of it."

"Maybe," Tamara said.

"How old is this plaque?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. "Do we know?"

"About twenty-seven thousand years old," Tamara said. "We will have to do more tests to narrow it down."

"That makes no sense," I said. "The Pantheran, state is only ten thousand years old." I thought Empire but my programming substituted state.

"Apparently," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "Pantherans have been getting about the western spiral arm for a very long time."

"So this plaque predates the Landscape of Thorns by seven thousand years," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "That does explain why There is a message in Pantheran to warn them off of the site."

"And perhaps it begins to explain why Special Branch tried to kill us," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "The Pantherans have been out and about the stars for a very, very long time."

"And in the company of the Trollolu," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"And at least one other group," I said. "There are three languages here. Christabel, do either of the other languages appear on the stones at the Landscape of Thorns?"

"All three languages appear," Christabel reported over the Lounge speaker.

"The stone is carved with Pantheran symbols?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo inquired. She was amazed.

"Yes," Christabel said.

"Why did not anyone recognize them then?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"Unknown," Christabel replied. "However, the carved symbols look quite different on a flat motionless surface than they do when in color and moving."

"that is true," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said reflectively. "Can you translate that message, just for the record, Christabel. It is not a high priority."

"Yes," Christabel said. "I will tell you when I have something. Now that Star and I have translated the plaque, translating the stone at the Landscape of Thorns will be easier."

"I wish we knew who the others in this class were," Tamara said wistfully. "We might get a better idea about who these people were."

"They were space faring twenty-seven years ago," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo pointed out. "They must have had a star drive, too. Panthera is a long way from here."

"I wonder," I said. "Today the Featherote Charm supplies the star drive. I always thought it was because they invented it. Suppose they just were trained by the Trollolu to build it."

"Or even improve it," Detective Ronnie Camberwell added. "Suppose they were the engineers and scientists then as they are now."

"And the Pantherans were the astrogators?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked. 

"Something like that," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Then I would think there would be four languages here -- Trollolu, Featherasong, Trolloluan and Fungusian binary.

"I do not think there is binary on this plaque," Tamara said. "It would be mathematical."

"So maybe we are looking at early Featherasong and Trolloluan?"

"You seem to be making a lot of assumptions," the first of Tamara's colleagues to speak said rather grumpily I thought.

"Of course we are," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "We escaped an assassination attempt, lost one of our colleagues and were chased off of Lestrade by the Coalition military. I want to know why what happened twenty-seven thousand years ago matters so much now."

"I am a child of the Northern Frontier," Tamara said slowly. "I was born on Earth. My parents came to the Northern Frontier to make a fresh start and to escape many of the Coalition's restrictions."

"My parents went to Hypatia for the same reasons," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"And I left the Solar League Navy for those reasons," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "What of it, Tamara?"

"I never had a positive view of Pantherans until I met Star," Tamara said. "Is it simply they do not want us to know they once participated in the Constellation Space Force which was run by the Trollolu?"

"You mean they were once a cooperating Race?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Or a conquered or enslaved people," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Star translated that chemistry lecture. it was very basic. Suppose the Trollolu used other races to fight their wars or expand their empire."

"They used subject peoples are cannon fodder, you mean," Tamara said.

"Something like that. If their ships were lost out on their frontier or the battle went poorly, so what? The Trollolu could stay at home and reap any rewards." Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo sounded bitter.

"Any thoughts, Star?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"The Empire has ruled the western spiral arm for twelve thousand years," I repeated to myself. That was what I was taught back at the Institute. No Race had ever accomplished this in the history of the western spiral arm. yet here was evidence that -- that what? The Race had served in another's Space Force twenty-seven thousand years ago. had we been a subject people as Tamara suggested? or were we a cooperating Race, just waiting for our opportunity to overthrow the other races and establish ourselves as the supreme rulers we are? If so, from twenty-seven thousand years to twelve thousand years was a long time.

"I have no information," I said, realizing everyone was waiting for me to reply. "I am still coming to grips with the idea my Race has been a space faring people for twenty-seven thousand years. I suppose we are saying the Featherote have been space faring that long, too."

Could the Featherote have been the power after the Trollolu? And what of the Fungusian network? had they been enslaved, too? Had they ever ruled the western spiral arm?

Christabel did not enter into my thoughts. I queried her but she did not respond. Perhaps she was running her own subroutines.

A tickle of an idea came to me. It was Christabel, of course, very hesitant, very uncertain. AIs are usually not this tentative. If they do not know something they are not blessed with emotional responses. They reply immediately  to any query they to which  cannot supply a valid answer.

"Shall we ask the Fungusian Network if they have any information," I said. "They may not answer, but it may prove instructive whatever answer they give."

"Can you do that?" Tamara asked.

"Yes. It will take some time for the query to be sent."

"Is there such a thing as requesting a reply even if it is a refusal to supply information?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"Yes," I said, "And we can send it as a message burst which will move it along more quickly. Christabel will compose the question in binary."

The question Christabel and I agreed to send simply said, "Please advise us concerning Pantheran, Featherote and Fungusian participation in Trolloluan Constellation."
The burst went out later that day. After that, there was again nothing to do but wait.

"The thing is," I told Tamara next day at the archaeologists' canteen, "if you ask the right question or ask it in the right way, the Fungusian Network will answer you. If they do not like the question, if they think you are on the wrong track, they simply do not answer. They want you to figure things out yourself. Sometimes you just do not have enough information to figure it out yourself. You need them to supply the missing information."

"But you still deal with them and use their AI," Tamara said.

"Certainly," I said, "Christabel is custom made for me. Their storage algorithms are the best in the western spiral arm. I would be a fool to purchase my tech services from anyone else. They have never let me down."

We waited some more.

Detective Ronnie Camberwell enjoyed winter sports outside the base camp. She wanted me to join her, but I did not enjoy sliding downhill and skating seemed more work than I wanted to do. She has only two feet to manage. I have four. Besides, it was very cold and snowed often.

At last I received an answer to my request. It, too, was in burst format and was brief and to the point.

"Three races served Constellation of Trollolu at their pleasure."

"At their pleasure?" I asked Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo, Detective Ronnie Camberwell and Tamara. "I do not understand what that means."

"It means," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "they had no choice."

"So they were either coerced in some way," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"I suspect so," Tamara said. "The more we learn about this society, the more we sense they were control addicts."

"I do not know abut the Featherote Charm," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, "but I have always gotten the impression both the Fungusian Network and the Pantherans are very organized. They are organized in different ways, but I wonder if their encounter with the Trollolu has had a lasting impression on them."

"The Featherote Charm," I said quietly, "is very organized, too. They think of themselves as a flock, all going in the same direction with a leader."

The beings at the table grew quiet. "So they are still working under the model the Constellation taught them," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "They must have been incredible teachers."

"Or incredibly successful," Tamara said.

"No," I said forcefully. I surprised myself. "The Constellation came to a bad end. The three races have buried them. They do not want to remember them. The military came to shut down the Terry operations at the Landscape of Thorns. The assassins came after us on Trill because the Race wants to obliterate their memory."

"but high Flying Chitter Robinson -- " Detective Ronnie Camberwell began.

"Always had a high opinion of himself," I said. "I benefited from that opinion. He outfitted me with a ride and got me started. That flew in the face of everything the Featherote Charm stood for -- non-interference in the Race's business. It amused him to see if I could operate on my own. I think he expected me to fail and would have enjoyed chortling over my mistakes and shortcomings. He probably did anyway."

"Did you take your nasty pills today, star?" Tamara asked.

"My nasty pills?" I asked, then Christabel pulled the memory out of deep storage. I laughed then. "When I get vindictive like this you always called it 'taking my nasty pills'."

"that is right," Tamara said. "You remembered."

She seemed pleased.

11/23/2010 19:07:45 

Chapter Sixteen
Hurry All in a Flurry

We waited some more. Spring came to West of the Moon. Detective Ronnie Camberwell and I explored the countryside around the base camp and the expanded dig by the waterfall. I sneezed a lot. I spent a lot of time in my acceleration web while Christabel monitored and medicated my allergies. I wondered if my Pantheran fore bearers had these same allergies or whether the climate was very different back then. 

I began to wonder what we were waiting for. Finally, I finally could not be idle another day. I prepared the Owl and the Pussy Cat for a tour of the Prince Hat Star System. I needed to be accelerating somewhere with no ground under my feet, no pollen tickling my nose, no flora and fauna around me, no weather, no night followed by day followed by night again. I am a star runner, I told my friends. I need to be out there.

We agreed I would be away from West of the Moon for a week. The archeologists asked me to drop off some of their finds on East of the Sun. I was happy to do that. After all, this is what a star runner does.

After this, I toured the prince hat Star System. There was, I concluded, nothing at all remarkable about it: one asteroid belt, three gas giants, 4 icy planets with no moons at its edge. Its sun was unremarkable, too, yellow, about three quarters through its life. It was the prototypical configuration of a star system which contains life. Did the Trollolu evolve here or just use these two similar planets for their military headquarters? Would a further investigation turn up old hulks of both interplanetary and hyperspace vehicles and
 which could travel to the stars? I wondered, for all its marvelous discoveries, what the real point of archeology is. Does knowing all about the Trollolu really add to anyone's enrichment or enjoyment? Up until recently, I did not know anything about the Trollolu or even that they once existed and it was okay. The only reason it might matter now is to explain why assassins were following us and perhaps why Emily Dickinson disappeared. Recently Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo had confided she doubted Emily Dickinson was still alive. His death would simply be a mystery, one of those unexplained deaths attributed to space-related causes. People always disappear in space. It is just so big even large items cannot be found.

I wondered, too, how this long absence from Hypatia effected my stand in the league of Hypatian Pirates and if Detective Ronnie Camberwell was still a detective in the Ptolemy City police force. 

"These are very dark thoughts," Christabel informed me. "Are you all right?"

"You should know," I said. "You are the one monitoring my physical, emotional and mental systems."

"Normally," Christabel said, "I would say you are depressed and I would give you some mood balancing drugs. However, your analysis of the current situation is accurate. This venture has let us all in a very precarious situation. It is not clear to me how all the unknowns can be resolved. We need more data."

"More data?" I asked. "I am not sure more data would be helpful. I just carried a great deal of data from one site to another. I think we need answers, not data."

"Usually," Christabel said, "data leads to answers."

"In this case I am beginning to think data just leads to more confusion," I said. "I was once told that data leads to answers which leads to more questions. And that this is a good thing. At the moment I would settle for some answers that would lead to no more questions."

"You prefer a settled life," Christabel said.

"Do I? I think my life has been pretty unsettled for some time."

"But it had a predictable pattern," Christabel said. "Now There is no pattern at all."

"Agreed."

My wanderings took me out to this star system's Kiper Belt, a ring of debris which encircles many star systems at their outer edge. Besides being a some time navigational nuisance, it had nothing of interest. I was about to direct that Christabel and I take the Owl and the Pussy Cat back to West of the Moon when I sensed something.

"What was that?" I asked Christabel.

"Nothing on sensors," Christabel responded. "All vehicle systems nominal."

I concentrated. It was nothing  Christabel monitored. Therefore, it was no stray thought of mine and nothing ride-related. It was something my runner senses picked up. Christabel as an AI could not read this area of my brain well. It is why AIs do not run space vehicles except in very routine and limited ways. They need a runner to sense the space around them and make decisions.

"Someone is out there," I said finally. "they are still in Mother Space. I can feel them. They are looking for an extraction point."

"For this star system?" Christabel asked.

"Yes," I said. "Are there any vehicles related to the archaeological work expected?"

"There grant only called for this crew to come out here," Christabel said shortly. "Whoever it is out there they are unexpected."

"Not unexpected," I said. "I have been expecting them for some time."

"The Royal Guard," Christabel said.

"Of course," I said. "What I felt was their runner probing for an extraction point."

"Can they sense you?" Christabel asked.

"No," I said. I am not probing. I am just riding along. But we are going to run back to West of the Moon to get our people out of here. They are all in danger. Can you send messages to that effect?"

"Affirmative," Christabel said. "they are not coded, of course."

"they do not need to be coded," I said. "The Royal Guard is still in hyperspace. Now make best time to West of the Moon."

Christabel did. It was a wild ride. The G-force was at the maximum I can tolerate for an extended ride. We bounced off of planet gravity wells, were jostled by solar winds and zigged and zagged through the asteroid belt at dizzying speeds. Christabel and I did not chatter. We were one entity, focused on reaching the base camp as soon as possible.

When we touched down, three women were waiting for us. They hurried aboard with their gear, Tamara carrying a special bag with some key archaeological finds including the graduation plaque.

"We packed all the important things," Tamara said. "The others are picking up the crew on East of the Sun and then quitting the star system. We do not want to encounter the Pantherans. we are expecting them to bomb our sites or otherwise destroy them."

"They will ignite the planets themselves," I said. "They will be obliterated."

"That is really too bad," Tamara said. "We thought we might be on to something really special here."

"And that is why the planets will be blown up," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "They are hiding something though we have no idea what that something is."

"Are they in the star system yet?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"They are two days behind me," I said. "I was traveling at top speed to get here this quickly. I have to travel more slowly now that you three are aboard. Please strap in for a long and bumpy ride. We are going to the asteroid belt. First, it is harder to find us there and secondly, I believe caught a sense of an insertion point there. The asteroids will cover our  exact insertion point and therefore our heading in hyperspace. Please be thinking about where you want to go when we are inserted."

Again Christabel and I merged, flying close to asteroids, turning and twisting, seeking the insertion point and making ourselves an inconvenient target for military weaponry. I had no doubt the military vehicle making its way to West of the Moon would shoot us to bits without even hailing us. I hoped the human space vehicle could extract itself from this star system in time. I could not think about them right now. I needed to concentrate.

"Got it," I murmured aloud. "Prepare for insertion."

The angle was oblique. This made our insertion take longer, inducing nausea and strange images in our mind. The space-time continuum becomes more obvious with an insertion like this. The traveler does not simply go from here to there instantly, but hovers in both places simultaneously and nowhere at all at the same time. When I declared the Owl and the Pussy Cat in Mother Space, my medical bot was attending to Detective Ronnie Camberwell and the two housekeeping bots were cleaning up around both Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and Tamara.

"I have never been through any insertion like that before," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo gasped. "What happened, Star?"

"We were at an extreme angle to the insertion," I said. "It just took longer to get in. You were in hyperspace and normal space and somewhere in between for a noticeable length of time. For the purposes of escape, it is quite useful. We will be harder to trace."

"How much harder?"


"Almost impossible," I said.

"So our pursuers will need to figure out where we are going rather than follow us there," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo concluded.

"Correct," I said. "Any ideas where we should go?"

"Where are we heading now?" Tamara asked.

"If we stay on this heading," I said, we will arrive amidst the Fungusian network. It is Christabel's default heading."

"that is convenient," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said dryly.

"It is actually helpful," I said. "It means I always know where we are going if I do not specify a heading. I cannot get lost then."

"I suppose that is a good idea," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said weakly. "Will this running away ever end?"

"Yes," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said decisively. "We need to resolve this matter. Any suggestions?"

"do not you know how to do that?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. I thought she might start crying.

"I do," I said.

"You do?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"Yes. We are going back to the Landscape of Thorns."

'"But the military -- "

"Will not be there," I said. "Do you think the powers that be can afford to keep two war vehicles guarding an empty storage site indefinitely? It has been nearly a year ago that we left there -- at least it will be by the time we get back."

"Do we have the supplies for such a long time?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell wanted to know.

"Yes, we do," I said. "I fully stocked the Owl and the Pussy Cat when we were at Three Ravens. You  ate a lot of the archaeologists food when you were there."


"They were producing their own food in their indoor gardens," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"A good thing," I said. "We will have food for the journey and probably there will be food for you there. I doubt the military vehicles parked. They cannot blow that planet into pieces."

"Because -- " Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo prompted.

"Because I think the entire planet is the waste dump," I said. "Vaporizing an entire planet is very expensive and if that is a planet-sized waste facility, blowing it up could have unforeseen ramifications. They would have to push the planet into Watson before they could be certain there would be no future problems."

"And you think There is something on Lestrade to resolve this situation," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Yes," I said. "I think the answers are there because I think we can translate those carvings now."

"You think it says more than just go away?" Tamara asked.

"Yes," I said. "I did not look at it carefully so Christabel cannot work on a translation as we go, but I think we will find that some of that writing can be put into my language so we can understand what it is saying. I think There is more to that storage depot than just some waste material. It does not make sense to haul it from East of the Sun and West of the Moon all the way to Lestrade."

This was not the end of our discussions, but it is the gist of them. On many of our previous adventures, my analysis proved to be faulty. I needed one of my human friends to figure out what to do or what the mystery was. This time, however, I seemed to be the one who had even a glimmer of an idea.

11/24/2010 19:10:55 Chapter Seventeen

Chapter Seventeen
The Message of the Stone 

Despite my brave words that there would be no military presence in the Holmes-Watson Star System, I considered my extraction points carefully when we were ready to leave Mother Space. I decided to reuse the extraction point behind Lestrade's moon. If we were detected, I could no longer use this point as a safe exit or entry into the Holmes-Watson Star System. Since I believed the likelihood of detection was very low, the extraction point would put us very close to Lestrade and our return to the Landscape of thorns.

All went well. The military vehicles were no longer orbiting Lestrade. The base camp Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and her team established last year was still in tact. In their environmental suits, Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and Detective Ronnie Camberwell went through the entire dome. They worked quickly and efficiently with my cargo bots to assemble all the gear left behind. They loaded it onto the Owl and the Pussy Cat. The larger pieces would wait for another transport vehicle to reclaim them. Tamara, being the skilled archaeologist, created all the images of the Visitor's Center, recording the stone, the floor, the walls and the ceiling. As an added precaution, she also recorded the exterior. There were no visible images there.

When their work was completed, the women returned to the Owl and the Pussy Cat to await my analysis. While I waited for them, I did what scans I could of the planet and the space around it. We were alone as far as I could tell. That was good. I did not know how long it would take Christabel to create a symbolic representation of the carving I could read. We were, of course, assuming there would be a carving I could read.

The women wanted to bathe and to have a quick meal before retiring to their sleeping chambers. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and Detective Ronnie Camberwell especially had had a very strenuous day.

It was early the next morning, while the three Terries considered it still night when Christabel produced a result I could read.

The message carved into the stone was identical to the verbal message I received when I entered the room. "This is not a place of honor. This place does not commemorate any great deed. This is a place of danger. Leave this place immediately."

"I thought you said Pantherans had no written language when this site was created," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said the next morning.	

"Apparently," I said, "I was misinformed."

"It seems there are a lot of things we have been misinformed about," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. She had such a dry sense of humor sometimes.

"Has Christabel discovered anything else about the Visitor's Center?" Tamara asked. "It is such a strange place though clearly whoever built it tried to warn people away."

I was about to reply when Christabel interrupted me. "There is more writing for you to read," Christabel said, displaying another decoded  message.

"Wait," I said, digesting what slid across my eye. "The message carved into the stone is also reproduced on the wall," I said. "However, there is something additional. Perhaps it did not fit on the stone. Perhaps the warning message is the priority."

All three women leaned toward me. "What does it say?" Tamara asked.

"It says, "We who have built this place of danger are the," I paused, trying to find the word to express the combination of symbols Christabel provided me.

"Who?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, too excited to wait for me to say.

 "Teachers," I finally said, "though it is a more complicated meaning than that."

"Explain," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"It is the word we use for those guiding the Institute of Genetic Design," I said. "They are teachers but they are also designers. They are the keepers of what works and what does not work. It means a partial engineer, a zoologist, a physician, a nurturer."

"OK," Tamara said. "A parent with special skills perhaps."
"Because they are creators," I said, "intentional creators since there is the deliberate manipulation of genetic material."

"So you were in the middle of a sentence," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, getting us back to the matter at hand.

"We who built this place are the Teachers of the Western Spiral Arm," I read. "Our home planet is in the star system indicated on the star chart in this room. We regret the need for such a place as this. And then it repeats the warning again," I said.

"Which planet?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. She was quite tense.

"I have to review the star charts," I said. "I was unaware one was indicated."

"Star, can you produce one of those holograms of the star chart on this ride?" Tamara asked.

"Yes, I can," I said and gave the command to Christabel. Instantly the Lounge was filled with stars, some existing in the space between us. Detective Ronnie Camberwell sat on one side of a bright blue one.

"This is the star chart as it exists on the wall of the Visitor's Center," I explained. "I believe that red blinking dot near Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo's knee represents a planet. It is the only one on the star chart."

"And where is it?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked. "These stars are not familiar to me."
"Nor me," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "I cannot read a star chart at all though this is a very cool way of seeing them."

"I thought this star chart was twenty-seven thousand years old," Tamara said. "Does not that mean that the stars are currently in a different place?"

"Yes, there is drift," I said. "The star chart is also for Lestrade twenty-seven thousand years ago. Let me move everything to update it for today."

We watched as Christabel moved the stars.

"This still does not tell me anything," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Ah, but Christabel has identified the planet's location," I said. "Look, here is Holmes-Watson." A binary pair near Tamara began rapid blinking. "Here is the Coalition border," I said. An orange line behind me appeared.

"To the east," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"To the east," I agreed.

"How far, Star?"

I considered, letting my mind flow into Christabel's calculations, envisioning Mother Space.

"About a month's journey in Mother Space," I said. "I have no charts for that part of space."

"I thought that is where the Azulees are," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"No," I said. "This is where I rendezvoused with the Azulee ride several years ago. And here is the Pharaoh Star System."

"More lights appears, closer to Tamara.

"Oh, I see," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, getting up to walk around the Lounge, positioning herself to see the chart from several angles. "We have to go much closer to the center of the galaxy.

"Yes," I said. "Properly speaking, we are going out of the Western Spiral Arm."

"But the Teachers, as you call them, do not give themselves another name?" Tamara asked.

"No, just the Teachers," I said.

"Are we going there?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked timidly. "I know Tamara would want to go there because she is an archaeologist."

"I am wondering what would be gained by going," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I am wondering if I can or should return to the Consortium."

"I am wondering if I will have a job at the University of the Gifted Mind if I do not return soon," Tamara said.

"I still have questions," I said.

"Such as?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Who sent me that case," I said. "Why is the Royal guard involved? What happened to Emily Dickinson? Can we go back to our regular jobs and be left alone?"

"All good questions, Star," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "Your mind keeps track of all the questions. If I was not so scared of space, I would want to answer all those questions. Detectives do not like to leave a case with questions unanswered.

"So how does going way over here," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo walked over to her chair and the blinking red dot which was the representation of a planet, "help us answer Star's questions?"

We sat in silence for some time.

"Where else can we go to answer our questions," I said, making my questions everyone's questions. "Can we go to the Conclave of Beings and ask them why the Royal Guard was sent to assassinate us?"

"Somehow I do not think that will have the desired results," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "They probably would simply detain us and we would never be heard from again."

"You mean they would kill us?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"Certainly," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo replied. "Oh, there would have been an unfortunate accident with the Owl and the Pussy Cat. In fact, there would be an accident and no one would be the wiser for it."

"OK," Tamara said. "Where else can we go for answers? Is there a library or a museum?"

"Well," I said, "if Stephen Silk and the others had really created  a Library of the Mind they might have the answer. They were very involved in conspiracy theories."

Detective Ronnie Camberwell smiled at me while Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo frowned at me.

"A joke, Star," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "You are getting better."

"A very poor joke," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Oh, one of your adventures," Tamara said.

"Where I met Star," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"No," I said. "I met you earlier.\ as part of a different adventure."

"True, but we did not get to know one another," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"May I interrupt all this reminiscing?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked "to get us back on target?"

We said nothing.

"OK," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Do we have the supplies?"

"You have the supplies from your base camp," I said. "Are hey usable?"

"Definitely," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I had your bots scan them. No sense bringing aboard spoiled foods. They are fine and we certainly have enough."

"And your fresh food from the garden is growing well," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"So are we going?" I asked.

"Why not," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "Star, do you know the expression 'in for a penny, in for a pound'?"

"No," I said. "What does it mean?"

"It means we have invested time, resources and energy. Why not invest more of the same," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

I turned to Detective Ronnie Camberwell. "It means more space time," I said. "I have no idea what we will find when we get to this star system. It only has a number in the galactic database. I have never heard of anyone who has ever gone to this star system. I only have the barest of details about it."

"I will manage," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "I always dreamed of adventures when I was a girl. Now I suppose I am having them."

"Be very careful what you wish for," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "You might get what you wish for."

"Yeah, I suppose so," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. She sounded nervous to me.

"We will help you adjust," Tamara said. "You have been very good about the long space journey so far. And you got to the Western Lands, too. Star has been running you all over the western spiral arm. You have had quite a tour."

"Maybe," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said, "I will stay hoe next time, if I ever get back home."

That sounded so plaintive to me. And the truth was, I could not promise her we would ever or could ever return to the Pharaoh Star System, Ptolemy City and our villa on the other side of Hypatia.

"Well strap in," I said, "if we are finished here on Lestrade."

"We are done here," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, rising fro her chair.
"Women," she said, "Let us get into our acceleration couches. Our star runner is ready to run us out of here."

Shortly thereafter, we lifted, returned to the extraction point behind Lestrade's moon and entered Mother Space once again.11/25/2010 17:37:56 Chapter Eighteen
On the Road Again Out of the Western Spiral Arm Almost

there was not much  to do on our long journey eastward in Mother Space. The three women reorganized the cargo area and discussed endlessly the ways they could prepare the limited array of food stuffs into interesting meals. They exercised, finding a daily challenge and keeping score. When they did not like the results of their score keeping, they zeroed out their scores and made up new challenges with differing point systems. I stayed aloof, doing what I do on long journeys through Mother Space. I read. I watched videos, I listened to music: all from the comfort of my acceleration web. Although we tried to spend time together every day, my relationship with Detective Ronnie Camberwell trickled away to almost nothing. I spent more time talking to Tamara, learning about her life at the University of the Gifted Mind and her various digs in different parts of the Northern Frontier. There seemed to be any number of ancient civilizations whose even existence had passed from memory.

"Do not you get saddened by all this forgetting?" I asked. "It is as if these civilizations never existed."

"But they did exist, Star," Tamara explained. "That is the amazing ting. They may be buried in the ground now, but they once flourished and we still can learn about them and marvel at how they solved this dilemma or that conundrum. It is really quite	 fascinating.

 
"If you say so," I said. "I much prefer the line of development which goes from strength to strength."

"Like your Race," Tamara said.

"Yes," I said. "Apparently our development has continued for tens of thousands of years, much longer than I was told. I still do not understand why there is this discrepancy, but I am sure it can be explained."

"And I am sure the Pantherans have an explanation for it," captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "The Pantherans seem to have an explanation for everything even if that explanation is unsatisfying."

Unsatisfying to whom, I wondered, but did not say. There may be a great deal of friction on a long space run. We had two long space runs back-to-back. I avoided even the appearance of disgruntlement or disagreement whenever possible. That was drummed into us at the Institute for Genetic Design. Our lives were in Mother Space. We needed to know how to survive and be at the top of our form in all situations.

One evening at dinner, Detective Ronnie Camberwell, who was spending more and more time in her sleeping chamber, said, "I have been thinking a great deal about fairy tales."

"Fairy tales?" Tamara said.

"Yes, fairy tales. On our voyage to the Western Lands, the three of us talking about two specific human fairy tales --  East of the Sun and West of the moon as well as Snow White and Rose Red. We speculated that the fairy tale which may explain the relationship between the three older races, Pantherans, the Featherote Charm and the Fungusian network, is Snow White and Rose Red rather than East of the Sun and West of the Moon. We further suggested that the Trollolu was the dwarf in Snow White and Rose Red although they could equally be the mother and daughter trolls in East of the Sun and West of the Moon."

"Okay," Tamara said.

"Where are you going with this?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"Just that we never fully explored the bear," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. 

"What is there to explore?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"Are we going to meet the bear now?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"Why would you think that?" Tamara asked.

"Because that is the only character left."

"The bear with the treasure," I said.

"Treasure?" Tamara asked.

"In Snow White and Rose Red the dwarf has stolen the bear's treasure," I said, "and he gets it back when he kills the dwarf and turns back into a person."

"Does not that mean that the dwarf is the more powerful one?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked. "The dwarf has the power to turn the prince into a bear and steal his treasure."

"The dwarf has that power," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "The Trollolu had a great deal of power. However, the prince overcame the dwarf. The dwarf never wins in a fairy tale. The prince always does and gets the beautiful woman as his princess. Whatever difficulty he is either forced to overcome or voluntarily agrees to conquer, the prince always succeeds. I cannot think of a single fairy tale where the enchanted prince stays enchanted or returns from his quest and says, "Sorry, I could not manage it.""

"True," Tamara said. "But what about the prince's powerlessness?"

"It is temporary," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "The bad guys are killed or defeated or run away in the end. And."

" then the prince and the princess  live happily  ever after," I said, happy that I remembered that is how the human fairy tale ends.

"That is correct," Ronnie Camberwell said. "And in the case of Snow White and Rose Red the happiness is doubled because there are two marriages, that of Snow White to the prince who was turned into a bear by the dwarf and Rose Red to his brother."

"And where does this get us?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"I think we will meet the bear or his equivalent," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "I think we have already discovered the dwarf in the Trollolu."

"But is not it the bear who created the Landscape of Thorns?" Tamara said.

"To protect everyone else," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "They warned Star off. They built that elaborate Visitor's Center. They did not have to do any of that. They could have just dumped their waste and split. Instead, they created an elaborate warning system to deter further investigation and harm to those they thought might come upon their installation."

Like many of our conversations in Mother Space, it came to no definitive conclusions. people just stop talking and pursued other interests.

Another afternoon, I followed Detective Ronnie Camberwell into her sleeping chamber and closed the door.

"We need to talk," I said.

"About what?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

"I thought we were a couple," I said. "lately, well, for a long time now, we are not acting like a couple."

Detective Ronnie Camberwell did not say anything. I waited for a while, but she continued not to say anything. 

"Would you like me to leave?" I asked.

"Yes," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "I do not feel like talking about it or talking to you quite frankly."

After that, I did not go to her sleeping chamber anymore. We did not argue. We did not say nasty things to one another. We simply treated each other as we treated Tamara and Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo.

I could not talk to anyone about this. In the past, I would have written to Tamara, a very long video, explaining everything from my all inclusive memory. Christabel would have helped me edit the document before I sent it. Then I would wait anxiously for Tamara to respond and help me figure out what to do. But I could not do that here even though Tamara was present. That would cause conflict and I could not be the cause of conflict on my own ride.

I was sad. I never had a relationship collapse like this. Emily Dickinson and I fought. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and I conversed and made a decision. Another lover died in a military action. But this was very, very different. I did not know what to do. I relied on Christabel's ministrations to keep me functioning at my best. 

I began searching for an extraction point. Mother Space felt different here. Christabel did not have an explanation for why that might be, but I was became more and more certain of it. The word that formed in my mind was used.

"used?" Christabel asked.

"Yes," I said. "Very used. As if many vehicles had passed this way over a long period of time. Is that possible?"

Christabel considered. "You are postulating that hyperspace can retain information of its use," Christabel said. "That somehow it could become worn out or less pristine."

"Less pristine," I said. "It is still hyperspace. It almost feels dirty."

Christabel remained silent. Apparently she had no more to add to my observations which was very likely. Neither the Fungusian network nor the Featherote Charm has ever developed elaborate sensory equipment for Mother space. Besides proximity alarms and the ability to chart a course and no where the ride is along that course, hyperspace is nothingness. Or at least that was how my instructor at the Institute of Genetic Design explained it to us. We cannot measure Mother Space because at some level it is not there. How I can run a ride in something which is not there has always seemed quite strange to me but I was told that is essentially what I am doing. perhaps the star runner mind is designed now to be too terribly bothered by this.

The reason why I even bring this up is to explain my difficulty about the extraction point. With the dirtiness of Mother space, the extraction point did not stand out to me. Until this juncture, the extraction point was very clear against the background of the ongoing Mother space. There was unbroken Mother space and there was an extraction point. Now, I found it all quite muddy.

"Try thinking smaller," Christabel said. "Remember, the stars are more tightly packed here. They are hotter, too.

"More stars," I said. "Therefore, more star systems and likely more extraction points if there is at least one extraction point per system."

"That is correct," Christabel said.

"Or perhaps with the star systems so tightly packed, there are fewer extraction points," I said. "Perhaps not every star system has one."

"That is also a possibility," Christabel said. "The information we have, which is quite sketchy, fits either scenario."

Armed with these two possibilities  --  we did not discuss the possibility that there either were no extractions points or that I was incapable of finding any of them  --  I began to search in a more focused area and with great diligence. The women noticed I stopped attending meals. I stopped interacting with them. My whole focus was on finding an extraction point, any extraction point. We would emerge into normal space and see how far away we were from the planet identified on the star chart back at the Visitor's Center at the Landscape of Thorns.

After three days of searching, I finally located an extraction point. My calculations needed to be especially accurate. The edges of the point were vague. If I erred in fixing us directly on the point, we would bounce off and not go through into normal space. As I need to set the engines for maximum acceleration, this bouncing off effect  could send us a significant distance away from the extraction point. We would lose time returning to the extraction point and aligning the ride again for another attempt at extraction.

"Are we there?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked.

I had not noticed her arrival alongside my acceleration web.

"I am not sure," I said. "The extraction points at this part of Mother Space are difficult to identify. Having found one, I thought it best to enter into normal space so we can get a fix on where we are. If we are not too far away, it might be acceptable to travel through normal space to get to our destination."

"I would like to see the stars again," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said. "This last run through hyperspace has just about done me in. I am sorry, Star. The life of a space traveler is not for me."

"Yes," I said. "I realize that, too. I am also sorry, too. We named this ride thinking we would travel the space farer's equivalent of a year and a day."

"And we have just about done that," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"And we have danced, paw in hand, by the light of the moon," I said.

Detective Ronnie Camberwell sighed. "Perhaps things might have been different if we dined on mince and slice of quince."

"And perhaps things would have been better if we could have used a runcible spoon," I said,, the problem of the extraction point forgotten.

Detective Ronnie Camberwell put out her hand. I took it in my paw.

"I hope we can find that runcible spoon soon," she said, tears filling her eyes.

I squeezed her hand gently. Detective Ronnie Camberwell taught me how to do that.

"Let us look for one," I said. "I think we need it very badly."

"Yes," Detective Ronnie Camberwell whispered and fled back into her sleeping chamber.
 Neither Tamara nor Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo looked up from what occupied them. Neither ever commented on our conversation.

I resumed positioning the Owl and the Pussy Cat to pass through the center of the extraction point  --  not that extraction points have a center. They are literally points.

"Standby for extraction," I announced.

Despite my care of alignment, the extraction was bumpy, though not as bumpy as our hasty insertion from the Prince hat Star System into Mother Space.

Fortunately, Christabel can dampen the effect of sensors almost immediately. The light was intense.

The extraction point I had chosen was quite near a blue star. When I got a fix on our position, I learned I had extracted the Owl and the Pussy Cat in the correct star system.

"We are here," I told the waiting women. "I need to find the planet in question. I do not believe our star chart back at the Visitor's Center on Lestrade gave us any specifics. Christabel has set the filters on the windows. You may look out but be aware we are very close to a blue star."

Detective Ronnie Camberwell flew to the large Lounge window.

"Natural light," she said, "even with Christabel's filtering, it is beautiful."

The star system was cluttered with objects, some natural, some artificial. It took a long time for Christabel and me to sort through them. At last we were able to identify two planets and three artificial structures which might be the physical equivalent of the red blinking light at Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo's knee we all observed back in the ride park at the Landscape of Thorns.

Carefully, as not to run into any of the many small objects floating between the ride and our destination, I plotted our course to the nearer of the two planets.

I was still some distance away when the owl and the Pussy Cat simply stopped.

11/26/2010 09:13:57 

"Christabel, "I prompted.

"Checking. Diagnostic scans indicate all systems nominal--star drive, sensors, proximity alarms. We are just not going anywhere. No external forces or objects detected."

This never happened to me before. I thought. Christabel scanned databases. Nothing. No one in the history of space travel so far as we knew had even been stopped in space without a discernible cause.

I wondered what I should do. I could not go forward. I could not go backwards. I could not insert the Owl and the Pussy Cat into Mother space. 

A stray thought: Would I now have to rename my ride simply the Pussy Cat? It seemed the owl and I were no longer a functioning couple.

"I was not aware of it," Christabel said, "but it seems we were scanned."

"Scanned?" I said. "By whom? When?"

"Recently," Christabel said. "Are you aware of data, that is thoughts, being rearranged, reorganized just slightly?

I thought consciously for a moment, intentionally moving my mind over the areas where Christabel and I integrated our minds most closely. This is the doorway between us, where article intelligence meets organic brain. There was something, not fingerprints exactly, but more like a slight touch -- the way people brush past you in a crowded corridor on a busy space station.

"I feel it," I said. "Unless you pointed it out to me, I would not have noticed."

"An hypothesis," Christabel said. "Perhaps the entity which initiated the scan is holding us in place."

"To find out who we are or what our intentions are," I said. "We are in an obvious trajectory to approach the planet."

"This must be a very sophisticated scan," Christabel said. "It cannot even be measured in nano seconds."

"We postulate this is a very old race," I said. "Therefore, their technological achievements may far exceed our own."

There was nothing for it but to wait. Agonizing minutes past. I watched my time display as each colored cube dropped past my vision. How long must we wait? 

"Did the immobilization take place prior to the scan or after it?" I asked.

"Prior," Christabel said.

"I think that is good," I said. "We were not stopped because of the scan. perhaps we were stopped to make the scan possible."

"Then what are we waiting for?" Christabel said.

"For the data to be analyzed from the scan I would presume," I said.

"It has been almost five minutes,' Christabel said.

"And we have a great deal of data," I said. "terabytes upon terabytes. And much of it, although you have organized it well, are my own thoughts which may require more analysis than where we have been and where we are going. Your logs are likely to be straight forward while my thoughts, being that of a biological life form, are less direct and more intuitive."

"Are you saying you are more complex?" Christabel inquired.

"Do you want to be more complex than a biological life form?" I countered.

"Indeed," Christabel said. "I am."

As I waited, I thought, Christabel and I are playing. Since I became involved with Detective Ronnie Camberwell, my thoughts have been directed toward her and not so engaged with Christabel the way I formerly interacted with my AI. Is it possible that I am more lively when I am fully engaged with my AI? Is my personality so tied to that of my AI that I need it to be the fully realized Pantheran that I think I am. Is that what my genetic designers desired? Have I, by trying to be independent, by trying to be human, have done to myself? Have I simply appeared flat to Detective Ronnie Camberwell?

"Negative," Christabel said, intruding into my private reverie.

  
"My analysis shows Detective Ronnie Camberwell is not suited for space travel despite having lived all her life in the contained environment of Ptolemy City. Your despondency is directly linked to her state of mind. Our playfulness is a direct result of her indicating the relationship is over. You are now free to concentrate on yourself and therefore to interact with me in predictable and healthy ways along designed parameters."

"I have always tried to exceed my design parameters," I said a bit testily.

"And you continue to do so," Christabel said.

I thought some more. there was nothing else to do. We were sitting blind deaf and dumb in normal space, thousands of light years beyond the Pantheran Empire's sphere of influence. I wondered if any star runner had ever been this far beyond the Empire's known borders.

"Christabel," I said, directing my thoughts to my AI. "Did you come up with this analysis before or after the scan."

"After," Christabel replied promptly.

"Is it possible," I suggested with some trepidation, "that the scan's reorganization  of your data prompted the results of your analysis?"

There was a noticeable pause before Christabel responded. "It is a new analysis," she said. "Prior to the scan, I searched for a way to resolve your impasse with Detective Ronnie Camberwell. I could find nothing for you to do other than all the things you did do."

"Yes," I thought. "Detective Ronnie Camberwell had thwarted all my romantic attempts 
to bring us closer together. It was as if she had erected a wall between us. Because I agreed not to chronicle our intimate relationship in a narrative such as this one, I have not given the reader much insight into our relationship; however, it simply no longer existed, not since we were regularly out-of-doors on West of the Moon. Sailing away for a year and a day did not bring us happiness as it had with the owl and the pussy cat of the poem Detective Ronnie Camberwell recited to me often when we were initially together on Hypatia.

My thoughts were interrupted by a flashing green indicator on my status line. In fact, as I watched, all our systems returned to their nominal state of operation.

"We are being fed coordinates," Christabel reported, "via our communications channel."

"I am not hearing anything," I said, concerned for a malfunction.

"No malfunction," Christabel assured me. "They  are in a very compressed binary. I was also given the instructions how to decompress the signal and compress any response."

"Proceed," I said when Christabel showed me the requested destination and route. The entity or entities at the other end of the signal requested we approach an asteroid near the planet I had chosen for investigation. Well, that was something. I was looking for someone and apparently there was a someone to find.

"Not necessarily," Christabel said. "This may be a trap. There may only be a very sophisticated automatic responder who could have instructions to annihilate us on approach."

Happy thought.

None of the three women were aware of our stoppage. The propulsion system of the Owl and the Pussy Cat, like all modern Featherote-designed star drives, is silent, giving off no vibrations. There was nothing out the ride's windows which suggested motion so there were no visual clues that we were stopped. What should I tell them. It would be unfair to keep the potential danger to myself.

"We are being directed to an asteroid near the planet," I said aloud. "The Owl and the Pussy Cat received an encoded message from an entity or entities unknown. I am proceeding. I am uncertain as to whether or not this entity or these entities are hostile; however, they have had plenty of opportunity to express displeasure at our arrival or to respond as if we are a threat to them. Therefore, I think it is safe to proceed."

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo came immediately to my side. "You have detected no weapons, no overtly hostile behavior?" she inquired.

"Christabel's databases and my brain have been scanned, we think," I said. 'We were immobilized for a short time. Now all our systems are back on line and we are proceeding."

"Why did you not tell me?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo demanded.

"Because," I said simply, "there was nothing you could do about it. We were not in any immediate danger."

"We are thousands of light years away from home," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "and you do not think being immobilized is a threat?"

"Because we are so far away from any assistance," I said, "I had to wait for something to happen. If we never regained movement, our only alternative was to consider the manner of our own deaths. I could not even insert us into hyperspace."

"but there are always alternatives," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said, "taking a shuttle craft down to the planet, for example."

"We do not have a shuttle-craft aboard the Owl and the Pussy Cat," I said. "And even if I did have such a vehicle or could fabricate one, I could not operate any of the system onboard my ride to get it outside the owl and the Pussy Cat. My friend, we were truly stopped. Knowing about it would have made no difference at all."

"So you spared our feelings," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "How kind of you. You bore the burden yourself."

"I was not alarmed," I said. "Quite possibly Christabel saw to that."

"So you were drugged," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"sometimes," I said, "it means I can make rational decisions without emotional baggage."

Our words had a sharp edge to them. My response surprised me. I was sticking up for my androgen way of responding to terry attacks on my managed biological self. I had not responded this way for some time. Certainly the scan and its resultant tweaking of my mind was responsible. When this emergency was over, Christabel needed to perform a deep level diagnostic.

"Logged," Christabel responded through a new icon on my status line, a very small icon, but a reminder just the same.

"do we know anything about this asteroid?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo, sitting down at the acceleration couch and its monitors next to me. She worked the controls manually, eschewing Christabel's voice interface. Clearly she was annoyed at Christabel's chemical interventions in my system. I, for my part, appreciated Christabel's ministrations, even the very low level physical pleasure she was applying through my brain. I was relaxed, confident, satisfied with myself, alert and ready to meet a new challenge. I was not the bundle of nerves and adrenalin Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo was. If adrenalin was needed, Christabel would supply a burst of it. I could work longer, harder and more efficiently than the terry alongside of me though I continued to value her insights and presence.

"There is no communication," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"We have coordinates," I said. 

"And a beacon," Christabel said to me.

"And we are homing in on a signal provided on the surface of the asteroid," I said.

"Are you planning to land?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"Yes."

"Suppose we are grounded?"

"We will have to see," I said. "We came here to meet whoever created the landscape of Thorns. There appears to be something or someone to meet."

I was glad I had not told her of the scan or its effects on both Christabel and me. She would immediately think we were infected with a virus or being indirectly manipulated. Neither Christabel and I thought so. She would respond that of course the manipulation would not be obvious to us. However, we were responding in ways we normally responded.

Christabel tickled me more obviously in my erotic pleasure center in my brain.

"Stop that," I said.

"You do not like masturbation?" Christabel asked.

Gosh. It was ages since we were that direct with each other.

"I do," I said, "but I need to concentrate and maintain appearances for Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo."

If I was by myself,

Christabel would have given me a quickly orgasm and let the relaxation afterwards put me on an even keel.

As we drew nearer the asteroid, its contours became visible through Christabel's sensor readings. The beacon directed us to a dimple in its pockmarked surface. Even nearer, it looked like a cave.

"Are you planning to go into that opening?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked, apparently chastened and realizing I was in full control of our actions. If Christabel agreed, Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo cold pilot the ride, but only if Christabel was amenable.

"That is where the beacon is located," I said. "What is the terry expression, in for a penny, in for a pound?"

"That would be it," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo agreed.

"I suppose that is why we came here." She seemed more resigned than curious. I was curious but then, as another terry expression put it, curiosity killed the cat.

As we entered the cave, I saw that its mouth was a true entryway. Perhaps the cave was a natural feature. Perhaps not. The further we went inside, the clearer it became it was a ride park. The lights came on. The door closed behind us. A parking space with lights outlining its perimeter came on. I carefully lowered the Owl and the Pussy Cat. I could see no other rides but then the ride park was huge. We could not see the ends of it and only Christabel's sensors gave us its dimensions. Enormous vehicles could be parked here. I wondered where any of them were. Was this truly an automated system left running by its creators. I had read of such occurrences.

"Where are we?" Tamara asked, coming to my side.

"In a ride park," I said. "We received instructions to come here and a beacon guided us in. We have not yet had any personal contact.

"Another compressed message," Christabel told me. The air is breathable outside. We are to disembark and proceed to a conference room."

"All of us?" I asked, throwing aside the acceleration web straps before Christabel could withdraw them.

"The message was indeterminate," Christabel said.

"Please tell Detective Ronnie Camberwell we have landed," I told Tamara.

Tamara disappeared and returned quickly. "Ronnie said to go without her. She will wait here."

Not a good sign, I thought. Even the inducement of solid ground was insufficient to bring Detective Ronnie Camberwell out of her sleeping chamber.

I touched the jewel-like implant at my throat.

"All systems nominal," Christabel said. We were properly linked.

 "Watch your step," I told the two women. "The gravity is lighter than that inside the Owl and the Pussy Cat."

I bounced down the ramp and saw the lighted path leading into the distance. We followed colored lights away from the ride. I saw Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo tap her wrist set, recording our steps. She did not want to rely on there being lights for our return to the ride. Cautious as ever. No doubt she was alive because of her vigilance.

A door opened in the wall. It and the wall appeared to be stone. Christabel could not tell if it was or not.

On the other side of the doorway, we found ourselves in a corridor, clearly of being-made materials. A thick carpet cushioned my paws. I padded along jauntily, aided by the insubstantial gravity. The women followed me more cautiously.

"You do not appear to be suspicious," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"I am not," I said. "I am alert but not suspicious. If these beings wanted us dead, we would be dead already. If they wanted to know anything from us, they would have already extracted it from our brains. I think we are quite safe."

"Indeed  you are, my furry friend." A deep voice in the terry language said. The voice came from an open doorway to our left and a little of ahead of us. The voice was not a terry voice but a voice who spoke the terry language well, better than I myself did. I quickened my pace to meet the stranger. What did it mean by calling me "my furry friend?"

I stepped into the conference room. There was a table and chairs. The table and chairs were a little high for terries. Standing alongside the table, paw extended, was a bear.

11/26/2010 13:18:13 Chapter Nineteen
In Which We Receive Many Explanations and have Decisions to Make

"Hello, Captain Star Runner," the bear said. "Please come in."

I was not surprised the bear knew my name. He, or an instrument of his, had scanned me and my AI.

"Please sit down here," the bear said, pointing to a place on the floor next to a chair. I did as he, she, asked.

Of course, the being who greeted me was not a bear. I just expected to see a bear so that is what my mind registered at my first glimpse of the being. In fact, he, she was very tall. I think the terries would think of him, her as a giant. As a giant, he, she was also very broad with white fur covering all of his, her body. His, her paws were not paws like mine are. He, she, had hands though I suspect at one time, very long ago, they were paws. His, her, eyes were a dark brown. It was the face which was very bear-like, the black button nose and the ears on top of his, her, head. Yes, definitely the bear of terry fairy tales transformed into a person. The bear wore a wrap about its loins for privacy, I thought, but whose sensibilities were being catered to I did not know. Seeing another creature's private parts was not a taboo in my way of thinking. I was always curious about such tings.

The bear greeted both Tamara and Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo by name. This disturbed Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo but delighted Tamara.

"Please sit down across from me," the bear said, taking his, her, chair next to me. "I apologize for the size of the chairs. When we designed this room your race was not yet a space faring people."

"Had we come down from the trees yet?" Tamara asked.

"Probably not," the bear said.

"Then we were quite a ways away from space travel," Tamara said. "You probably were not certain if we ever would achieve self-awareness."

"That is likely," the bear said, "though that is not my field of expertise."

"And what would your field be?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked. "We are at a disadvantage. We do not know who you are, where you are from, your name or who you represent."

"Patience. Patience, my friend," the bear said, stroking the top of my head in a familiar though not offensive way. I wondered if the "friend" was more directed at me than to Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo.

"Let me answer your questions one at a time.

"I have brought you here to what was once a very busy spaceport. As you saw on your arrival, it is busy no longer. Spacecraft came here from distant parts of the galaxy. . 

"It must have been quite a busy spaceport." 

"That is correct, Tamara. Ours was a large civilization having contact with races far beyond the western spiral arm. At the height of our civilization, we had spacecraft here from a thousand races Your vehicle is parked in only one of our bays. We have room for five thousand vehicles on this asteroid alone and we had a thousand of them in use in this star system alone."

The numbers boggled my mind. I could see they made the same astounding impression on my companions.

The bear touched each woman's wrist, turning off their recorders.

"Your memories will have to do," the bear said. "Let your compatriots judge if they believe you are telling a tall tale when you return from this adventure.

"You asked my name. I think it would be best if you simply called me Prince hat after the white bear of that fairy tale. My particular name is not important. Nor is the name of my race. Perhaps one day, in your studies, Tamara, you will find more information about us, more positive information, that is.

"You have come here in search of answers for questions you have about the Landscape of Thorns. This is a very sad chapter in our history. It is not an event of which my people are proud. Captain Star Runner," he, she, scratched my ears just the way I like them scratched, "has given you the translation of our message. The Landscape of Thorns is not a place of honor nor does it commemorate any great deeds. It is filled with the hazardous waste of a very terrible war, a war in which we not only defeated the Trollolu but annihilated them. The Landscape of Thorns is a monument to genocide."

We were quiet then, though with the bear's rubbing of my ears, I purred.

"What prompted the genocide?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo finally asked.

"Our own arrogance," the bear said. "At that time, we thought we were as wise as gods. We found several races in the western spiral arm with great potential -- the peoples you know as the Pantherans, the Featherote and the Trollolu. It was the Trollolu who discovered the Fungusian Network though it was not a network then. The Trollolu constructed the first network which the Fungusians developed into the architecture they have today. We assisted these races to develop quickly, achieve space flight and participate in our expanding civilization.

"Unfortunately, the Trollolu developed more quickly and just as quickly asserted their dominance over the Pantherans and the Featherote. By then these two races had achieved their independence from us."

The bear rubbed the space between my eyes. Ah. He knew all the right places.

"My fore bearers had Pantherans and Featherote as pets. hey were very bright pets, of course. We conversed with them. They were content to be our companions. They were pleased to be companions for the trollolu, too. They built their star drives and piloted them."

"We came across a plaque," Tamara said.

"yes," prince Hat said. The Trollolu provided all sorts of education for the races so that they could build up their own military."

Prince hat sighed. "Then one day, as it is inevitable, the Trollolu sought to overthrow us and become the dominant people in this part of the galaxy. They were already the dominant force in the western arm."

Prince Hat was silent again.

"And then," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo prompted.

"And then we crushed them," Prince hat said, "completely and without mercy, even destroying all their egg nurseries on every world. We, too, had Pantheran runners and Featherote engineers assisting us. As the battle progressed, their fellows defected to our side, leaving the Trollolu understaffed and without replacement parts and the knowhow to repair their vehicles. The killing could have stopped before the end but both sides thought it was imperative to continue. The Trollolu would not accept defeat. My people were convinced the Trollolu would continue to mount attack after attack and the peace could never be restored until all the Trollolu were eliminated and their memory erased from history."

"But you were not successful in erasing their memory," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"No," Prince Hat said. "That is actually our fault. We let their  worlds fall into ruin. We thought that would be enough, until enterprising human beings like Tamara dug them up.

"But our mistake, if that is what you want to call it, was leaving record of our existence at the Landscape of Thorns and in the archives of both the Featherote Charm and in the Pantheran royal library. They are very old files. I suspect they are the files your mentor High Flying Chitter Robinson's historian found, Captain Star Runner. His reaction must have been one of great excitement. Unfortunately, the Royal Guard or special Branch in your government took a different approach. They want to squelch such information."

"And what do you want?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked. She seemed to have put herself in charge of questioning Prince hat with occasional input from Tamara. I was content to sit by Prince hat and be scratched. I wondered if I had some affinity to being a contented pet. The notion was a bit unsettling.

"We want to be a retired civilization," Prince hat said. "We are a very old civilization. After the war, we carried on for a very long time as trading partners with the races outside the western spiral arm. We kept an eye on the developing races inside the western spiral arm." prince hat turned to me. "What the members of your Race have done with genetic engineering is impressive. Your people always had a talent  for star running, but with your enhancements you are now so highly capable  in that area. After all, you were able to get through our extraction point"

11/26/2010 15:06:49 
 "Was it obstructed?" Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo asked.

"Will we be able to use it to get back into hyperspace?" Tamara asked.

Prince hat laughed, a low rumbling sound. "With Captain Star Runner at the controls, you will have no difficulty. Besides, I will give Star precise coordinates. And to answer your question, Captain Gyllian  Romeres Lujo, the point is not obstructed, just old. Many, many star worthy vehicles have come through that point. . We maintained it scrupulously and the area in hyperspace around it for a very long time. But the galaxy has changed. We have learned to be self-sufficient. Younger races are on the rise. perhaps one day they will come calling and be able to penetrate our insertion point or find another. Then we will plunged back into the commerce of a vibrant galaxy once more." 

We sat in silence for some time. Watt else was there to say? We had received the answers we sought. We knew the history, or at least the general outlines, of the history of the Landscape of Thorns. We knew why Special Branch dispatched the Royal Guard to silence us permanently and thwart our search.

"Do you know," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said in a very tentative voice, "what has become of my friend Emily Dickinson?"

The corners of Prince Hat's mouth drew down in what I thought might be a sad expression.

"I am sorry," the bear said. "I have no information about your friend Emily Dickinson. I can tell you this. he will not be alive and at the Landscape of Thorns. There is no way to survive there without an environmental suit. He must have found a way to leave Lestrade, as you call it. Perhaps he left there unwillingly and that is why he has not been in touch with you."

"Or he does not know how to get in touch with us," I said, speaking for the first time. "We have been hiding from the Royal Guard."

"A wise decision," Prince hat said. "They have always been ruthless killers--another characteristic of your Race, I'm afraid, Captain Star Runner."

Like me, Prince Hat used people's formal names. Not Tamara, of course. He was following what I called them.

"That brings up the ticklish business of what we do next," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "How can we return to our lives if the Royal Guard is bound and determined to hunt us down?"

"I think," Prince hat said, "a message can be arranged to come to their attention through intermediate parties. You need not worry about them."

I knew Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo wanted to know what intermediate parties the Royal Guard would respect, but she thought it best not to look, as the terry expression has it, a gift horse in the mouth."

"But that does leave the question of you, my furry friend," prince hat said, turning to me, his hand resting comfortably on my shoulder. "The Royal Guard can be persuaded to drop their pursuit of three human beings, but you are an entire matter. For some reason they have taken a particular interest in you and perhaps they will not completely cease from tracking you. Your work makes you quite vulnerable. you are often alone and poorly outfitted by temperament or equipment to defend yourself against them. I know you will defend yourself if personally attacked but if subterfuge is used, you are not well-versed in the tricks of Special Branch."

 
"So what will Star do?" Tamara asked.

"That will depend upon Captain Star Runner itself," Prince Hat said. "Why not go back to your ride and let Captain Star Runner and I discuss options."

The women hesitated.

"go ahead," I said. "Everything will be all right. After all, if Prince Hat wanted to destroy us like the Trollolu he would have done that already and quite efficiently. He would not have needed to tell us anything."

"You AR probably right," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo acquiesced grudgingly. She rose from her chair awkwardly because of its size, extended her hand and said to Prince Hat, "Thank you for seeing us and giving us some insights into the history of this part of the galaxy and especially why you created the Landscape of Thorns."

Prince Hat shook her hand in the terry way and shook hands with Tamara, too, saying he was pleased to have met my two friends.

"Follow the arrows in the ride park to your vehicle," Prince Hat said. The door to the ride park will be the only one open. Please do not explore this facility. I am afraid our guard robots will not allow it."

The women left. We sat quietly for a few minutes.

"I am sorry Detective Ronnie Camberwell chose not to join us," Prince Hat said.

"she is not a space traveler," I said. "I did not know that. I do not think she knew it either. I hope she will be able to return to Ptolemy City and resume her life as a city detective."

"I think that is quite likely," Prince hat said. "I do not think there will be any difficulty there after the Royal Guard stops looking for her. It is you they really want. The three terry women are of no interest to them."

"You speak as I speak," I said.

"I learned their language from you," Prince hat said, switching into my language. "I hope you do not mind that I have been treating you like my pet. It has been many years since I have had a Pantheran for company."

"You still keep us as pets?" I asked, not sure how I felt about that.

"We keep animals which look like you," Prince hat said. Remember your development and theirs diverged tens of thousands of years ago. You might recognize them as juveniles and they would think of you as a wise old adult."

"What will become of me?" I asked. "As you rightly said, I cannot protect myself from the Royal Guard."

"You need to be further afield," Prince hat said. "From scanning your ride, your AI Christabel and yourself, I know you need your friends, perhaps even Detective Ronnie Camberwell, so I need to find you a place close enough so that you may make visits and have holo communications with them. This will take a little time to set up. With their help, I think you can be safe to deliver each of them to their rightful place. Then return here. Is that acceptable to you?"

"So long as I can continue to be a star runner," I said, "and continue to be in touch with my friends."

"That can certainly be arranged."

"And, Prince hat, who sent me the case with the figure of Orange Runner? Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo did not ask you about that."

"I did," Prince hat said. "It was a futile gesture, keeping you away from the Western Lands. You ran straight to your friend, Tamara. That is one of the ways I know how important a friend she is."

"OK," I said, shaken. I would need to think long and hard about what Prince hat knew about me. "I will return the three women to their places and return here."

"Well spoken," Prince hat said. "I will await your return."

I left the conference room then, padding quickly down the hallway to the open door into the ride park. I wondered about the extravagant use of resources to have a breathable atmosphere in this enormous ride park just for us. It gave me hope that Prince Hat could be trusted and his word was good. I bounded up the ramp with two jumps and then onto the Lair.

"Ready to go?" I asked, receiving Christabel's confirmation that Prince hat had already sent the exact coordinates of the insertion point.

"We are ready," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Where are we going?" Tamara asked. "What did Prince hat say to you?"

"That I was to drop you all off and come back here. He wants to make other arrangements for me. He does not think I am safe any where near the Royal Guard. You will have to keep an eye out for me while I am in terry-occupied space."

"We can do that," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said.

"Detective Ronnie Camberwell," I called in a loud voice. "Do you want to go home now?"

Detective Ronnie Camberwell poked her head out the doorway to her sleeping chamber.

"Do you mean it, Star?"

"Yes," I said. "I can take you home now. I cannot stay. I need to drop Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and Tamara off on the Northern Frontier and then return here for more conversation about where I can safely operate my ride. We'll talk more in Mother Space. I just need to know where I am going."

"I would love to get back to Ptolemy City," Detective Ronnie Camberwell said.

"Then everybody strap in," I said. "This will be a shorter trip than we have had for a very long while."

 Chapter Twenty
Emily Dickinson

Once we were well inside Mother Space, I went to Detective Ronnie Camberwell's sleeping chamber. She stayed inside most days, only coming out for meals and not all of them. I was worried about her. She seemed very thin.

When she opened the door and let me inside, I said, "Detective Ronnie Camberwell, I am concerned. You are losing weight and perhaps you are depressed. Can I do anything for you?"

"I am depressed, Star," Detective Ronnie Camberwell answered. "I do not know if there is anything you can do about it. I am depressed about our relationship. I am depressed that space travel is so awful for me. I am depressed about not being at my job and home on Hypatia. I wonder if I even have a job."

"I think you will have a job," I said. "Crime does not go away, especially in Ptolemy City. "

Detective Ronnie Camberwell laughed. I am not sure it was a joyous laugh.

"You are probably right about that. There is always more work than we can do. It is finding the money to pay me that is sometimes hard."

"That is what I came to talk to you about," I said. "I cannot work out of Hypatia anymore. It is not safe for me to do that. Since we have found we cannot operate as a couple in space, I was wondering if you would like the villa and the shuttles."

"You came here to talk to me about property?" Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked. I thought I saw tears in her eyes.

I recited my identification number to myself, not my terry name. Comfort her. That is what she wants from you.

I went to sit alongside her, me on the floor, she on the bed. 

"I am sorry things did not work out between us," I said. "I wanted them to. I cannot change who I am and what I must do. You know that. Nor can I change you, who you are and what you must do. In my way of thinking, we are each doing the right thing, being who we are and doing what we were created to do. There is no shame in that. I am sad, too, just like you. I will remember you fondly and I hope you remember me that way. If it seems good to you, you can keep in touch with me and if you would rather not, I will accept your decision. It is up to you entirely. As for the property, I thought it might help yew. If it does not, I will arrange for it to be sold when I get to the Pharaoh Star System."

That was quite a long speech for me.

Suddenly, Detective Ronnie Camberwell laughed and threw her arms around my neck. "You are such a funny puss," she said. "Yes, by all means put the property in my name. I can probably live off that villa indefinitely. It is so full of everything and it runs off of geothermal power, does it not?"

"It does, and Hypatia has a lot of it."

We laughed together. Detective Ronnie Camberwell hugged me tightly.

"For old times sake," she said.

11/26/2010 18:28:10 

There are no secrets on a small ride. When it became known publicly that Detective Ronnie Camberwell and I were mutually and amicably ending our relationship, we each were given quiet support from both Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and Tamara. I noticed Tamara and Detective Ronnie Camberwell were spending more time together. They were no longer competing for my affection. Tamara decided to disembark at Alexandria Space Station to spend some time on the ground with Detective Ronnie Camberwell and to see the city I had so often told her about. I was able to transfer all my real property to Detective Ronnie Camberwell. I went aboard the training ride and told the AI that as a teacher, I expected it to take good care of Detective Ronnie Camberwell and Tamara. It was to give them voice instructions and take them to the villa. Afterwards, it was to understand that Detective Ronnie Camberwell would be giving it instructions and it was to always keep her safe and teach her how to pilot the ride. I said all of this in front of the two women. They giggled a little at my tones of admonition. You have to be firm with training AIs. They are much simpler on one level than a space worthy AI and on the other hand their prime directive is to be responsible for their students. The AI would continue to wait at its parked location until the women wished to return to Hypatia. Tamara wanted to explore the space station. Since it was part of her home, Detective Ronnie Camberwell agreed. The last view of them I had was the two of them walking hand in hand chattering away. I did not think they would become a long-term couple. Tamara's passion for archaeologist would keep her away from home for long periods of time. Detective Ronnie Camberwell's determination to keep herself planet bound would mean a relationship with long absences in it would not suit her.

I ducked into a fabric shop to buy some material for some new play clothes. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo had made it known we could pick up our relationship at least for the return to the Northern Frontier.

With a restocked ride and all my business ties to Hypatia settled, we bid farewell to the Pharaoh Star System. When I severed my relationship with the League of Hypatian Pirates, I also arranged transportation back to Socrates and the University of the Gifted Mind for Tamara. She was already writing up her next proposal for investigating the Trollolu. Armed with the information Prince Hat gave her, I was sure she would find the needed funds for another excavation at West of the Moon or some other site.

The lovemaking with Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo was exquisite. If you want details, check out my pornographic site. There are scenarios you can participate in, for a fee, of course, which are suitable for terries.

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo made a preliminary report to her superiors when we were parked at Over the Moon Space Station, the freight section of the Alexandria Space Station. That she could answer a lot of questions about the origins of the Landscape of Thorns helped explain her long absence and her disregard of orders. The Ministry of Defense for the Consortium indicated that Special Branch had already sent an apology for a mistake of identity by the Royal Guards in the matter of High Flying Chitter Robinson's death. They apologized for any inconvenience. Any inconvenience, I thought. I felt certain High Flying Chitter Robinson's flock felt a great deal of inconvenience as well as his mate of many years and the many offspring to leave his nest.

What did comfort me is that Prince Hat was true to his word. That gave me confidence that a plan or strategy or idea for my future was in the works.

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo also obtained a significant payment to me for my time and supplies. I wondered how I would transfer funds between the Northern Frontier and my new base of operation. Well, that would have to wait. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo agreed to act as my agent if that became necessary.

Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo also arranged for safe housing through the Ministry of Defense while I was at Grand Central Station. My ride, which I renamed Puss in Boots would also be kept in a safe place so that no one could tamper with it.

As readers of my other adventures know, I am fond of space station diners. I have my favorites and Grand Central Station is no exception. I made a beeline for the Rick Island Line Cafe. One of the waitresses smiled when she saw me. "Well is not it Captain Star Runner. You have certainly been a stranger here."

Her remark made me realize that if Prince hat spoke the truth, I might never return to this cafe and other diners I had enjoyed. I had not, for example, been able to return to the Intergalactic Diner in Ptolemy City. Well, such things could not be helped. I would not ever eat at the Spyglass Cafe where I first met Tamara on pirate's Cove in the Long John Silver Star System either.

"I have been out and about in this great galaxy of ours," I told the waitress.

"You and everyone else," the waitress said congenially.

I looked abut the cafe for a place that would suit me.

"Pussy cat, pussy cat, where have you been?" a familiar voice called to me from a back corner of  cafe.

"I have been to London to see the queen," I responded with great joy. There sat my friend, Emily Dickinson, quite alive and eating a large platter of terry food.

I joined him.

"Do you know where Gyllie is?" he asked.

"On her way to the Ministry of Defense for a meeting," I said. "We just got in."

"I have been looking all over the western spiral arm for you two," Emily Dickinson said.

"We have been looking for you, too," I said. "Where have you been?"

"In jail," Emily Dickinson said.

"You were imprisoned?" I asked, aghast. "By whom? For what reason? Where? For how long?"

Emily threw his hands up in a gesture of surrender. "Hold on there, pussy cat. I will get to all that. What are you having?"

"I want macaroni-and-cheese," I said, "a bowl of milk and a chocolate chip cookie."

Emily Dickinson called a waitress over and gave her order. The Rock Island Line Cafe is very old-fashioned. No flying trays here. A person takes and brings your order. It is part of the full employment policy. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo explained it to me many years ago when I was a neophyte on the northern Frontier.

"It is embarrassing," Emily Dickinson muttered. "The Sacred Worlds snatched me right out of that crummy base camp at Landscape of Thorns. They did not even wait for me to get both shoes on."

"We wondered about the shoe," I said. I knew Emily Dickinson would wisecrack that I was not being helpful. It was part of our regular and comfortable exchanges.

"Yeah, well, they brought me in all the way from the Holmes-Watson Star System on a drunk and disorderly charge going back twenty years. Can you imagine that?"

"Imagine that were drunk and disorderly?" I asked. "I certainly can. And in the Sacred Worlds, too." I tut-tutted for emphasis.

"Well, I was staying clear of the Sacred Worlds," Emily Dickinson Plainfield, "but there was a whole big publicity hoopla when Gyllie was going out to the Landscape of Thorns, see, and I was in the background of one of the pictures. So the authorities go all the way out there to pick me up. Can you imagine it?"

I could not but I did not say so. I simply waited for Emily Dickinson to go on with his story.

Before he could continue, my food arrived.

"And your milk in the bowl just the way you like it," my waitress said cheerily.

I felt a deep sense of sadness. No one where I was going, wherever that was, would say, "just the way you like it, Captain Star Runner."

"Did you know," Emily Dickinson continued, "they locked me up for a year and a day."

"They take drunk and disorderly very seriously there," I stated with mock seriousness.

"Truly, they do, Star," Emily Dickinson said. "I was lucky they did not string me up."

"Do they have capital punishment there?" I inquired, feeling horror but acting quite indifferently as if it was a matter of little interest to me.

"I suppose," Emily Dickinson said. "I do not really know. A year and a day is their favorite sentence. And speaking of a year and a day, how is your lady love, the strong and beautiful Veronica?"

"Sadly," I said, digging into my macaroni-and-cheese, "we are no a couple. No hard feelings though. We are just not compatible."

"Too bad," Emily Dickinson said.

"It is," I said, "but we will get over it. I would say we are still friends but I had to wrap up my affairs in the Pharaoh Star system. I may never see her again."

"Why is that?" Emily Dickinson, as the terry saying has it, was all ears.

"My business, which Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo will explain to you when you see her, requires me to travel far afield."

"How far? Where? For how long?" Emily Dickinson shot the questions out quickly, just the way I had done.

"Maybe forever," I said. "I cannot stay here. Special Branch, the Royal Guard specifically, has their eye on me."

"No kidding," Emily Dickinson said. "What did you do? Or what do they think you did?"

"I learned some information they would rather I did not know," I said. "They made one attempt. We all got away and we have been running all over the place since which is why you could not find us."

"Oh, here is Gyllie now," Emily Dickinson said.

"Look who I fund," I said when Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo came toward our table.

"I spotted you first," Emily Dickinson insisted.

"You, two," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo scolded us in her mock officer's voice.

Emily Dickinson brought her up-to-date.

"We are resupplying your ride right now, Star," Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo said. "I know you need to be on your way. It will be ready in the morning."

"Thank you," I said. A substantial balance was in my account, too. Captain Gyllian Romeres Lujo and the Ministry of Defense had come through for me.

Our good-byes were intense and quite personal. I will not chronicle them here. Each in their own way, these two are very good friends of mine. Detective Ronnie Camberwell asked me all that time ago if I really cared enough to track Emily Dickinson down. For her sake, I had said no, but I lied to myself then. He was worth tracking down. He was a better friend to me than she was a lover. This is the truth though it is hard to write.

And then Puss in Boots, Christabel and I were sliding through an insertion point and going deep into Mother Space to return to Prince Hat.

Epilogue

As he promised, Prince hat was waiting for me in the same conference room when I returned to the asteroid and the enormous ride park.

"Did your friends return safely?" Prince Hat inquired.

"Yes," I said. "We even found our missing friend. His disappearance had nothing to do with the Landscape of Thorns or our troubles with the Royal Guard. It was a personal matter."

Prince Hat accepted my explanation.

"I have good news for you," Prince hat said. "We have a job for you. It may grow into a little business for you."

"I am listening," I said, deciding to be non-committal. It is a big galaxy after all.

""I told you and your friends we are self-sufficient. That is not strictly true."

Had Prince hat lied. I twitched my tail in mild agitation.

"We did not lie," prince hat said, seeing the twitch. "We are. however, we cannot synthesize a particular medication. It requires a special ingredient. We had a large supply and it is for a rare condition."

Twenty-seven thousand years is a very long time, I thought. How rare a condition was it and how much had they stockpiled.

"Our trade with some of the races went on for a very long time," he continued. "We tried substitutes, things we could synthesize ourselves. It works in ninety percent of the cases. We could then use the medication from our outside source only in the most dire situations."

It seemed a thin story, but I knew I would be told no other. Maybe it was true. Maybe it was not true. Clearly I was not going to be introduced to Prince hat's society. Maybe that was the nature of a pet. You had to stay outside in a pen even if the pen was a large empty asteroid.

"We want you to go to the other race and get the medication," Prince hat concluded.

  
"Do you know," I asked, "if they are even still around?"

I did not want to go in search of another legend by myself.

"Oh, yes, they are," Prince Hat said. "We may inquiries of our old contact."

This stretched even my naive credulity. I swished my tail in a more agitated gesture.

"Not the same person," prince hat assured me. "Our inquiry was a general one, routed to a supplier who returned our inquiry."

I could not imagine it. But perhaps this unknown race was different from anything I knew. It was a big galaxy.

"It will be a long run," Prince hat continued. "The race is in another arm."

That caught my attention. Not just a part of the western spiral arm but a whole new territory.

"Will my race be an issue?" I asked.

"Not at all," prince hat said. "They will neither think of you as a pet on his master's business nor as a member of a repressive regime. You will be simply an alien arriving on business. This race, we have learned, is still a thriving business culture. We can provide you with what we know of their past and what we have learned recently. I think you will be well-prepared."

I waited.

"And well-compensated, too," Prince hat continued.

He named a fee, a very generous fee even with the long runs.

"Is there any cargo to be brought to this new race?" I asked.

"A diplomatic pouch," Prince hat said. "It will be sealed."

I picked up a paw and dropped it. It was of no importance tome. As a smuggler, I never wanted to know what I was carrying so long as it was not hazardous to me or a danger to my ride. If either was true, I simply wanted a higher fee.

Our business concluded, I returned to my ride to await supplies and the pouch.

As I inserted Puss in Boos into Mother Space, I wondered if Prince hat's people would start maintenance again on their gateway to Mother Space. perhaps this part of the galaxy would be reintroduced to a very old race once more.

The End

The Adventures of Star Runner, the Pantheran, continues with a new episode in a new part of the Milky Way in 2011.
